Chapter 41.
I felt a sharp sting on the edge of my chest under his gaze when he looked over my shoulder. Startled, I quickly pulled my cardigan closed, but he bit my earlobe.

"You can't cover it."

Reluctantly, Giselle released the cardigan and closed her eyes.

"Feel what it means to become a woman. You'll enjoy it as much as I do."

The rough whisper brushing her ear resembled the faint rustle of the thin muslin against the hands kneading her chest.

Ah, this is strange

With her eyes closed, Edwin's caresses were even more intense. Unable to see where or how he would touch her next, she was caught off guard every time. She couldn't get used to these unfamiliar sensations.

"Ah!"

Each time he stroked or pinched her soft, rounded nipples, a sharp jolt tightened the space between her legs. When he massaged and pressed her tender flesh, a warm, tingling sensation surged in the same area.

"Ha!"

When he attacked multiple spots at once, an unfamiliar, stabbing sensation surged between her thighs, which she had instinctively clamped shut, leaving her startled.

Clunk.

Her legs sprang up, accidentally hitting the side table. A champagne glass tipped over, spilling the expensive champagne.

"Ah, ung, Si-Sir. please stop."

Edwin, oblivious to the commotion, continued his unhurried exploration of Giselle's breasts.

"You're sensitive here. The sound changes." "Ah, hmm."

It wasn't just between her legs that felt strange. Deep moans tried to escape her throat. She covered her mouth with her hands, trying to suppress them, but he leaned close to her ear and whispered softly.

"Does it feel good?"

Giselle was used to lying that she liked things for Edwin, even when she didn't. But she didn't dare do so now.

I tried to hold back since Edwin said I couldn't, but I can't anymore.

Desperately trying to push his hands away, Giselle answered with honesty.

"Sir, I don't like this." "I love you."

At that moment, Giselle's resistance stopped. Edwin took her breasts in both hands, stroking his thumbs from the upper curves down to the nipples, as he confessed again.

"I love you, Giselle."

Her heart trembled. The voice that escaped her chest trembled, too.

"Do you mean. you love me as a woman?" "What else could it be?"

His hands, which had been kneading her chest, pulled away. One of his hands, now outside the nightgown, grabbed her wrist and gently tugged it back.

"If I loved you as a daughter, would I be doing this?"

His hand landed on something thick and solid. Enveloped in wool, she unconsciously grasped it, and a hot, rough breath fell on her ear.

This is Edwin's. Oh my God.

Realizing what she was holding, Giselle gasped and quickly let go. As she stumbled back in a panic, Edwin pulled her into a tight embrace, passionately confessing once more.

"I love you, Giselle."

His lips, confessing his love, trailed along her neck, leaving a wet, hot path. Her heart pounded wildly. When his lips reached her shoulder, he pulled down her cardigan and asked,

"Do you love me too?" "Of course."

Without hesitation, Giselle affirmed and confessed her feelings with fervor.

"I love you, Sir. I've loved you for a long time. I thought it was a one-sided love."

But it wasn't. She felt so happy that tears welled up. Her vision blurred, and she didn't notice Edwin removing her cardigan.

"Whatever you give me for my birthday tomorrow morning, nothing will be better than hearing you say you love me." "What if we make your birthday our first night together?" ".What?"

He kissed her bare shoulder and murmured sweetly,

"Sharing love, we will create an unforgettable birthday together."

Sharing love. It was much more intimate and beautiful than simply saying "sex," completely different from the notion of having intercourse. Sharing love with Edwin. Giselle found herself wanting that.

.Edwin and I sharing love?

But alongside her desire came the discomfort with the idea.

Wouldn't it be better to wait until I no longer feel reluctant? There are birthdays every year. Even if it's not her birthday, they could share love when she was ready.

But.

As Giselle wrestled between desire and fear, Edwin embraced her and watched her closely. He nuzzled her neck with his nose and pleaded softly,

"My dear Miss Bishop, if you allow me, you will make me happy."

Edwin, being so desperate, made her heart race even more.

If Edwin wants it so badly.

Fearing her trembling would give her away, Giselle quickly answered and fell silent.

"Very well." "Good girl."

Praising her as if soothing her goosebump-covered arm, Edwin finally took off the cardigan remaining on her wrists. When he stood up and pulled her to her feet, she thought they were heading to the bed, but instead.

"Shall we see how much my little lady has grown?"

He pulled the straps of her nightgown down over her shoulders. In an instant, the garment slipped off and fell into a pile on the floor.

"Ah."

Giselle covered her chest with her arms. Opposite her, Edwin clucked his tongue, as if scolding a disobedient child, grabbed both her wrists with one hand, lifting them above her head.

"Sir."

Feeling unbearably embarrassed, she twisted her wrist, trying to break free, but he wouldn't let go. Unlike his usual self, which was playful but never crude, Edwin seemed completely different now.

He openly looked up and down Giselle, whose only garment was a pair of white satin panties, leaving her virtually naked. His gaze lingered especially on her chest, which was swollen at the tips due to his teasing.

"You've grown. And very nicely."

Her initial shame began to turn into discomfort, but only for an instant. Seeing Edwin's satisfied smile, she even felt relieved that she had grown into someone he found so beautiful.

After finishing his evaluation, Edwin finally released her wrist. But before she could even think of covering herself, he pulled her into his arms.

"Ah, h-hmph."

The sensation of the wool rubbing against her bare skin startled her, while his hands, touching her skin directly, made her tremble even more. But nothing could compare to the sudden intrusion of his tongue into her mouth.

At first, Giselle's body stiffened like a board, but the tension gradually faded. She wrapped her arms around his neck, clinging to him, and tentatively moved her tongue in response to his.

Have I become a woman?

The tongue kiss no longer felt as terrifying or strange as it first had.

Thus, Giselle decided to try what Edwin had prompted her to do earlier: she stuck out her tongue.

What will he do now?

She waited nervously. Edwin, who had been nibbling and sucking her lips, tightened his and lightly bit the tip of her tongue when it tentatively entered his mouth.

As soon as he sucked on her tongue, Giselle's eyes widened.

The initial shock didn't last long. She quickly realized that having his soft lips suck on her tongue sent shivers of pleasure through her.

When Edwin's tongue ventured into her mouth again, Giselle bit and sucked his in return. He seemed to enjoy it as much as she did; his breath, pouring over her, grew even more ragged.

As they continued to bite and suck on each other's tongues, surrendering to these new sensations, saliva overflowed from their connected lips, dripping down without either of them caring. But suddenly, Edwin pulled his lips away.

Startled, Giselle blinked. He wasn't looking into her eyes, but much lower. His gaze trailed down, following the path of the drops sliding down her neck.

What could he be thinking?

Then, as if a grand idea had struck him, Edwin smiled and picked up a jar from the table. What he grabbed was a small jar of honey.

What does he plan to do with that?

With wide eyes, Giselle watched Edwin open the lid and tip the jar. Honey dripped towards her chin.

"Ah."

Startled by the sticky drops falling onto her skin, Giselle instinctively tried to back away, but a large hand pressed firmly against her shoulder blades, pulling her closer. Unable to escape, she could only stand still as the honey continued to drizzle over her.

What kind of game is this?

Edwin wasn't one to play with food. As Giselle stared at him in confusion, he poured the honey all over her body—from one end of her collarbone to the other, trailing down her chest—before finally setting the jar on the floor.

Then he sat down on the sofa alone.

Unsure what to do, Giselle blinked at him. Edwin rested his chin in one hand, as if admiring her.

His gaze, thick and sticky like honey, clung to her body. Overwhelmed by shame, Giselle tried to cover herself, but Edwin gently took her hands, one by one, into his.

Chapter 42.

"Why are you trying to hide something so pretty?" ".What are you doing?" "Waiting." "Waiting for what?"

He just smiled without answering. His gaze traced the golden honey running down at varying speeds, following the curves of her body.

As she waited for the moment Edwin said he was waiting for, she grew anxious. When Giselle's chest swelled enormously, the honey flowing over it slowed, then slid down the moment it seemed to sink.

A drop of golden honey flowing down her milk-white skin reached her peach-colored flesh. The instant it crossed her areola, she shivered and clung to the tip of her trembling breast.

He released Giselle's hand. As soon as he did, she rushed to try and cover her chest, but his mouth was faster than her hands.

"Ah!"

His wet tongue licked the drop of honey clinging to the tip of her nipple. Startled by the sensation, she tried to pull away, but before she could, he seized her nipple with his mouth.

Holding Giselle's arms, which had frozen in the act of covering her chest, he pulled her in and sucked deeply. In an instant, her areola disappeared into his mouth.

"Ah, ah. Sir, stop. Ah, hng."

He sucked on Giselle's nipples ravenously, the lewd sound resonating vividly throughout the room.

Each time, it felt as if all her nerves were being pulled to the tips of her chest. Every time he inhaled, Giselle felt her breath being cut off. Following her ragged breaths, her vision flickered. At the same time, a tingling sensation surged between her legs, making her feel as if she would faint.

Even as she began to lose her senses.

"Heuk!"

When his tongue brushed her penis, she felt as if she had been struck by lightning, jolting her back to consciousness. Then, once again, she was lost in the melting sensation of his lips wrapping around her breast.

His lips sucked at her penis, pulling at it long before releasing.

Kiss.

"Ah!"

A licentious sound escaped her.

"Hah."

Edwin caught his breath. The wet flesh quickly dried under his hot, rough breath.

Brushing away the hair that had fallen over his face while engrossed, he buried his face in Giselle's chest again. This time, he licked the honey-drenched, milk-white flesh as if savoring ice cream.

"Hng, Sir, this is, slow. Ahh." "Stay still. Don't move."

As she writhed her body, her swaying breasts became the target of his relentless pursuit.

"Ah!"

When he bit her nipples as if punishing her, Giselle stopped resisting completely.

The heavy flesh rose and fell as his tongue pushed it. His nose burrowed beneath her breast. Breathing raggedly at the scent of her skin, he left red marks on her pale flesh before peeling off his lips.

She thought it was over, but it wasn't. He moved on to the other breast and devoured it with the same avidity.

"Hng, ah, ahh, Sir, hah, mng."

By now, she no longer had the strength to suppress her moans. As her voice grew more and more unrestrained, he covered her mouth with his hand.

"Hah, hah."

It wasn't until much later that his hand withdrew. By then, both of Giselle's breasts were glistening, not with honey, but with saliva.

Edwin's lips, swollen and bruised as much as her nipples, curved in satisfaction. Yet, his eyes looked hungrier than before he had tasted her.

Without stopping, he pressed his lips to her skin again. This time, his tongue trailed along the honey stream down her décolletage. When he reached the pool of honey in her navel, Giselle did not push him away.

She had no strength to resist. She could barely stand upright. If Edwin hadn't been supporting her arms, she would have collapsed by now. She was only relieved that her navel wasn't as sensitive as the tips of her chest, catching her breath as she thought so.

But then, Edwin released her and let her go. She swayed, barely managing to stand on her own.

His gaze fell on the area below her navel. A drop of honey slowly slid down her lower abdomen. Realizing it might stain her panties, Giselle was about to reach out to stop it when Edwin pulled down her white satin panties.

"Heuk, Sir."

She reached out to stop him, but the panties had already fallen to her ankles.

"Stand straight."

As soon as she bent down to pick them up, he grabbed her arms and pulled her up.

She was completely naked.

In front of Edwin.

Edwin hadn't removed anything. He remained as composed and dignified as when he first entered the room, while she stood there completely exposed. The shame that had briefly fled came rushing back. This time, she even pleaded with him through tears, but he wouldn't let go.

Meanwhile, the honey that had been flowing down her lower abdomen slid down to the golden curls below. His gaze remained fixed there. Just as she tried to cross her legs to cover herself.

"Ah!"

His middle finger pressed against the cleft where her thighs met. His rough fingertip grazed the hidden nodule of flesh.

Zing.

Startled by the strange sensation, she stumbled backward.

The finger that had slipped between her legs withdrew. Edwin raised it to show her and smiled.

"You're already wet."

It was clear that the wetness soaking his finger wasn't just a drop of honey.

"My puppy, did you enjoy your Edwin's petting?"

Her face was burning with heat. Lowering her head in shame, she felt herself pulled forward by the wrist until she stood directly in front of Edwin's knees. He moved his hand carefully, parting her skin slightly with his fingers.

"Here." "Ah."

As soon as he uncovered the area, his touch made her tense up, a strange and startling sensation rushing through her.

"Have you ever touched yourself here?"

He asked calmly, moving his fingers deliberately. Giselle shook her head vigorously, closing her eyes. She knew what he was referring to, but she had never experienced it like this. It was unfamiliar, its intensity overwhelming her in a way she hadn't expected.

"Stop. please."

She mumbled, her voice trembling with uncertainty.

The moment his fingers paused, she let out a sigh she hadn't realized she had been holding. But it was a mistake to drop her guard. Just as her body began to relax, his hand moved again, this time more purposefully, leaving her no room to resist. Even as she instinctively tried to close her legs, his firm presence prevented it.

In her confusion, she noticed his movements were deliberate, almost searching. His head tilted slightly as if thinking of something.

"Sir. surely you aren't."

She thought, panic rising.

His thumb pressed lightly against her skin.

"Ah!" "There it is."

He murmured, more to himself than to her.

When she reflexively tensed, his hand moved gently as if to reassure her.

"Has anyone done this to you before?"

He asked in a soft but insistent voice.

"No. no one."

She stammered, her voice catching with every word.

"Like this."

He continued, his tone calm.

"Hah."

His finger moved slightly, and though it was just a simple action, it felt overwhelming. She hid her face in her hands, nodding slightly to answer his question.

"You're a good girl."

He said quietly.

His large hand settled gently over her, firm but not rough. When she tensed again by reflex, he let out a sigh, his voice quiet but with a note of exasperation.

"Relax."

He resumed his movements, steady and determined, careful but unyielding. She didn't know how to respond or what to do. The unfamiliar tension washed over her again, leaving her breathless.

"Stop. I don't like this."

She whispered, barely audible.

"If you can't endure this,"

He said, his voice firm,

"Soon you'll have to endure more. You'll understand tonight. You'll see what awaits you."

Giselle's eyes briefly snapped open, looking toward his legs. Even from where she stood, she could feel something coming, its presence undeniable and imposing. The idea unsettled her, but she could do nothing.

"Even if you don't like it, endure it."

He said, his voice resolute.

Terrified and overwhelmed, Giselle found herself unable to resist. She had no choice but to accept the discomfort as his hand moved with relentless purpose.

"Ah."

She gasped, the sound escaping her involuntarily.

Chapter 43.

On the outside, even his thumb grazed a sensitive spot, causing Giselle to stifle a sharp gasp that threatened to escape her lips.

This is strange. Too much. Ah, what.?

The sensation on her sensitive spot suddenly changed. Looking down in apprehension, Giselle froze.

Kneeling before her, he was burying his face in an intimate place. If that was the case, then what was stimulating her.

His tongue?

Upon realization, she tried to instinctively recoil, but—

"Ah!"

Fingers firmly embedded within her prevented her from moving. Even when she tried to push his head away, it remained unyielding.

"Ah, Sir, that's. dirty, hng."

His movements grew more fervent, leaving Giselle with no option but to clamp her hands over her mouth to suppress her cries.

"Mm. hng."

Each time his tongue brushed a specific spot, Giselle's legs trembled uncontrollably. Just as she was about to collapse, his fingers pressed upward mercilessly.

"Hah!"

She steadied herself with one hand on his shoulder while the other contained her voice. As her body curved forward, his tongue momentarily lost contact.

When he failed to reach the sensitive spot again, he paused.

Twitch.

"Ah!"

The fingers buried inside her moved with a deliberate motion, causing her hips to shudder forward. Not missing the moment, the tip of his tongue returned to its target, lightly grazing the tender nodule.

This is. strange.

It felt as if something was swelling inside her, a sensation both strange and overwhelming. The mounting pressure, reminiscent of a need she didn't comprehend, frightened her.

"Sir, please. stop. I can't."

Gathering all her strength, she managed to push him away, but he closed the distance again. This time, she shielded herself with her hand, but—

"I can't take any more.!"

Effortlessly, he pulled her hand away and lifted one of her legs. As she wobbled, he supported her thigh over his shoulder and buried his face between her legs once more.

This time, his lips closed around the sensitive spot, clamping firmly onto it.

"Ah!"

The discharge was electric, coursing through her entire body, just as when he had teased her elsewhere. However, this time, the intensity was far greater than she could bear.

It felt as though she was about to cross a line she couldn't turn back from. When he had kissed her elsewhere, she'd felt faint. Now, she wished to simply pass out.

"Sir, please. I beg you."

She pleaded near tears, but he did not stop. With his eyes closed, he savored her as if she were a delicacy, unhurriedly and thoroughly.

Just as the unknown sensation peaked and threatened to overwhelm her, a sudden tension seized her entire body. Then, with a shudder, everything released in a torrent of relief. Her vision darkened, and she gasped as the world around her seemed to dissolve.

Although something warm slid down her legs, Giselle felt no shame. She was utterly consumed by the sensations that had overtaken her.

A soft sound broke the haze as his lips finally left her. But he hadn't merely stopped—she had collapsed.

He caught her immediately and cradled her against him. Their eyes met, and for a moment, confusion washed over her mind. Despite his actions, his expression lacked joy. He was smiling, but it was a distant, mocking smirk, his gaze cold and remote.

Perhaps she was imagining it in her disoriented state. After all, she had been overwhelmed to the point of losing all sense of reason.

"Haa."

The sensation of his tongue brushing her collarbone brought her back to her senses. She realized she was half-embraced by him, her naked skin pressed against his as he licked the remnants of honey from her chest.

Her body shuddered anew, still sensitive to the lingering echoes of earlier sensations.

What was that.?

She didn't understand what she had felt, but one thing was clear.

"Did you enjoy it?" "Yes."

His satisfied smile deepened at her honest answer. Throughout the encounter, a frustrating tension had built inside her, only to be released in a moment of unparalleled bliss. Was this what people called a climax?

"Mmph."

When he leaned in to kiss her, she accepted him with surprising ease, her lips instinctively moving against his.

As the kiss ended, she caught her breath and asked hesitantly,

"Sir." "Yes?" "How. how do you know things like this?"

Had he done this with someone else? While she was experiencing everything for the first time, perhaps he wasn't.

Even in her dazed state, jealousy flickered within her.

"Is there any man who doesn't know such things?"

His answer was not the one she was looking for.

"There might be girls who don't."

Having introduced her to these new sensations, he still treated her like a naïve child.

"Do you want me to teach you something even better?"

Edwin stood up and helped Giselle to her feet. The white panties tangled at her ankles were crushed under his black shoes.

He removed her panties with a rough, pulling motion, as if ripping them off, then hoisted her limp body over his shoulder. He laid her down on the bed.

Exhausted, her small, nude body lay sprawled, panting. The man in the suit loomed over her, his gaze intense, almost ferocious.

His hand, cold against her feverish cheek, moved slowly, tracing her neck and chest.

"Ah."

Her chest rose as she took a deep breath, and in that moment, his wide hand enveloped her breast, causing her body to tremble.

Among the junior students at Fullerton, everyone might not know who the 'Duke's pet girl' was, but no one could overlook the 'senior with the ample blonde chest.' Despite her generous proportions, his hand seemed to hold it perfectly, just slightly overflowing.

Her soft flesh yielded flexibly under his touch, molding to his movements. As he gripped her breast firmly, the white skin spilling slightly between his long fingers, his voice was dry and parched, like a starving man.

"You've grown wonderfully—too precious to give to another."

Though this part of her body had previously felt like a burden, his appreciation of it now made her view it differently. What was once unpleasant for her to touch now brought a measure of pleasure because he found pleasure in it.

"So this is a woman's body. soft, warm, tender. I've never experienced this before."

He murmured languidly as if intoxicated by her texture, completely absorbed in the sensation of touching her.

He's never touched a woman. So this is his first time too.

Giselle had to gather all her strength not to burst into laughter.

The hand that had been caressing her chest withdrew, sliding toward her flat belly. Knowing where he was headed, she tensed up again. When his hand reached just below her navel, Giselle instinctively lifted her knees.

"Ah!"

Her attempt to close her legs was thwarted as he firmly gripped her thighs and spread them open.

"Let's see how beautiful the flower that blooms between your legs is."

His sharp gaze settled on her most intimate place, with an unbearable intensity. The fact that he was staring at what she herself was reluctant to view filled her with overwhelming shame.

"Sir, please don't look. I hate it." "Quiet. They'll hear outside."

Despite her desperate attempts to close her legs again, he held her knees firmly apart, unmoving.

"A pink flower,"

He murmured, his eyes scanning her intimately.

"One might think it smells green and immature, but it carries the rich scent of an adult woman. Before another man catches this scent and steals it from me, I should claim it first."

When he finally loosened his grip to unbuckle his belt, Giselle was too stunned to even think about closing her legs. She stared blankly as he prepared himself.

He took a white silk handkerchief from his vest pocket and placed it under her hips, like a gentleman laying a cloth for a lady. But she didn't feel like a lady being treated with chivalry at that moment.

From his back pant pocket, he pulled out a can that looked familiar to her—a box of condoms. She noticed it was slightly dented, even though it had been perfectly intact the last time she had seen it.

.He didn't use it in the meantime, did he?

Despite having just confirmed he'd never touched a woman, the thought of him being with someone else made her stomach churn with jealousy.

Only when he opened the box did she let out a tiny sigh of relief. There were still three condoms inside, untouched.

Then. it means he bought them just for me.

Chapter 44.

The moment she thought of it, the conflict she had temporarily forgotten while distracted by thoughts of another woman resurfaced. The inner struggle ended as Edwin unzipped his pants. She realized she had to speak now or lose the chance.

"Sir." "Hm?" "Do we really have to do this today?"

She had reluctantly agreed because she expected it to be a romantic expression of their love.

But since she gave her consent, nothing Edwin did felt romantic. Giselle, whose heart would overflow with just a drop of his affection, found no such warmth in his actions this time.

Disappointment had set in. She wanted to stop.

"We have to. I've been waiting for this day."

He answered indifferently, pulling open his trousers.

Hearing how long he had waited for this moment made her feel pity, but also frustration at his unilateral expectations.

"I don't think I'm ready yet."

Edwin looked down between her legs as if to refute her claim. Uneasily, Giselle crossed her legs to hide the obvious wetness and clarified her words.

"My heart isn't ready." "Why? Are you suddenly afraid?"

His body hovered over hers again, his concerned eyes scanning her face. It was a look Giselle had become familiar with.

But the way he gently coaxed her, promising it wouldn't hurt while trying to separate her legs, was completely unfamiliar. When he paused to straighten his posture, she thought he had given up, but he hadn't.

"Giselle, haven't you ever wondered what happens in those parts of books that are skipped?"

Edwin pointed to the novel he had been flipping through earlier, now resting on the bedside table.

"You know, the parts where the man lays the woman down on the bed, and then the scene fades to dawn? I'm trying to teach you what those scenes are actually like."

Edwin stroked her tightly closed legs and planted soft kisses on her clenched knees. That tender persuasion made her resolve waver slightly.

Giselle's legs loosened, just a fraction, but he seized the moment, grabbing her thighs to pull them apart. The hesitation in her heart solidified once more, like her thighs. He did not back down.

"Giselle, you've told me you've loved me for a long time, right? Be honest. Did you never imagine the two of us as the protagonists in those novels?"

She couldn't deny it. Her flushed cheeks had already betrayed her.

"I'll make your fantasies come true." "I've never imagined. doing this. That's why I'm not ready yet."

When she rejected him again, the man, who had been teasing her with kisses between her knees, paused and let out a dry laugh. He sounded irritated, which was unlike him.

"Isn't it a little late, considering how far we've already come?"

Although the way he pinched her nose playfully was a familiar gesture, his tone was far from it. Giselle cautiously watched his mood and responded.

"I never said I wanted to go this far." "Then are you saying you hated it?" "It felt good, but."

Her words were carefully chosen, both to reflect her feelings and to avoid pushing him further. The truth was, while the process had been uncomfortable and frightening, the culmination was always blissful. But she couldn't ignore the discomfort.

"It was uncomfortable and scary."

Edwin tilted his head, an inquiring look on his face. He didn't seem angry, just genuinely curious.

"If that's what you feel, tell me why."

Giselle gathered her courage and spoke honestly, yet cautiously.

"It felt good, but I was still uncomfortable and scared. because of you." "What did I do?"

His tone wasn't accusatory; he seemed to genuinely want to understand. Encouraged, Giselle pressed on.

"You didn't feel familiar. You didn't feel. you." "Well, of course. You don't truly know the man in me."

The statement seemed logical, but Giselle knew it wasn't entirely accurate. It wasn't just about seeing a different side of him. It was deeper than that.

"Just because it's your manly side doesn't mean you're a completely different person, does it?" "A different person?"

Edwin was a decent person. Since he utterly detested the history of the Eccleston men, he would naturally detest taking a girl he had raised since childhood as a mistress. But he seemed to have no qualms about taking her as a lover. It was strange.

Besides, hadn't he just seen Giselle as a child just a few hours ago? It was strange that he didn't seem uncomfortable at all about having sex with that child.

If Giselle were to be exact, it was strange that he waited for the day to make her a woman, that he kissed her, and waited to tell her that he loved Giselle.

It's unlike him.

She had been feeling uneasy the entire time, but whenever that happened, she'd become completely engrossed in the Edwin who was exploring her body, and she'd forget about it. Only now that he paused for a moment was Giselle able to think clearly.

"How different?"

But Giselle couldn't say that all these actions were like someone else's. It wasn't as if her desire to become his lover was removed right after she had finally achieved it.

"You said something you never said before."

At least Giselle could say this honestly.

"What did I say?" "You said it while looking between my legs."

Giselle didn't dare say it again.

"Now let's see how beautiful the flower between your legs is."

When Edwin said this while opening Giselle's legs, she was so surprised she thought she was dreaming for a moment.

Edwin made vulgar, dirty jokes that only street gangsters in a red-light district would make.

And he didn't stop there. He looked between Giselle's legs as if it were an object and truly acted like he was evaluating her. She felt miserable, like a prostitute, but also a tool for sex.

"Oh. So my puppy got hurt? I'm sorry."

He apologized and kissed Giselle, saying he must have unknowingly picked up the dirty language of men while in the military. The only thing she could smell strongly was the mint from the excited breath spilling onto her.

'If he's drunk, he might do something unseemly.'

But he didn't even touch the champagne. Giselle couldn't smell alcohol on his breath when they kissed, so he didn't come drunk. It meant he was doing all these improper actions while sober. That meant.

While momentarily absorbed in the kiss and other thoughts, Edwin's hand trailed her lower abdomen. Giselle again blocked the hand trying to burrow between her legs and pulled away from his lips.

"You've been hiding your desire to spend the night with me. That's also not like Edwin."

Giselle spoke with difficulty, taking care not to sound like she was pointing fingers at him for loving her as a woman. He licked Giselle's exposed neck with his tongue as she turned her head, then grasped her hands covering her chest and pulled them apart, answering.

"Everyone has a face they can't show to others. Isn't that your case too?"

Giselle froze for an instant, as if looking at the ugly demon face she worked so hard to hide.

"Why? Do you dislike the Edwin who does dirty things with you?"

Edwin seemed to have misunderstood Giselle, who didn't respond even when he sucked hard on her nipples.

"I thought you would accept whatever face I showed, but was I wrong?"

Edwin released the hand holding Giselle's wrist and stood up. His expression told her he was disappointed. Giselle quickly got up and tried to grab him.

"I don't hate it. I'm just confused because it was so sudden. Give me time to accept it." "You'll accept it after tonight."

When Edwin reached out to her, Giselle pulled back the hand she had extended to grab him. Her flight didn't stop there. She pushed the mattress with her foot and slowly moved her body towards the headboard of the bed.

Edwin merely watched Giselle as she distanced herself from him. With a strange smile. As if watching a foolish animal struggling to escape despite being trapped.

"Just one more day, just one more day. It's still a long time until my birthday. How about tonight?"

She tried to put him off for now, but Edwin didn't seem to have any intention of yielding to Giselle at all.

"How naïve. You don't know that running away like that only feeds a man's desire further."

He still didn't grab her and merely watched. The moment Giselle, who had nowhere to run, tried to dart to the side and get off the bed, his eyes, as if seeing a puppy do something cute, suddenly changed.

To the eyes of a beast chasing its prey.

Chapter 45.

45
Not only had his gaze changed. Edwin slowly approached Giselle, steadying himself on the bed with his hand. His very appearance also resembled a dangerous beast cautiously closing in on its cunning prey.

"Ah, Sir."

He was clearly angry. Was he being controlled by his instincts?

It's not like him.

The man before her was acting like an animal with only its instincts left, yet he didn't appear vulgar. He didn't act impatiently or rush as he pursued her, but rather closed the distance unhurriedly and elegantly. It was a gesture that showed Edwin was already certain he would succeed in this hunt.

Meanwhile, Giselle had only just reached the edge of the bed. She could have gotten up and jumped off the bed, but she was so overwhelmed by the look directed at her that she couldn't move. Edwin, who had slowly followed Giselle until he was standing, slid his hand toward her ankle and asked in an angry tone.

"Why can't you think it's because of you?" ".Yes?" "Have you never considered that you're the kind of woman who makes me feel like I'm not myself?"

Unable to understand what he meant, Edwin's fingers rapidly began climbing Giselle's calf as she merely blinked in incomprehension.

Giselle thought he would grab her like prey and drag her away. Yet, Edwin clung to Giselle pitifully.

"Giselle, I'm a man too. I didn't want to become the Eccleston male dog. But I ended up loving you Because of that, I've become the very male dog I so hated."

Another kiss landed on her tightly clenched knees. Giselle's heart started trembling again as she looked at the man who bowed his head to her.

Edwin was confessing his love as if he were confessing a sin. He also felt bad about his relationship with Giselle.

"Giselle Bishop, I love you so much."

Although Edwin felt guilty about doing something he shouldn't, he couldn't stop loving her, just like Giselle.

"I love you, Sir, just as much."

If this man had suffered the same agony as her, there was no longer any reason to feel fear or unfamiliarity. Giselle wrapped her arms, which had been tightly clutching her knees, around his neck. Then she kissed him first.

She felt sorry for him. He must have been suffering from a love that went against the beliefs he had held all his life, yet she didn't understand his feelings and suspected his intentions based on his tranquil appearance. It was Edwin's consideration that he didn't show Giselle his agony. Instead, Giselle didn't care and poured salt on his wound.

"Hnn, haa."

It was a kiss that contained the meaning of an apology. However, Edwin must have misinterpreted it as permission, so he quickly lifted Giselle and moved her to the center of the bed.

Both of his hands touched her knees. Giselle strained her knees and turned her head to pull her lips away from his.

"Still?" "."

A weary sigh escaped his lips. She felt bad about continuing to refuse, so she couldn't do it again. However, by merely not opening her legs, Giselle's intentions would have been conveyed sufficiently.

Edwin took one of Giselle's hands that was covering her chest. She wondered what he was going to do, but he took the hand and slid it into his trousers.

Despite it still being concealed in his underwear, Giselle's face turned bright red as she touched Edwin's shaft again. The volume she could feel in her hand was enormous. She couldn't say how long it was, but just the thickness she could feel made Giselle even more afraid to accept Edwin.

"It's been hard since this has been happening."

Edwin rubbed Giselle's hand against his rock-hard cock and let out a yearning groan.

"I think I'm going crazy. This is also because of you, you know?"

Asking him to return to this state was cruel, even for Giselle.

"I'm not just saying this today. Because of you, I developed a desire I didn't know about, I suffered every day. It was more painful than the torture I underwent in the prisoner-of-war camp."

Edwin was tortured? Giselle's heart constricted.

"You even must have appeared in my dreams. I couldn't bear it. But I can't release my desires with you, a little girl."

Still, Giselle, who had expected him to say he endured it until today, was surprised once more by Edwin's confession.

"So I brought a woman." ".What?" "How far will I fall because of you?" "Oh, Sir."

Giselle's voice trembled.

"With that woman"

A strange smile appeared in Edwin's eyes as he looked at Giselle's pondering face. She didn't know what that smile meant. To end this confusion, she had no choice but to ask.

"Did you sleep with that woman?" "Don't worry. I didn't that day."

That day?

"I don't know if I can endure it the next time."

Yes, she was worried that this might mean something like this.

Even more anxiously, Edwin took Giselle's hand out of his trousers and began zipping up.

He might go to that woman.

The reason she believed she could reject Edwin tonight was because she was confident he didn't have another woman. But if he did, it would be another story.

Why are you going to that woman again when I'm here?

If it weren't for tonight, her relationship with Edwin would remain the same.

"Sir."

Giselle grabbed his wrist as he put his belt back on. The puzzled look in his eyes suddenly changed the moment Giselle opened her legs, which she had been keeping closed.

"Are you going to play coy again?"

When Giselle shook her head, Edwin unbuckled his belt again. He got in between Giselle's legs and knelt down.

"That's right."

Edwin began kissing the inside of her thigh. Her breathing was already shaking. The fear she had forgotten for a moment returned to her with the feeling of Edwin touching her, but now that he was between her legs, she couldn't close her eyes again.

"I promised not to hurt you." "Ah, hnng.ahhh"

Edwin stroked between Giselle's legs, rubbing her wetness again, he unzipped his trousers. The member that had been trapped inside his underwear came out.

To think I would see Edwin's cock.

The moment she first saw the copper-colored member with a glossy head, her face turned bright red

That wasn't all?

When Edwin pulled down his underpants and took out the rest he had hidden, she felt all the blood rush out of her body.

The length of the shaft surpassed her hand. Although she had no experience with men, Giselle instinctively knew that this was no ordinary size.

However, she realized that what she should worry about wasn't the length but the thickness, after Edwin started putting a condom on the tip. The length could be solved by inserting only a little bit of the tip, but there was no way to solve the thickness. She now understood why Edwin had gone through all the effort to widen her entrance.

It looked hard, but the elastic latex membrane supported Edwin's thickness without bursting. Giselle had no way of knowing if her slit would hold up just as well. Just imagining something so thick being pushed in between her tight legs made her lower body ache.

"Sir" "No."

Edwin shook his head firmly and aimed his penis at Giselle's vaginal opening.

"That's not."

Giselle knew it was too late to bite. If that was the case, at least

"Do it like you love me." "Love"

His eyebrows furrowed.

"Giselle, we are in love. Haven't you felt my love?" "Ahhh." "Are you made of stone? This is too much."

Edwin joked and stroked Giselle's slit with the tip of his cock. The act of soaking her pussy with his love juice was not at all romantic, but rather obscene.

Women must be specific in their instructions. Giselle recalled the grumbles her mother and the village women had given her when she was young, this time she made a specific request.

"Please kiss me."

The man, who had only been paying attention to the space between Giselle's legs, finally overlapped her body and covered her lips. It was a moment when the wisdom of adults shone through.

While she calmed her fear by receiving Edwin's kiss, the blunt tip of his erect shaft slowly pushed up and down between Giselle's legs. Giselle's chest was also rising and falling heavily along with him.

Then, the moment came when the thick member that had pushed inside, stopped moving. Giselle caught her breath.

Chapter 46.

She didn't close her eyes. She didn't want to miss his appearance, his expression, not a single look in the momentous occasion of her and Edwin becoming one for the first time.

Edwin also looked at Giselle fiercely as if he didn't want to miss anything, but he attached a frivolous label to this precious moment she would never forget.

"Then let's see if this child has become a lady with enough depth to accept me." "Ah!"

The vulgar words were immediately forgotten. Edwin began to enter Giselle. The moment the thick flesh embedded itself between her legs, sparks flew before her eyes, and tears burst out reflexively.

"Ah, Sir, it hurts, it hurts!" "Good girl. Just hold on a little longer."

Edwin broke his promise to make it painless. Yet, he did not stop and tried to push his cock further inside.

The pain worsened as he went down. Desperate, she tried to close her legs, but ended up wrapping them around Edwin's waist. Giselle pushed his chest and pleaded.

"Sir, stop."

Her voice was trembling because it hurt so much.

"The thickest part is stuck at the entrance, that's why it hurts. If I go in further, it won't hurt, so just relax."

He told her to relax, that her walls were tense and that's why the tip of his cock was stuck and wouldn't go in, but she didn't understand anything because she had never used the muscles.

"How, how do I relax?" "I don't know either."

He chuckled. She was asking him since he was a man and it was her first time.

"Anyway, I know you have to open up for it to go in."

The man wide-opened her thighs so he could squeeze his waist between them. At that moment, his shaft suddenly drove in.

"Uf!"

The moment Giselle whimpered and twisted her hips, his tip hit something. Did it reach the very end of her vagina?

"Are you all the way in?"

Edwin laughed again. What was he laughing about?

"See with your own eyes." "I refuse!"

Giselle shook her head, squeezing her eyes shut.

"Aren't you curious about this moving sight of us becoming one? This is disappointing."

As he said that, curiosity overcame shame. Giselle half-lifted her body and looked down between her legs. She saw Edwin and her becoming one. Giselle was astonished.

The pink flesh that looked ready to tear barely clung to the copper shaft. There was red blood on the edge. Edwin wiped it off with a white silk handkerchief.

Giselle knew that a hymen could break and bleed, so she wasn't shocked by the blood.

It was because there was a long shaft bridge between the two lower abdomens, like a steep cliff.

"Sir." "Yes." "You're not going to put in any more, are you?" "But I barely put in the very end."

Giselle flinched and screamed.

"It can't go in any further, ugh!"

Suddenly, the man lifted his waist. At that moment, a little bit of his cock drove inside her.

"See, it's going in." "It can't go all the way in."

Giselle changed "more" to "all" as she saw that there was still a long way to go, even though only the length of his thumb had moved.

"I guess I'll have to do it for you to believe me."

The man wrapped his arms around Giselle's waist as if possessed by a competitive spirit. Giselle pushed away the man who was pulling her, almost dizzy.

"Sir, I think my stomach is full already. It won't work like this." "It will. This isn't a stake." "Honestly, I think it's bigger than a stake."

Edwin grabbed Giselle's trembling butt with one hand and chuckled.

"You're annoying, but it's kind of cute."

.Annoying?

Hearing those words, the strength in the hand pushing his chest disappeared. He laid Giselle, who had gone silent, back down and continued to insert himself.

"Ugh."

Giselle shuddered as she felt the fleshy shaft cutting through her slit and sliding inside. The hot trajectory in her stomach gradually lengthened. There was no hole there to begin with, yet it felt as if he was forcibly cutting through her flesh and pinning her down. Giselle's chest heaved and sank with fear.

It's going in. It's going in. It keeps going in.

Her stomach was already so full that it felt like it would burst, but the insertion wasn't over yet. It became harder and harder to breathe, and she started feeling dizzy. Giselle's blurry eyes were fixed on the face of the man who was invading her.

"Good. Yes, you're sucking me well."

He was looking at Giselle passionately, but for some reason, his eyes felt cold. It must be an illusion. It must be an illusion. Her stomach was full, but her heart was empty because of those eyes.

"Haaa."

Edwin closed his eyes tightly, and his cold eyes disappeared. The insertion abruptly stopped. It hadn't gone all the way in. Edwin gritted his teeth as if holding something back, then let out his breath and groaned as if he couldn't hold on any longer.

"I thought you were a child, but you've grown up. You know how to take my cock too. I raised you well."

He spoke like a back-alley thug again, even chuckling wickedly. Like a completely different person. Giselle's eyes, which had widened in surprise, squeezed shut again.

"Ah!"

Because Edwin had pushed in the last bit of the bottom he had left.

"See. It's all the way in."

His and Giselle's lower abdomens were pressed together.

It was uncomfortable.

The area below her navel where he had penetrated her was sore. The aftershocks of the thrusts gradually subsided as the movement ceased, but the heavy, thick, and long foreign body sensation between her legs did not disappear even after time passed.

It was very uncomfortable.

The foreign body sensation was not only corporal. Her mind also felt uneasy, as if something had been placed wrong.

"Hmph!"

Edwin slowly pulled his waist back. The feeling of a snake slithering out of her stomach gave her goosebumps.

"Ahhh."

Edwin pressed their lower abdomens together again. Although he was entering slowly, it felt different from the first time because he kept pushing inward without stopping. It looked smooth and straight, but the cock felt bumpy. Giselle shrieked every time he pressed hard against her delicate flesh.

"Giselle, look closely. Edwin is having sex with you."

He seemed delighted. He moved his waist again so Giselle could see clearly. His cock, soaked in love juice, slid out of her stomach and then back in again. Giselle became even more terrified when she saw them having sex with her eyes.

Edwin. is having sex with me.

To Giselle, Edwin was like the embodiment of nobility that she couldn't dare to touch or violate. Moreover, if she was a humble orphaned girl he had raised since childhood, he was even more untouchable and inviolable.

The man she had admired so much that she even considered his home sacred was getting excited by rubbing his cock in a woman's hole like any other vulgar man. But even other vulgar men wouldn't do this to the girl they raised.

The love Giselle imagined with Edwin was a pure love that wasn't allowed, where they held hands behind their backs without anyone knowing. It wasn't them being like animals in a bedroom where no one could see them, uncaring. She felt a strong rejection toward this act. Giselle, who was trying to figure out the reason, suddenly realized.

Am I now disappointed in my relationship with him?

Wasn't it enough to be grateful for being loved so much? But the reason she was so ungrateful and disappointed was because she didn't feel loved.

She thought sex would be as romantic and beautiful as the phrase 'making love' with you. So she suppressed her fear and allowed it, but she felt it was an act of excreting his pent-up desires.

"Sir." "Huh?" "Not sex."

She tried to ask if he could phrase it as making love, but she couldn't say it properly. It was because Edwin suddenly grabbed Giselle's shoulders with both hands and began thrusting violently.

Chapter 47.

Squelch squelch.

The thick column of flesh thrust in and out of her crudely. Giselle felt terrified, as if she were about to faint, as the unfamiliar sensations entered violently.

"Ah, Sir, stop, s, no, no! Sob, sob."

A large palm covered half of Giselle's face. Unable to express it with her mouth, Giselle said no with her entire body. She tried to push him away with her hands, but Edwin did not budge an inch. When she tried to escape by moving her legs, Edwin grabbed her ankle and pulled her back.

Thump, thump, thump.

While Giselle struggled in vain, Edwin's waist kept moving. His cock was viciously stabbing into her soft flesh. She was afraid her body would be ruined.

No, it felt like it was already ruined. She felt something flowing when he withdrew. It shouldn't be blood.

If she was so hurt as to be bleeding, Edwin would have let her go. That was the kind of person Giselle knew. He wouldn't have shaken his hips in the first place if she said no.

Then, she had an ominous feeling that Edwin wouldn't let her go even if Giselle got hurt.

"Ugh, hnngg, haaaa."

Even though Giselle shuddered and began to cry, he did not stop.

"Giselle, I love you. Haa, I love you."

Instead, he whispered into Giselle's ear, as if reassuring her, that he loved her. There was still no love in his rough movements. Rather, she felt the emotion that was the furthest away from love.

No. Why would Edwin hate me?

It was clear that her head was damaged before her legs.

Squelch, squelch.

If her head was shaking so violently, it was bound to be damaged. His movement was so intense that Giselle's chest was shaking up and down along with Edwin's waist.

He openly watched the two white fleshy masses shaking with an obscene look that made her blush. Unable to bear it, Giselle wrapped her chest with both arms.

"Hnn."

As soon as she did, Edwin grabbed both of her wrists at once. He quickly lifted them above her head and pressed them down.

Edwin lowered his head to her breasts that were revealed again. Giselle twisted her waist and swung her legs, doing her best not to give up her chest, but it was useless.

"Haaa, hnngghh."

The tip of his tongue never stayed in one place, chasing the trembling nipples and tracing her soft flesh. Her breasts, which had been soft and spongy, soon became wet with saliva.

"Huh!"

Then, at some point, as if the game of tag was over, his lips covered her nipples. With the force of suction, her nipples sank in, and half of her breasts were sucked into his mouth. Her eyes grew dizzy.

Edwin toyed around Giselle's erogenous zone, which had become so sensitive that even breathing hurt. He viciously thrust his tongue down.

Haaa, no, I don't like it!

Each time his tongue strongly struck her nipples, Giselle was overwhelmed by the sensation of having her spine pierced and grew pale.

He was still between her legs. When Edwin started sucking her breasts, his cock seemed to have doubled in size in an instant, and her lower body was rigid.

The sensation of rubbing against the folds of her flesh grew more vivid. She thought she was going to faint.

The moment Edwin bit and sucked, she nearly lost consciousness. Thankfully, he stopped.

"Haa. Giselle, did you feel it?"

He asked, pushing his cock deep into Giselle's pussy.

"Every time I suck you, you return it. You know how to return what you've received. You've grown up now."

The reason she felt Edwin's cock had grown was because she had tightened up.

"Ugh!"

Edwin lowered his head again. This time, the other nipple was sucked inside his mouth. The color that had briefly returned disappeared.

"No! Stop!"

Edwin persistently bit and sucked one of Giselle's sensory points, stimulating it while continuously rubbing her erogenous zones from all sides.

Squeee, squelch, thwack.

Although the wet sound was so obvious, as his member went in and out of her, Giselle could only feel a burning sensation.

"Ugh, uhnn, ah-ah, ahhh!"

Finally, Giselle screamed into Edwin's palm. The sound began to leak through the gap between their flesh. When the scream became louder than the sound of their flesh slamming into each other, Edwin put force into his hand covering Giselle's mouth.

Thump thump thump.

The force striking between her legs also became much more violent. Giselle's suppressed scream also became more intense, but no one could hear it.

"You're very kind."

Edwin praised Giselle, who twisted her body and resisted, for being kind. It was as if he was enjoying Giselle's resistance. The more Giselle hated it, the more excited Edwin seemed to be.

It can't be him. It's like another man is wearing only Edwin's skin.

Tears kept pouring from her eyes wide with fear.

"Hahaha"

Giselle blinked in surprise at the sound of laughter. The moment her vision, which had been darkened by tears, cleared, Giselle confirmed that she hadn't misheard.

Edwin was laughing. Looking at Giselle, who was crying and sobbing, he showed his teeth, vilely.

He wiped Giselle's tears with the thumb of the hand covering her mouth. It didn't feel like he wiped them. He had let out a long sigh of joy while wiping the tears on Giselle's cheek.

"Yes, there it is."

When the tip of his cock struck somewhere in her stomach and Giselle screamed and shuddered, he shook his waist even faster and smiled ecstatically.

"I endured that hell for this moment. It was worth it."

She didn't wonder what he meant when he said that the harsh sex with her was the price he paid for enduring hell. She hadn't even heard it. Giselle was now somewhere else.

In the village landlord's warehouse.

Unable to bear the hunger, she climbed the high wall late at night and hid in the village landlord's warehouse, but young Giselle couldn't steal anything that day. The warehouse was already empty.

She was sweeping the dusty floor with her hands, relying on the moonlight to try and pick up even the smallest spilled grains, when she heard someone outside the warehouse. As soon as she did, the warehouse door, the only way out, burst open.

Five or six black figures came rushing into the warehouse. Giselle quickly hid behind an empty chest. Her heart pounded hard.

Did they know there was a thief and come to catch him?

But the men had already caught another woman.

"Do whatever you want to live." "If I, really, do what you say, you'll let me live, right?" "You talk too much." "Ahh!" "Shut up and spread your legs."

Giselle had to sit up all night and watch the landlord's daughter, the most valuable person in the village, being grabbed by soldiers and gang-raped. It was the first rape she had witnessed, but it would not be the last.

The woman, who was like a bitch in heat, grabbed anyone and shook her hips before the men took off their military uniforms, including Mercia's. There was a reason why Giselle was terrified when she first met Edwin and saw the Allied officer's uniform.

At the time, her will to survive took precedence, so she blindly followed Edwin, but it took a long time for her to stop being afraid of the soldiers in Edwin's unit.

But I thought I would always be safe by his side.

She could see the pervert in the military uniform in him. That man who covered the mouth of a woman who says no, pressing hard, and pushing her waist mercilessly. The man who violently violated her and laughed, overlapped with the soldiers who were raping the woman. It was supposed to be sex done out of love, but it started to feel like violence without love.

Edwin! How could you do this to me?

No. How could I say that to you.?

It's okay. I can do whatever you want, so please let me live. Please let me live.

Please.

I want to live.

The dark bedroom started to look like a warehouse where only moonlight faintly filtered through. Giselle was now lying in the same spot where the landlord's daughter had been and sobbing a plea for her life.

Her body trembled uncontrollably. When the fear went too far, she couldn't even scream.

When Giselle fell silent, the smile disappeared from the face of the man who had been looking down at her. He tilted his head as if puzzled by the sudden cessation of screams and resistance, and then slowly withdrew the hand covering her mouth.

Chapter 48.

"Please save me. Please save me."

Giselle repeated the same plea like a broken record in a voice that had completely lost focus.

"Why are you like this?"

His gaze, which had been watching the woman behaving like a broken doll, turned upward. Towards the air. As if searching through memories.

"Oh."

After finding the reason, he looked at the woman who had lost her mind with concerned eyes and muttered to himself.

"I didn't mean to ruin you like this."

The hands holding her thin wrists let go.

"Please save me." "Giselle, I'm Sir. I'm not like those demons. I won't hurt you. You know that, right?"

The woman did not nod. She just looked at the air with unfocused eyes and shook her head.

"Ha. It's complicated."

He sighed and stopped moving his waist. Still, he embraced her small body that continued to tremble relentlessly.

"I'm sorry. I did it because I liked you too much. I'm sorry."

As he held her, her dazed eyes slowly regained focus. The pleas for her life ceased. The tremors had subsided considerably. This should be enough. He slowly drove his waist between her open legs and whispered into her ear with all the affection he could muster.

"I will do it gently."

No. Please, love me.

Giselle shuddered as she felt his cock cutting its way through her tight flesh and penetrating her. Giselle desperately wrapped her free arms around her Edwin's neck and pulled, desperately pleading.

"Kiss me, kiss me, Sir."

She sucked and swallowed the lips he gave her. Their lips embraced, biting and licking. The two tongues danced together, entangled. Edwin was just as thirsty as she was. Her heart, thirsty for love, became moist.

The lips stuck together like one body gradually parted, and the entangled tongues let go.

"Haa."

Both were breathing heavily.

"Hnn. Sir."

Even as they groped at each other's lips thoughtlessly, Edwin's waist kept moving. The sensation of the fleshy shaft going in and out was still scary, but it was not as terrifying as a moment ago.

"Ah!"

However, her thoughts changed as the blunt head of the cock poked somewhere at the very end of her slit. Lightning struck inside her small body. Her whole body became rigid. She couldn't breathe for a moment as if her pubic bone had been struck.

Edwin watched Giselle with a bewildered gaze as she became unable to receive a kiss. Then.

Thwack.

He lightly struck the tip of her slit.

"Uf!"

At the light bump, Giselle bent over as if she had been hit. One corner of Edwin's mouth tilted up. He looked sinister, but.

"Is this it?" "Oh, n-no, haaa." "Yes."

He pushed the tip into the same spot and twisted his waist to hit it again. He wasn't thrusting roughly, but gently. Giselle's reaction was so intense that her thighs trembled.

"Ah, ahh." "You feel good even though it's your first time." "Sir, stop, I feel weird, stop."

Giselle held back the inexplicable despair that tickled deep within her stomach, her face turned bright red and her toes curled, her knuckles turning white as she clung to Edwin's shirt sleeve. "It's okay. I'm not trying to hurt you. I just want you to feel good. Do you trust me, young lady?" Giselle couldn't open her mouth and barely nodded, feeling like something big would happen if she let go. "So kind." Giselle, who had been closing her eyes tightly and shuddering, suddenly opened her eyes with a sense of emptiness in her stomach. Edwin had suddenly withdrawn. It can't be.

It was just as she had predicted. The pillar of flesh that had been pulled out stabbed into her. Even if she tried to pull it out, her flesh would be helplessly opened due to the force that deeply penetrated.

"Ah, Sir, no, waaa."

The moment her mouth was covered by Edwin's lips, the tip of his thick member throbbed directly and struck her weakest point. She shuddered. Once again, a lightning-like sensation shot through her body.

His shaft withdrew, scraping her internal walls, which were convulsing. After one breath, he struck the same spot again. A tingling sensation ran through her body. Another lightning strike.

Thwack. Swish. Thump. Thump.

As the same gestures were repeated, the intervals became shorter and shorter. From two breaths to one breath, and then half a breath, it was no different from before, pounding and pounding as if to destroy Giselle.

But this time, she didn't recall the horrible memories. Because her mind had stopped.

The scratching on the sheets with her feet, the moans and cries in Edwin's mouth all stopped. It was the moment the overwhelming sexual sensation enveloped Giselle.

An electrifying sensation between her legs. His cock endlessly penetrated her. Then, at some point, Giselle arched her back sharply, as if she had been electrocuted, and the hairs on her body stood up. An explosive pleasure spread through her stiff body.

Pleasure.

It was a sensation that even someone feeling it for the first time couldn't help but label as pleasure.

I guess this is the real climax.

The pleasure she felt through her clitoris was fleeting, but it was so intense that Giselle's eyes darkened and she collapsed. However, after experiencing the climax through network penetration, she realized that the climax she felt stimulating a small bump wasn't that good.

The pleasure was so great that it was ridiculous to compare. It coursed through her whole body. Waves of pleasure drenched her. Giselle willingly immersed herself in that soft pleasure and languidly became intoxicated.

She was glad that she believed Edwin's words and held back her fear. She thought Edwin wanted to go to bed too soon, but if she had learned about this good thing too late, she would have regretted the time they had wasted.

Mental preparation? Giselle thought it was necessary because she didn't know about this pleasure.

Giselle was so intoxicated by the extreme pleasure that she had thoughts that were completely out of her league. She was so immersed in that ecstasy that she didn't even realize that Edwin had already stopped moving his waist. She realized it when the effects of her climax slowly began to fade.

Huh? No!

Giselle desperately clung to the pleasure that was escaping like a receding tide.

"Ugh."

She grabbed Edwin's cock that was still buried deep inside her stomach and twisted her waist.

"Ahh."

She squeezed against the thick shaft like an egg. With a sharp resonance, the thrilling sensation returned.

It felt so good.

This time, she shook her waist and began to squeeze against him.

"Ah.!"

Every time she bumped against it, the hairs on her body stood up. She was afraid to move because of the pleasure, but then she became greedy for the thrill. She felt like she could do it one more time. Giselle, who slowly moved her hips and laughed shyly, suddenly stopped and blushed.

Her eyes met Edwin's, who was looking at her shaking her hips with a dumbfounded expression. It was surprising. Giselle had become a completely different woman after her climax.

How embarrassing.

Giselle slowly lowered her gaze and bit her lip. Even amidst all that, her hips were moving slightly. She couldn't believe she was doing this. In the end, Giselle just laughed heartlessly.

"Ha."

Edwin who was looking at Giselle like this also laughed as if he was dumbfounded.

"Was it that good?"

Giselle covered her flushed face with her hand and nodded slightly.

"Go on."

Giselle did not refuse. Her slow and timid waist movements were reignited. Soon, Giselle's face turned into a frown. It wasn't because of the surging pleasure. It was because she was not satisfied.

There was a limit to lying down and shaking her waist. It was the moment her body could not keep up with her desires and she was getting impatient.

"Help me." "Ah!"

Edwin wrapped one arm around Giselle's waist and lifted her up. The moment she sat on his lap, his cock drove deeply into her pussy.

"Huh!"

Giselle threw her head back and groaned. Now, she was happy with this sharp, invading sensation.

"Hold onto my shoulders and turn your waist."

She did as Edwin told her. Not only was it much easier to move her waist, but the stimulation was on a completely different level than when she was lying down and shaking her waist.

"Ah!"

As the force of the collapse was applied to her weight, every time she connected with the erect pillar of flesh, an incredible pleasure surged. Giselle didn't just push up and down, but also tried to shake back and forth. The power of a climax was tremendous. Now, it didn't matter where or how she rubbed, it was just shattering.

Chapter 49

"Ahh."

As she shook her hips, her breasts were crushed against Edwin's chest, and it was a different kind of stimulation. Even the bitter pain she felt each time her nipples, swollen from so much sucking, brushed against the wool of his vest, was pleasant.

The pleasure coursed up and down her small body. The moment her body collapsed, unable to bear the pressure, Giselle exploded and shot into orgasm.

"Ahh, Sir." "Ugh."

Her entire body was trembling, and her buttocks were moving on their own. After passing the biggest wave of orgasm, Giselle relaxed all her strength and leaned on Edwin's shoulder to enjoy the pleasure. She closed her eyes and gasped, Edwin whispered in her ear.

"Good?" "Good. Ah. so good."

It was even more ecstatic to feel it in Edwin's arms.

"Are you finished?" "Not yet, ugh, I'm on my way."

The man's fingertips gently stroked Giselle's back, which was giving her goosebumps. Despite the gentle touch, Giselle shuddered as if her skin had been pricked. Now, her whole body was sensitive as if it had become an erogenous zone.

The man thus stroked Giselle's skin, assessing the sensitivity, and when the pleasure was about to disappear, he briefly let go.

"Ah!"

Just one more time. Giselle looked at him with the pitiful puppy eyes she had when begging him to play, and pleaded to do it one more time.

"Ah, hmph, ah, ah, huff."

The man lifted her waist again. This time, he did not stop with just once. He was going to keep pushing until he was told to stop, but now there was no way Giselle would say such a thing.

"Ah, Sir, ah, ah, I'm going crazy. It's so, so good."

She almost cried because it was so good.

"You like it too?" ".It's good. More than I thought."

Was it because it was Edwin's first time experiencing this kind of pleasure? His expression was blank, and his eyes were shaking in confusion.

"I'll make it even better for you."

Giselle started shaking her hips again. This time, for Edwin's pleasure.

"Do you like it?"

She naturally began to observe his reaction. His muscles beneath the collar hardened. Do men get tense when they're horny like women? There was only one way to check.

She tightly gripped Edwin's cock with the insides of her clumsy thighs. His throat was shaking as if it was hard for him to swallow.

Edwin responded to her gestures. She smiled unknowingly because she was pleased. Edwin groaned. Even though he had stopped playing with her hips for a moment.

Giselle adjusted her posture and started moving her hips in earnest. The sound of breathing began to shake. Not hers, but Edwin's.

His waist movement had already ceased a long time ago. Besides, no matter how much she moved her waist, his breathing didn't get agitated. So it was clear that the only reason his breathing was shaking now was because of the pleasure Giselle was giving him.

"It feels, haa, good, doesn't it?"

Edwin, who was still staring blankly at Giselle with confused eyes, nodded as if possessed.

"Pretty."

Edwin's thumb touched the corner of Giselle's eyes that curved downward. He had dried the tears that had been forming since she had climaxed.

"Your crying is pretty too."

The abyss-like eyes looked at Giselle as if they wanted to swallow her whole. Now she knew what Edwin had hidden beneath those deep blue waters. A love the world shouldn't know about. Giselle had already voluntarily thrown herself into it.

Let's throw ourselves into each other.

Giselle wrapped Edwin's neck with her arms like Undine dragging her loved one into the water and overlapped their lips. Edwin paused. As if he was surprised by a surprise kiss. It wasn't even their first kiss.

Giselle, who had gently kissed Edwin, looked deep into his still-shaking, deep blue eyes and whispered to his lips.

"I love you too."

At that moment, Edwin laughed. A deep, sarcastic laugh.

"Ah!"

Edwin embraced Giselle, who blinked in confusion. He leaned towards Giselle as if he were collapsing. There was no way Giselle could withstand the weight of the big adult man. Edwin's body covered Giselle, who had been pushed and slumped onto the bed.

"Ah, haaa, nnngh, hnnn." "Ha, ss, haa."

Edwin began to thrust while breathing heavily. Compared to a moment ago, it was unbelievably slow, but it felt much more urgent. However deep they were, his regular hip movements were now chaotic and irregular.

Edwin's eyes looking at her were clouded with fever. He looked like someone who had lost his reason and was drunk on an excitement he couldn't control.

Edwin is drunk on me.

Giselle smiled behind the back of the hand covering her mouth to stop herself from moaning. Edwin pushed her hand away as if annoyed, and then avidly kissed her mouth where a moan was coming out. As if wanting to drink all of Giselle's moans.

Edwin's hand reached out to her arm that was thrown to the side. She thought he would grab her wrist this time too, but his hand went past her wrist and up to Giselle's palm. When it reached the end of the palm, his long fingers dug into the five gaps.

Edwin intertwined his hands with Giselle's. That's it. Giselle realized it at that moment.

This is making love.

To make love, you have to give as well as receive. Giselle also held hands with Edwin and started moving her hips to his rhythm.

"Ah, ah, huff."

Squelch.

"Haa, ah, ah, eung."

Now, without her asking for a kiss, Edwin was the first to kiss her passionately and then kissed her back. Did he finally understand what sharing love was?

As her heart beat faster, the sound of their bodies mixing became much wetter and stickier. Edwin seemed to have perceived Giselle's change.

"Ah."

He groaned in admiration as he moved his hips on top of Giselle. He stopped for a moment and began to move his hips again. Slowly. As if he were caressing her flesh. Edwin was exploring every corner of Giselle's stomach.

"Softer than velvet."

The man who had been savoring Giselle's touch with his eyes closed suddenly let out a small laugh.

"Just stick to me." "It's not something I can do."

But she could do it as she pleased. Giselle squeezed Edwin's cock tightly. Edwin who had been slowly rotating his waist froze. The only thing moving in his frozen body was his chest which was sharply going up and down and the sweat dripping down his neck muscles.

Edwin, who had been frowning as if containing something and closing his eyes, let out a puff of heat after a while.

"Your insides, they are hot. I think I'm going to melt."

He slumped down on top of Giselle as if he were really melting. However, the one who truly melted was Giselle. To Edwin's deep kiss.

After the hot kiss ended, he lifted himself up. Was Edwin hot too? He unbuttoned his shirt further and went at her. He seemed to be in a state of ecstasy.

Giselle soon reached hers. She felt it again at that moment.

The climax is approaching. It's going to be much more intense this time.

Giselle formed tight hands and moaned.

"Ah, Sir, what should I do, eh!" "Are you going to come?"

Edwin asked, panting heavily. Giselle bit her lips and barely nodded.

"Me too."

Edwin squeezed out the words and spurred his hips at full speed.

"Huk.!"

The pleasure that suddenly burst and enveloped her made her come without even moaning. She held onto the base of the cock that was going in and out of her stomach at a terrifying speed. Edwin hugged her tightly.

His body was convulsing like Giselle's. Edwin and Giselle climaxed together.

It was the first experience Giselle had dreamed of.

What should I do? I'm so, so happy.

She wondered if she could ever be this happy. Giselle was so happy it was scary. He was hugging her so tightly that she was suffocating, but she was enjoying this happiness with her body and mind.

A drop of water fell onto the back of Giselle's neck. What is this? Giselle looked up from where she was leaning on Edwin's shoulder and was struck dumb by the unexpected sight.

A single tear was on Edwin's cheek, which was tightly closed.

"Giselle Bishop."

His breathing was trembling as he called Giselle.

"I didn't mean to receive comfort from you this way."

Chapter 50.

Comfort? How good was it? Was a man's orgasm different?

"How was it?"

Giselle asked cautiously when Edwin's breathing began to stabilize. The sound of him swallowing dry saliva reached Giselle's ear, a low voice flowed, resonating in his chest.

"I've never felt so alive since I was born."

Was it that good? Giselle's eyes widened at the answer that far exceeded her expectations.

"I just realized. There is such happiness." "I feel the same way."

Giselle was moved and hugged him even tighter. Edwin's feelings about his first orgasm with her did not end there.

"I feel like I've been compensated for all the torture right now. You made me forget."

She had been worried in a corner of her heart ever since she heard Edwin confess that he had been tortured, so she was so grateful that she could comfort him enough to forget it. How happy Giselle was that she could reciprocate the love she received from her Edwin in this way.

"I always wondered why I was born, why I live like this."

Giselle's eyes widened again. It was the first time she had heard such a confession from her Edwin. She had never imagined it. He was the best person, from his appearance to his lineage, wealth, and honor. But he felt this way too. She couldn't understand it.

Even if she didn't understand, she could still worry. However, her worries were calmed by the words that followed.

"I was born to meet you. It was good to be alive."

Not only were her worries calmed. The anxiety she had always felt towards her Edwin also eased.

Giselle wished that he couldn't live without her, just as she couldn't live without him. However, unlike Giselle, who only had her Edwin, he had a lot, and Giselle was just one of many things. Therefore, she believed her wish would never come true.

'But you were born to meet me.'

A man who had everything but couldn't find a reason to live felt the will to live only from Giselle. The man also became someone who couldn't live without Giselle.

He let out a long sigh as if shedding all the pain of his life and stroked Giselle carefully and softly as if she were a precious treasure.

"What should I do now.?"

Why did he feel lost like a person who had found a reason to live?

"I'll just stay like this for a bit longer."

The man who had been muttering incomprehensible words embraced Giselle as if swallowing her into his arms. Her heart squeezed even tighter. Could he feel her heart rate speeding up more than when she climaxed? Giselle felt her heart was going to burst after hearing an answer that exceeded her expectations.

"Today is the best day of my life."

Until now, the best day of Giselle's life had been the day she met the man. Today was better than that day. Because it was the day she and the man became one heart and body.

"I'm glad I'm alive. I was born to meet you too."

Unaware that she had already been caught, he wiped the long tear streaks on her cheek with the back of his hand and tried to push Giselle away, saying, "It's okay." However, Giselle, still overwhelmed with emotion, did not let go and covered his lips with hers.

After another hot kiss, the man's words changed.

"Do it again." "Okay."

This time was different. He took off all the clothes he had on while they were intertwined and became naked like Giselle.

His bare body was as manly and beautiful as his face. His firm and hot body rubbed against Giselle's, intertwining. She enjoyed the heat of the man she had always longed for with her whole body. Giselle had a feeling she wouldn't be able to live without this feeling anymore.

This time, they climaxed together and came to the end of their second sexual encounter. Even then, the two did not let go of each other's arms for a long time.

The two naked bodies, pressed tightly without a single separation, were soaked in sweat, and no one could tell who owned who. It wasn't unpleasant. Because their hearts were soaked with love.

This was not the only thing different from the beginning.

When they first started making love, Edwin seemed to reign over Giselle, but this time, he seemed to cling to Giselle. Was there something about her body that made him feel this way? Or was it that she was so full of Edwin's love that she had become arrogant?

Giselle slowly raised her head and looked at the man holding her. She thought he was asleep because he wasn't saying a word or moving, but Edwin had his eyes open. He was staring blankly as if he was lost in thought.

"What are you thinking about?"

He answered as if muttering to himself, keeping his gaze on the space instead of Giselle.

"I think I understand why the Eccleston male dogs were crazy about women."

Giselle's cheeks, flushed with heat, turned pale in an instant. Frightened, Giselle hugged him tightly and pleaded.

"No other woman. This is something I only do with me, and only with me. Do you promise me? Promise me, Sir."

Only then did Edwin look at Giselle. His eyes, which didn't show any emotion, gave no sign of what he thought of Giselle's request.

However, Giselle felt ashamed as if she had been reprimanded. She had come back to reality as soon as she made eye contact with Edwin.

"Giselle Bishop, you should know your place."

Having sex with her only meant that even the Duchess should not be allowed entry. It was a shameless and extremely brazen demand.

Whose fault was it that Edwin couldn't be faithful only to Giselle? It was Giselle's fault, who was of low standing.

She didn't want to come across as a troublesome woman who didn't know her place from the first day they met. The moment she opened her mouth to ask him to pretend he hadn't heard her, Edwin briefly kissed her and said—

"I promise you." ".Really?"

In fact, even the empty words were more than enough for Giselle.

"In return, you will be my woman."

How could this be the price? To Giselle, it was such an obvious premise of a relationship that it didn't even need to be said.

"For a lifetime."

Giselle made a firm promise, adding the condition Edwin had omitted.

"I will live as your woman."

It was just as Edwin said, but why? His expression looked bitter. Whether it was a mistake or not, the arm that had been wrapped around Giselle's body came off as if it would never fall again.

"Why are you doing that?" "I have to leave before someone wakes up." "Ah"

Edwin got up and started putting on the clothes he had taken off. Looking at him, who had become a perfectly elegant Duke, Giselle felt vulgar, still naked and sprawled on the bed.

My clothes.

Giselle got up to put on her clothes, but she was embarrassed. All the clothes she had been wearing were lying on the floor in front of the sofa like a sack of trash.

To put them on, she had to go to the sofa naked, and no matter how much she had shown everything to Edwin, she was ashamed to show him how naked she was.

I need to wait until Edwin leaves.

Having no other option, Giselle grabbed the blanket that had been cornered and covered her body.

"Excuse me for a moment."

Edwin reached his hand under the blanket and groped Giselle's butt out of nowhere. No, she had mistakenly thought he was groping her butt. After a moment, he pulled out and was holding a white handkerchief.

When she saw her blood in the middle of it, her face started to burn. Giselle grabbed the sleeve of the man who was folding the dirty handkerchief with care.

"I'll wash it and return it to you." "If someone sees you holding my bloody handkerchief, they'll be suspicious."

The corner of the handkerchief had a monogram embroidered with the man's initials, so they would know who took it, but they wouldn't know how it was spilled.

"They'll think it was a nosebleed or a cut finger." "But how would someone who suspected us and was looking for evidence to come out think? You wouldn't want to give them an excuse and have our relationship end here, would you?"

Giselle's hand holding the sleeve dropped. The man tucked the handkerchief, which he had neatly folded as if new, into his vest pocket and reached for the desk.

"I thought it would be enough, but it wasn't."

He picked up a box of condoms with a small laugh. He had only used two tonight, so there was one left now.

"So much money, but only buying one box."

Edwin disappeared into the bathroom with a grumble of self-contempt. The sound of water flushing was immediately heard. He seemed to be finished using it.

Chapter 51.

Hearing the sound of running water again, I thought he was just washing his hands, but a moment later, the man came out of the bathroom with a wet towel in his hand.

"Wipe yourself." "Ah."

He pulled the blanket away and started wiping Giselle's body with the towel. A Duke tending to someone like this, a service not even a maid would provide.

"I can do it myself." "Stay still." "Ah, Sir." "Does it hurt? It's swollen."

That wasn't the only reason she tried to stop him. Exposing her body, so openly marked by the traces of their intimacy, to him in his now lucid state after the heat had cooled made her want to die of shame. But his hands did not stop. When he lingered unusually on her swollen, raspberry-red nipples, far removed from their usual peach blossom shape, she began to suspect this wasn't mere caring but amusement. When the towel slid down her stomach and ventured between her legs, that suspicion became a certainty.

"Ah, wait, Sir, before anyone wakes up. Ah, you really have to leave."

The movement of the towel made her even wetter. As Giselle became aroused despite herself, her gaze drifted. Unable to restrain herself, she pushed him away again, burying herself in his chest.

"Don't. suck where it hurts. Ah, no licking."

The man, who had been buried in her chest for a good while, inhaled her scent and then let out a sigh.

"I don't want to leave. But I have to, don't I?"

He stood up and went to the sofa. When he returned, his hands were full of evidence from last night's indulgent birthday celebration.

He personally dressed Giselle in her chemise and even her underwear before collecting the almost empty champagne bottle and two glasses. He meticulously erased all evidence of their intimacy and then asked the night's only witness:

"You know we have to keep this a secret, right?" "Of course."

Sadly. But even if their relationship had to remain a secret, being his mistress was enough for her.

"I will remain your secret lover forever. I can take it to the grave."

She thought those words would reassure him, but why did he give such a bittersweet smile?

Edwin leaned towards the bewildered Giselle, leaving a kiss and a new, tender term of endearment, as if to mark the change in their relationship, before saying goodnight.

"Sleep well, beautiful. Until tomorrow."

Beautiful. A new addition to the list of childish pet names like darling, puppy, fairy, and angel. Left alone, Giselle clutched the pillow under the blanket, cheering herself up in silence.

'He loves me! We are lovers now.'

It felt like a dream. If it weren't for the faint trace of his cologne in her hair, or the lingering feeling of his kiss, or the soreness at the tip of her chest and between her legs, she might have believed it was all a fleeting dream.

"Oh no, I think I'm going crazy."

This time, she buried her face in the pillow, muffling her scream, and kicked the innocent blanket. Memories of straddling him, moving wildly while completely naked, flooded her, making her heart pound.

"."

But moments later, tears started to soak the pillowcase. What followed the shame was an unexpected sense of loss.

Her body and heart felt empty. It was strange. She had felt so full, almost breathless, when she was with him.

It's only because he's not here with me now.

Why did she feel this way?

In a corner of her mind, now filled with loss, Giselle noticed another emotion: anxiety.

Was she afraid he would change his mind? Or that their relationship would be discovered?

No, it was neither of those.

Something is wrong.

It wasn't guilt. She had already put that aside after sharing love with him twice. This was more like.

"Something doesn't fit."

It was the feeling of reading a confusing sentence, forced into an incoherent position, leaving an uncomfortable impression.

.Why do I feel this way?

Even after a deep sleep, the strange uneasiness did not leave her. No matter how much she thought about it, she couldn't find a reason.

She could vaguely understand the sense of loss.

This happened to the heroines in novels too.

They often claimed to feel uneasy or melancholic after their first night with the male lead.

It's normal, then.

Not so much understanding it as feeling comforted by the thought that others felt the same way.

"Ah, I'm going to be late."

The minute hand had already passed the number ten. Breakfast was in exactly ten minutes. Abandoning her attempt to adjust the neck scarf in front of the full-length mirror, Giselle hurriedly sat at her dressing table.

"Haa. why do I look so drunk?"

She thought her makeup skills had improved quite a bit, but she couldn't do anything today.

It's because I want to look pretty now.

After adding powder to her cheeks that were already covered in blush, her face looked somewhat presentable.

Then, if I put on lipstick.

What should she put on? Giselle's cheeks, which were lined up in her makeup bag, turned red without any effect from the powder. There was a clear bite mark on the cap of one of the lipsticks.

It was the lipstick Edwin had personally applied to Giselle's lips the night before and erased together. Giselle took it out and stroked the sunken area.

Edwin's bite mark.

Suddenly, the tip of her chest hidden under the bra tickled. Her nipple was still in the shape Edwin had sucked it. Giselle unconsciously shrank, covered her chest, and chuckled while covering her mouth even though no one was watching.

Oh, only 3 minutes left.

She opened the lipstick cap only after checking the clock.

It's too red, but.

Giselle willingly applied the color that didn't suit her to her lips.

You made me a woman.

It was a secret message only the two of them knew.

"Good morning."

Giselle stopped at the morning greeting that reached her as soon as she opened the bedroom door and stepped out.

"Why are you here?"

The man sitting cross-legged on the ottoman in the hallway didn't answer but merely folded the newspaper he was reading.

"You were waiting for me, weren't you?"

He responded only after handing the newspaper to Mr. Loise, who was waiting by his side, and standing up.

"I was standing guard so no one could congratulate you before me."

Giselle couldn't contain her laughter. Edwin narrowed his eyes and looked at her and Loise in turn, asking suspiciously.

"Isn't it true that someone disobeyed my orders and celebrated your birthday?"

He was trying to pretend nothing happened last night in front of his employees, but it was so meaningful that it was hard for her to hold back her laughter.

"No, that's not true, he's the first."

As soon as she answered, Giselle's face turned red. She had also said something meaningful.

It wasn't as easy as she thought to pretend nothing had happened.

In fact, Giselle had been at a loss ever since she met Edwin in the bright light. As soon as she saw Edwin's clean face, she was reminded of the moment last night when he had turned into a beast on top of her.

When Edwin saw Giselle, he must have been reminded of the moment she had been prey underneath him.

"Good."

He buttoned his suit jacket and approached Giselle.

A morning three-piece suit.

It meant that Giselle's birthday was an important event that required formality.

'I was born to meet you.'

It wasn't surprising considering his confession last night, but it was touching. While Giselle struggled to calm her pounding heart, Edwin approached. The tips of their shoes almost touched.

"Happy birthday, Giselle."

Edwin's arms wrapped around her body. Hugs were no longer surprising, but the reason Giselle's heart sank at that moment was because Mr. Loise was watching.

I don't think he has any suspicions, but.

Mr. Loise, who was secretly watching her, was just smiling brightly. Maybe Edwin was also worried. He lightly embraced Giselle, only to immediately pull away and offer his elbow instead.

"Let's have a long congratulatory speech while we toast."

Giselle loosely put her hand on his arm and started walking. All this time, she didn't know where to look. It was natural to look at her feet or straight ahead, but doing so, Edwin's face was caught in the edge of her vision.

Why is he walking while looking at me and not straight ahead?

What was he thinking? Surely he wasn't thinking about last night. Only when Giselle bit her lip unconsciously out of embarrassment did she realize why Edwin was looking at her.

Chapter 52.

"You put on makeup. It's heavier than usual. Are you showing off that you're an adult now?"

Edwin, as expected, understood the meaning of the lipstick.

She had applied it hoping he would notice, but now that he had, she wasn't sure how to feel.

Edwin, as always, maintained an unchanging, casual expression while making such a meaningful comment. Giselle, on the other hand, was unable to conjure a witty reply, nervously fanning her flushed cheeks with a useless gesture.

It seemed she was still a long way from being a true adult.

That morning, breakfast was served on a terrace overlooking a garden in full, glorious bloom. Giselle was easily visible, seated at the round table.

In place of a regular breakfast platter was a magnificent two-tiered cake.

As a farmer's daughter, Giselle had been utterly fascinated by layered cakes. That's why, since her eleventh birthday at Templeton, every one of her cakes had featured two tiers.

In fact, that eleventh birthday was the very first time Giselle had ever received a birthday cake. It was also the first time she had made a wish and blown out candles.

She suddenly recalled the greedy question she'd asked after Edwin explained that the number of candles on the cake increased each year.

"Does that mean the cake will get bigger too?" "What an adorable thought,"

Edwin had said, laughing while gazing affectionately at the young Giselle.

"Anything taller than this, you should save for your wedding day."

.My wedding day?

It was then that a stark realization hit Giselle: there was another price to pay for becoming Edwin's lover.

'So, I'll never receive a cake taller than this.'

"This year, we have prepared a refreshing lemon cake, perfect for a hot summer day," the chef announced.

Giselle tried to shake off her melancholy by focusing on the chef's words.

The cake's design and decoration were fundamentally the same every year. A base of white buttercream covered the cake, piped with sky-blue cream—a tribute to Giselle's eyes. Ruffles and bows, reminiscent of her childish tastes, were drawn in cream, while golden sugar pearls represented her blonde hair.

The difference this year was the addition of lilies and crowns—the symbol of Kingsbridge University—decorating each tier.

"Let's all celebrate the day Miss Bishop graced the world,"

A newly hired young footman even pulled out a guitar to serenade her. While the song was certainly with Edwin's permission, the single red rose he gallantly handed to Giselle afterward clearly was not. Edwin's narrowed eyes instantly confirmed it.

Is he jealous?

For the first time, Giselle's melancholy vanished, and she found herself truly smiling.

"Giselle." "Yes?" "It's time to make your wish." "Oh, right."

She snapped out of her daze and caught Edwin's incredulous stare. His eyes then shot toward the young footman, who now stood at a distance, as if silently questioning him.

'No! It's not what you think! I wasn't distracted by another man. You know you're the only one for me, Edwin!'

She longed to scream it out immediately, but she could only quickly shake her head. Promising herself she would explain later, when they were alone, she clasped her hands together and made her wish.

Please, let me love Edwin for as long as I live.

After carefully spelling it out in her heart, Giselle inhaled as deeply as possible and blew out the candles. All the candles were extinguished to loud applause.

The chef took the cake away to be served as dessert after breakfast.

As the maids hurried to set the table, the head butler retrieved something from beneath a serving cart, wrapped in a napkin.

Champagne?

It was the same bottle Edwin had brought to her room last night. The butler showed the label to Edwin, and after receiving his nod, began pouring into the glasses prepared for Edwin and Giselle.

Giselle only now noticed that the champagne glasses had been sitting on the table all along.

"What's wrong?" Edwin asked from across the table, perhaps noticing her confusion.

"Isn't this what you wanted?"

You know I don't want it now.

She didn't know if this was a facade for the staff or Edwin's playful way of mocking her.

"Isn't it a bit early to drink?" She had to feign ignorance regardless.

"There's no such thing as 'too early' for a toast."

When Edwin raised his glass, bubbles fizzing, Giselle had no choice but to follow his lead. He looked at her with sentimental eyes for a moment before beginning his toast.

"Giselle, congratulations on finally becoming an adult."

A simple, natural statement, yet it made Giselle's face burn crimson. It felt as if he were congratulating her on the way he had made her an adult the night before.

"I know I've said it before, but thank you for growing up strong in both body and mind. Starting today, our legal relationship as guardian and ward ends, but I hope you never forget that the bond we share, deeper and stronger than any law, will always remain."

Sensing the atmosphere was becoming too intense, Edwin playfully added:

"I'll continue to scold you forever, and you'll continue to bite me like a mischievous puppy."

It was such an ordinary analogy, but her face was on fire again. Edwin had said something disturbingly similar the night before while Giselle was clinging tightly to him. Now, even his most innocent words seemed suggestive. She was utterly flustered.

"From now on, you will steer your own life and navigate the world's stormy seas, but never think you are alone. I will always be in the same place, a lighthouse guiding your way."

Fortunately, Giselle's thoughts didn't stray inappropriately during the moving conclusion of his toast.

When the toast ended, their glasses clinked. Edwin brought the glass to his lips, so Giselle, as the main celebrant, could not refuse and took a sip of the bitter, golden liquid.

"How does it taste? Is it good enough to justify sneaking some in the past?"

He was even more teasing today than usual, especially since this time, unlike the night before, he was doing it in front of others.

"It tastes like adulthood," Giselle coolly replied, setting down her glass. It was the same answer she had given last night, though now with an air of practiced innocence. Edwin burst into laughter, as if he had never heard it before. His performance was flawless.

"See? There's a reason I didn't let you drink it then."

Now he was even scolding her for things he hadn't mentioned last night. In front of others, he still treated her like a child who needed proper guidance. Edwin didn't mix honey into her champagne this time either.

"Bring Giselle her usual drink."

The champagne was replaced with a glass of sparkling grape juice.

"At least I don't have to worry about you turning into a drunkard."

After breakfast, they moved inside, where elaborately wrapped presents awaited Giselle in the drawing-room.

"Go ahead, open them."

Giselle prided herself on being an expert in Edwin Eccleston's rules for gift-giving: the smallest box always held the most expensive item.

Following tradition, she started with the largest box. Her confidence wavered when she found it contained not trinkets or toys, but a deed and a set of keys.

"It's a small house on Magnolia Terrace, one block east of Kingsbridge Gate. Perfect for you to live alone."

Edwin's definition of a "small house" turned out to be a three-story property with three bedrooms, separate living rooms, and bathrooms on each floor. While the dense urban location meant sharing walls with neighbors, owning a house in such a city was astronomically expensive. She had heard that professors often rented such homes, but she, a mere student, had become an owner.

"When we return to Richmond, I'll take you to see it. No, wait, it's your house. I'll have to ask you for a visit."

The next box contained another document in Giselle's name: government bonds.

Giselle, who had assumed the house would be the most valuable gift, was dumbfounded. The bond amount was so enormous that she was certain it far exceeded the value of the property, even without knowing the exact figures.

"Sir."

Before she could utter another word in her formal tone, Edwin cut her off.

"I've already paid the gift tax. If you try to give it back, you'll just have to pay the tax again. That would only fatten the taxman's pockets. So, keep it."

Chapter 53.

"I have to pay tax again, even to return it?"

Giselle didn't know much about government bonds or gift taxes, but if Edwin was correct, it seemed like a complete waste of money. Accepting it gracefully, without unnecessary obstinance, seemed like the most sensible course of action.

'I feel like I've been completely outmatched by him.'

The next box also contained keys and documents. This time, however.

"A car?"

It was as unexpected as the government bonds.

"I decided to get you one after seeing you take a taxi home alone late at night. It's in Richmond, parked in the garage of your house on Magnolia Terrace."

She could see what kind of car it was in the catalogue included with the registration papers, which were in her name. It was a brand-new, five-seater convertible sedan.

"Wow, it's beautiful! What color is it?" "The dealer said women usually prefer red."

Edwin trailed off, looking pointedly at her lips.

"So you chose red?" "Er. no. I assumed that wasn't your style and went for cream. But if you prefer red, I can change it." "No, you're right. I like cream better."

The red lipstick was something she wore only for him. The thought that her lover knew her preferences so well made her heart quicken.

"Oh? A wristwatch."

The next gift made her heart beat even faster.

"Time management is important for adults," he said, probably as an excuse for the maid who was tidying the wrapping to hear.

The watch, coincidentally, was the female version of the one Edwin always wore.

Is it a substitute for a ring?

Since they couldn't wear matching rings, perhaps sharing watches was his way of symbolizing their bond. Or maybe she was overthinking it.

In any case, having something to share with him, especially something as symbolic as a watch, was deeply meaningful. Giselle took the watch out of the box and immediately clasped it onto her left wrist.

"We'll need to adjust the length."

As Edwin measured how much the strap needed to be shortened, his gaze lingered on her. Only then did Giselle look away from the watch and meet his eyes.

".Yes?" "Do you like it that much?" "Of course."

He was asking because she couldn't hide her smile, even though the answer should have been obvious. Edwin was surprisingly poor at reading a woman's heart.

"I thought this one would be your favorite, but I guess I was wrong."

The next gift was in an elongated box, and Giselle already had a good idea of what it was—he had hinted at it last night.

A fountain pen.

Like the sedan, its body was cream-colored, with gold trim around the clip and edges. The tip of the clip was set with an aquamarine stone the same color as Giselle's eyes. It was far too luxurious to use for idly scribbling notes during boring lectures.

"Giselle Bishop,"

Edwin rotated the body of the pen to show her name engraved in elegant script.

"Now that you're an adult, you'll have many documents to sign. From now on, use this for your signatures. You can also use it to write letters that make men cry."

His mischievous humor spared no one, not even himself.

"But you can't use it for anything written with tears," he added sternly.

He took the pen out of its velvet case and placed it in her hand. She uncapped it and held it, feeling its perfect weight, smooth texture, and balanced grip. It felt like it already belonged in her hand.

Had he put a lot of thought into this gift? His gaze, warm and melting, suggested so.

"It's beautiful. This suits a lady much better than some old black relic." "It is beautiful to me, too. I love it."

Even if her pen wasn't the same decades-old model as his, it no longer mattered. She had let go of her lingering thoughts about that pen after last night.

'Because now I have him.'

After unwrapping all ten gifts, Edwin asked:

"Which is your favorite? The watch?" "You."

Edwin rested his long fingers against his temple, tilting his head slightly as he looked intently at Giselle. One eyebrow arched in an expression of mild curiosity. Even in such an ordinary gesture, he exuded a natural elegance and composure, the mark of a true gentleman.

But that wasn't all. He was also the most eligible bachelor on the continent, coveted by even the most unattainable debutantes. Despite his rare public appearances, his name frequently ranked among the most popular stars in women's magazine polls.

And yet, Edwin Eccleston was hers.

She was the only woman in his life.

Of all the extravagant gifts she had received from him, this one was by far the most undeserved. But that didn't mean she intended to decline it out of false modesty.

This is my place.

Being his lover didn't just mean satisfying a long-unrequited crush.

It meant she was no longer a "spoiled puppy" or a "leech." She now had her own place beside him, as an adult.

"Me?" Edwin tilted his head further, feigning confusion. As if he didn't already know.

"To me, you are the best gift of my life."

A soft smile curved his lips, and his eyes filled with pure joy.

"They say repeating oneself is the definition of an old man, but if that is the price of aging, then I'll happily repeat it."

He reached out, taking Giselle's face between his hands.

"You are the same for me. Meeting you was the greatest fortune of my life."

He cupped her cheek tenderly, his fingers brushing her skin.

"My lucky fairy. No, now that you've grown up, should I rather say my goddess of fortune?"

Leaning into the warmth of his hand, Giselle sighed softly, regretfully. If they weren't being watched, she would have kissed him right there.

When the official celebration ended, Giselle returned to her room to find a mountain of gift boxes piled high on the table.

These were all presents and congratulatory cards sent by her former Fullerton classmates to Templeton. Back in her school days, things hadn't been this way. Only a handful of students had sent her gifts, and only a few more had sent cards—the generic, obligatory ones everyone received.

But now there were more than thirty, by rough count. Some were even from third- or fourth-year students she barely knew, their wrapping boasting family crests or ribbons with their surnames. The intention behind these gifts was all too obvious.

They wanted to catch Edwin's attention.

'How pathetic. That will never happen.'

Mrs. Sanders, who had been monitoring the influx of gifts from the start, had already asked Giselle what to do with them.

"Please, just tell the Duke that I have received many gifts, and make sure none of them reach his sight."

She had made that request in advance.

'All this does is create more work for me.'

It was good etiquette to open all the gifts and send thank-you notes in return. Contemplating the enormous pile, Giselle let out a weary sigh. Just then, Mrs. Sanders entered the room and made a suggestion.

"If you don't mind, Miss, I could ask the maids to carefully catalogue the gifts and compile a list of senders for you." "That would be incredibly helpful. Thank you."

But Mrs. Sanders didn't stop there.

"I will also modify some of the response templates we use for the estate's correspondence and show them to you. You may choose one, and we will have the corresponding cards printed. Then you will only need to sign them."

Giselle was surprised. She wasn't even the lady of the estate, yet they were willing to take care of such tedious tasks on her behalf.

"I am grateful, but I feel guilty for burdening you all with my responsibilities," she said hesitantly, trying to politely decline.

Mrs. Sanders, however, smiled warmly and insisted.

"The Duke wouldn't want you to spend your special time at Templeton locked in your room writing cards all day. And frankly, neither would I."

Ah, it is for Edwin's sake, not mine. If it was for him, accepting the offer would not be impolite.

"Then I will gratefully accept your help, Mrs. Sanders."

Before handing the pile of gifts to the maids, Giselle pulled one box from the stack.

"I will take care of this one myself."

It was from Elena. Giselle planned to write her letter by hand.

'Too bad I can't tell her what I really want to say.'

She carried the gift box to the sofa where she and Edwin had shared their first kiss, only for Mrs. Sanders to follow her, pointing to a large box on the coffee table.
Chapter 54.

"The staff at Templeton have prepared a small gift to celebrate Miss Bishop's birthday."

Giselle opened the box, which the housekeeper had titled "Starter Kit for a Young Lady Living Alone."

Inside she found: A tea set for four, complete with cups and a teapot. A leather keychain engraved with her initials. A first-aid kit with basic medications and emergency supplies. A handmade quilt sewn by the maids, featuring the four seasons of Templeton.

These were practical items, too trivial for Edwin to have thought of, but exactly what experienced maids, who had raised children to adulthood, would deem essential.

The senior maids at Templeton had always been like this. They had stepped in to teach Giselle the lessons a mother would impart and to care for her in ways Edwin could not. Without their guidance, she wouldn't have navigated the challenges of a twelve-year-old, from puberty to her first menstrual cycle, so easily.

When she entered boarding school, they had sent her a similar gift under the name, 'Starter Kit for a Young Lady Beginning Dorm Life.'

Giselle picked up the new quilt, but paused when she saw a thick, hardcover notebook nestled within its folds.

"There's one more gift this time," she murmured.

She set the quilt aside and picked up the notebook. The title on the cover was unusually long:

'Recipes. and Secret Tips for Miss Bishop, Who Has Just Begun Adulthood'

The pages were filled with recipes: comforting beef stew, the softest roast beef in the world, moist onion quiche, soufflés that looked like clouds, and autumn-flavored pumpkin cookies.

Every recipe was one of Giselle's childhood favorites at Templeton. The descriptions accompanying their names were phrases she had casually uttered as a child to Edwin or the cooks.

They remembered all that.

The kitchen staff had created a personalized cookbook so she could revisit those flavors whenever she wished. But their care didn't end there.

The notebook contained life advice: how to choose fresh ingredients, pay utility bills, keep flowers fresh longer, cope with heartbreak, handle fierce hangovers, and even recite poetry to alleviate loneliness.

The staff had filled every corner of the notebook with their wisdom and advice for Giselle. Overwhelmed, she felt tears welling up, but quickly wiped them away, fearful of smudging such a precious gift.

"Please convey my thanks to everyone," she said, pausing.

"No, I should go and thank them myself."

The neat handwriting belonged to Mrs. Sanders, who had painstakingly transcribed all the tips.

"Thank you to you too, Mrs. Sanders. I owe you so much."

For the first time since she started living at Templeton, Giselle hugged Mrs. Sanders. Despite her typically strict demeanor, Mrs. Sanders's hands were soft as she comforted Giselle.

"You have been through a lot, Miss Bishop." "I wouldn't say that." "Miss Bishop is always clever enough to pretend not to notice things. It is both admirable and lamentable to see such humility in someone so young."

Mrs. Sanders had seen through everything—how Giselle, a perpetual guest without a permanent place to call her own, had lived cautiously for Edwin's sake, pretending not to see or know certain things.

"If anything, I am indebted to the young Miss Bishop. If she hadn't been as intelligent and discerning as she is now. Just thinking about it gives me a headache."

Giselle suddenly realized something: Mrs. Sanders's earlier offer to take care of the thank-you cards and gifts hadn't just been kindness—it had been a test.

'If I had taken it for granted like a lady of the house, she would have grown wary of me.'

Although she had unknowingly passed the test, Mrs. Sanders was still not entirely reassured. Her affectionate farewell doubled as a sharp warning: Stay in your place.

Why? Because I've grown up?

Mrs. Sanders pitied her for being a motherless child, but she valued her for performing her role well. Giselle's maturity had ensured she remained an asset, not a threat.

Giselle had long sensed it: Mrs. Sanders viewed her as the Duke's little pet.

She didn't know if the housekeeper had subtly imposed that role on her, or if Giselle herself, driven by survival instincts, had willingly taken it on.

The moment she was aware of it, Giselle had developed a sort of duty, as if it were her responsibility to manage Edwin's mood. Mrs. Sanders admired her for it. As an orphan, Giselle had always craved the approval of adults.

'Back then, I was content with her recognition and kept to my place. But now they worry that I might crave something more, that I might aspire to a different position.'

They feared that the child who once danced on the Duke's knees would become a woman who swayed her hips on them.

Although Mrs. Sanders came from a family of servants who had served the Eccleston dukedom for generations and was the head of Templeton, the mansion symbolizing the family, she technically had no right to meddle so deeply in Edwin's private life.

Therefore, warning Giselle, who wasn't even her subordinate, was an overreach of authority. But perhaps Giselle, after spending four years in this house, had become akin to Mrs. Sanders. She felt the housekeeper's actions were understandable.

The Eccleston hound.

If the muddy water spilled outside, the inside was already drowning in filth. Mrs. Sanders must have suffered watching two generations, both the previous and the current Duke, wallow in that mire. Now, she was probably praying that the current Edwin's seemingly pure waters would remain untainted forever.

Giselle hadn't immersed herself in that muck, but she had witnessed it. Whenever the former Duke stayed at Templeton, her peaceful haven transformed into a battleground of chaos and commotion. Those moments had left her anxious and deeply unsettled. Once, she had even said something outrageous to Edwin.

'When is your brother leaving, Sir?'

The audacity of an orphan, living as a guest, to demand the eviction of the mansion's legitimate owner. And she had meant it.

The staff had secretly told her that cases of maids or governesses succumbing to the Duke's advances, or worse, seducing him themselves and becoming mistresses, were common.

This was why one of the housekeeper's main duties was to keep the lower staff in line. Long-time female employees held deep hatred for former colleagues who had forgotten their place, disrupted the household's function, and tarnished its reputation by becoming lovers.

Will they despise me too?

If her relationship with Edwin were discovered, would everyone turn their backs on her? Would they retract all their kindness and goodwill, looking at her with disappointment? The mere thought chilled her to the bone.

'I am not like the others. I will not overstep or cause trouble.'

But even being discovered would mean that the pure water had been stained.

'If my actions led to Edwin being labeled the Eccleston hound, would he end this immoral relationship?'

Her heart hammered furiously, but she couldn't let Mrs. Sanders notice. Yet, if she distanced herself too much, her pale complexion might give her away.

"Miss Bishop." "I hope you continue on the right path and become a lady the Duke can proudly show off to anyone."

What she truly meant was this: Don't become the one blemish on the Duke's pure reputation.

'Let that just be a warning born of her worry about me aging,' Giselle anxiously thought.

Her gaze drifted to the bed behind Mrs. Sanders's shoulder. The maids had tidied it carefully, but Giselle couldn't help but imagine the worst.

'Surely she didn't find proof that Edwin and I.'

There had been signs of their night together: dry champagne marks on the table and a strand of black hair. But she had wiped the champagne stains, swept all the hairs off the bed, and shaken the sheets three times. If any were left on the floor, no one would suspect—they were definitely not Edwin's.

She was confident she had eliminated all evidence. Had she overlooked something?

"Hello. Are you busy? I've come to personally thank you for the gift."

Making rounds through the staff quarters, Giselle greeted everyone, including the maids who had cleaned her room.

"Oh, how kind of you to come all this way." "Happy Birthday, Miss Bishop."

Their attitudes toward her were as warm and respectful as ever.

'So, it wasn't discovered?'

Or perhaps the maids were excellent at pretending.

My head hurts.

Pressing her throbbing temples, Giselle headed from the servants' hall toward the grand parlor on the first floor.

"Miss Bishop!"

A young male worker burst through a side door at the end of the corridor, his face lighting up as soon as he saw her.

Although she recognized him as someone who worked in the garage, they had never spoken before. What could he want?
Chapter 55.

"What's wrong?" "The Duke is looking for you."

Edwin had sent one of the garage workers, not one of the estate servants, to call for her?

"Where is the Duke?" "His Excellency has asked for Miss Bishop to come to the South Garden."

The garden?

Without wasting time, Giselle crossed the foyer and hurried out the door onto the south terrace. Beyond the white terrace and the grand stairs extending to the sides, a beautiful garden of low boxwoods and colorful flowers formed intricate patterns across a long expanse.

Edwin was standing near the garden entrance, his back to Giselle, leaning against something.

"A car?"

In the center of the main path was a silver two-seater sedan.

"Could it be.?"

Giselle quickly crossed the terrace, ran down the stairs, and called out loudly.

"Are you planning to teach me how to drive?"

Edwin turned toward her, his expression as somber as a defeated soldier, and nodded. It seemed Giselle's persistence had won the battle.

"No." "Why not?"

After revealing all her gifts, Giselle and Edwin had briefly discussed who would drive her first car.

Edwin, believing it was customary to send a servant along with a house gift, had intended to send a chauffeur with the car.

But Giselle had insisted she wanted to learn to drive herself.

"Why? Are you worried the chauffeur will report your late home arrival times to me?" "Do you really plan to send a chauffeur with me?" "It won't just be to report to me, but also to protect you."

At that moment, Giselle realized that Edwin's desire to know her schedule was no longer just paternal meddling—it had become an obsession with her, his woman.

However, the idea of a chauffeur was incredibly inconvenient. Whenever she stayed late studying at the library or went out with friends, knowing someone was waiting for her would force her to cut her time short. She suspected Edwin might even be counting on this.

"You don't know how to drive." "You can teach me."

The discussion ended there, with Giselle getting up to go to her room. In the meantime, Edwin had gone to the garage and selected a car suitable for her driving lessons. Giselle ran towards him, and as she got closer, she noticed his face shift from eager to confused as she began looking around.

"Here?"

The gravel-lined garden path was wide enough for a car, but why had he chosen the garden instead of the estate's numerous roads?

"It's a good practice field."

The garden path, lined with low boxwoods, stretched in straight lines, S-curves, and circles, following the designs of the flowerbeds.

"And this is the only place where, no matter where you crash, you won't get hurt."

The garden only contained small flower bushes and boxwoods, with no large trees or columns to collide with.

"Get in the driver's seat."

Edwin extended the key, which was still looped around his finger. Giselle eagerly took it and slid into the driver's seat. After glancing at the dashboard, she inserted the key into the slot below the instrument panel.

"Don't turn it yet," Edwin warned as he squeezed into the passenger seat. His long legs were cramped in the small space, making him look uncomfortable as he hunched over to fit. The car was spacious for Giselle, but tight for him, his head nearly touching the roof.

"Why did you choose such a small car?" "Today, I just want you to easily learn the basics,"

he said, but Giselle ended up listening to a detailed 40-minute explanation of the car's structure, its basic operation, and things to pay attention to before she was allowed to release the handbrake. Once she followed the instructions, the car began to roll slowly.

"Now, slowly lift your foot off the clutch."

Boom!

"I told you slowly." "Ah, ha, ha."

After stalling the engine right as they started, Giselle managed to make a few more sputtering noises, but she eventually got the hang of it and was able to drive without stalling the car.

Edwin started by explaining how to shift gears and turn the steering wheel, but first and foremost, he delivered a terrifying warning.

"Remember, even if you crash, you won't get hurt, but the gardeners will be heartbroken."

From that moment on, Giselle's smile vanished. The parterre garden, with its hydrangeas, roses, and lavender, was full of delicate flowers and meticulously trimmed boxwoods, forming intricate designs. This garden was a source of pride for the Templeton Estate gardeners.

Tension gripped her body as she drove the car, carefully following Edwin's instructions. But there were times when her synchronization failed.

"Ah!"

The car lurched.

Several times she came dangerously close to crashing into the flowerbeds.

"At that moment, you were about three seconds away from making old Mr. Coleman, who has nurtured this garden like his own son, cry."

Every time she faltered, Edwin kindly used the name of Mr. Coleman, the oldest and most feared gardener, as an example.

"Think of the last patch of lavender as the crosswalk. Stop the car before you reach it." "." "Brake gently." "." "Gently."

Screech.

She braked too late. As the front of the car seemed about to pass the last patch of lavender, Giselle's heart raced, and she slammed on the brake.

Boom!

The car came to a sudden stop, and her body lurched forward. In that moment, Edwin's hand shot out in front of her face, preventing her from hitting her head on the steering wheel.

"Giselle Bishop, which part of the word 'gently' did you not understand?" ".I'm sorry." "I told you to keep your hands at ten and two." "Yes."

She was scolded for gripping the steering wheel too tightly, her hands stiff with nerves. From then on, every mistake Giselle made was met with a barrage of sharp reprimands from Edwin.

"If this were a road, you would have killed three people. One of them would have been you."

His lecture, delivered with military precision, almost sounded like a drill sergeant's.

"I should have asked for a different driving instructor."

Giselle's biggest mistake that day was asking Edwin to teach her to drive. She had forgotten that whenever he taught anything, he turned into a soldier.

"Grab my shoulder and try moving your hips."

Last night, when he taught her how to move her hips, he had been gentle.

I can't imagine him teaching sex like a drill sergeant.

Suddenly, she couldn't help but imagine Edwin shouting orders like a military instructor: "Hips up! Hips down!" as he taught her to move her hips.

"Pfft." "Are you laughing?" "Ah." "Is killing three people funny?" "No." "Giselle Bishop, do you think driving is a joke?" "No, Colonel! I will correct myself, Colonel!"

She responded as if she were a nervous recruit in front of a superior, and Edwin seemed momentarily taken aback. Then he smiled shyly and affectionately patted Giselle's head.

"My love, don't use that tone with me, even if you're joking. Understood?"

Edwin was the type of person who didn't care what Giselle became, as long as she didn't become a soldier. He probably didn't like hearing military-style discourse.

"Very well. Now, how about we try parking?"

Despite his stern approach, Edwin's attitude relaxed after that shock therapy. Giselle, however, remained on high alert, and thanks to that, she managed to finish her first driving lesson without upsetting Mr. Coleman.

She could only remove her hands from the steering wheel after driving halfway across the estate, through the South Garden, and into the garage.

"Phew. I survived."

The Giselle who had excitedly gotten into the car was no longer there. In those two hours, she had been so drilled that getting out of the car felt like the freedom a prisoner might feel after being released.

"I'm so tense my whole body hurts."

As she walked toward the mansion, under the shade of the cherry trees, Giselle massaged her stiff shoulders with her fists. Edwin, who had been brushing the hair from his face, laughed softly.

"My love."

Just as she was about to scold him for laughing after exhausting her, two large hands rested on her shoulders.

His hands touched the bare skin exposed above her neckline. Giselle froze, startled.

"You've gone rigid."

His hands began to gently massage the spot where her neck and shoulders met, just as he had massaged lower down last night. Each time his fingers moved, the sensitive tips of her breasts, still tender in her bra, tingled. Her face flushed with heat.

"Relax."

But with every touch, memories of the night before rushed back, making it impossible for her to relax.
Chapter 56.
When his thumb grazed her shoulder blades, Giselle felt a shiver. The slight friction of his touch through the thin fabric was enough to make her tremble.

"Why?"

The fingers still gripping her shoulders caught the tremor. No matter how close they were, even after sharing their deepest secrets, she couldn't admit to having felt something indecent in broad daylight.

"It's. ticklish."

A low chuckle escaped from above her head before fading. Was he deliberately teasing her, knowing exactly what was running through her mind?

"Straighten your shoulders."

Completely oblivious to her hesitation because of her chest, his hands gripped her shoulders and pulled them apart.

His firm fingers pressed into the space between her shoulder blades, gliding slowly along the contours of her bones. The gentle pressure eased the tension in her muscles. However, the peaks of her chest tightened even further at the friction coming from behind.

"Ah"

When his thumb dug deeper into the area behind her shoulder blade, Giselle involuntarily shuddered and let out a soft sound, quickly biting her lower lip.

"Did that hurt?" "No, it didn't hurt."

She wished he would stop. Stop saying or doing things that brought last night back to her mind in broad daylight. She knew he wasn't teasing her on purpose, but she couldn't help but feel flustered, blaming him for her own reaction.

Or maybe. maybe he really was teasing her.

"What is this?"

As he continued to massage her shoulder and neck, his fingers hooked onto the scarf around her neck and tugged it down. The mark she had desperately tried to conceal the night before was now exposed.

"Did a bug bite you?"

'You bit me,' she thought, glaring at him as she pulled the scarf back up and hurried away, almost running.

"What's wrong?" "You're mean!" "I'm not. I was just curious, since I have the same marks."

In just two steps, he caught up to her. Pressing a finger against his shirt collar, he gestured as if to show her the skin underneath. Giselle didn't need to look to know exactly what condition it was in.

"What kind of bug could that have been?"

Me.

Yesterday, while clinging to him, unable to resist the overwhelming sensations, she had left those marks on his shoulder.

Did he expect her to confess such an embarrassing truth? Her lips tightly sealed, Giselle kept walking, refusing to look back despite feeling his perplexed gaze.

"My puppy, why are you sulking all of a sudden?"

Giselle winced at his words, but she didn't stop. She only became paralyzed when he reached out and took her hand in his. His unexpected action didn't end there.

He leaned in and brought his face close to hers.

Her reflexes betrayed her, and she instinctively took a step back, only to immediately regret it.

'Idiot. He was probably going to kiss you.'

Realizing this, she stopped moving and waited quietly, determined not to avoid it anymore. But instead of leaning in, he just looked her in the eye, as if trying to gauge her mood.

"Are you angry because of me?" "No."

His usually smooth brow furrowed slightly, and he tilted his head, the tension in his neck making his posture more rigid. It was as if he didn't believe her.

"I really am not."

It was true that Edwin's playful intrusiveness had left Giselle feeling uneasy since the night before. However, her cloudy mood always cleared in an instant in front of that surprisingly handsome face.

But it wasn't just his impeccable features. No, it was because she could see a mark on that seemingly untouchable, perfect figure—one that only she could leave behind.

Edwin wasn't one to worry about others. He didn't care what people thought of him, and even if his actions were considerate, his gaze always remained distant, devoid of warmth.

Yet, he looked at Giselle differently. Even now, his eyes searched hers anxiously, wondering if she was angry because of him. In that gaze, she could see the same man who had been so desperate for her the night before.

She was the only one who could elicit such changes in him.

Her eyes fixed on his lips, which looked redder than usual.

'It must be because of how much we kissed last night.'

Her own lips still tingled, sensitive from the endless kissing. They craved to find their match again.

But, cruelly, Edwin showed no sign of wanting another kiss.

'If he won't do it, I'll have to make the first move.'

Giselle quickly glanced around. There was no one in sight, only the leafy cherry trees and the soft waves of green grass swaying in the breeze.

Determined, she refocused on Edwin. His hair, dark and slightly unruly, swayed in the wind, tickling his sharp nose.

'It must bother him. But maybe he doesn't notice because he's so focused on me.'

She lifted the hand he had just released and placed it between their faces. If he didn't recoil when she brushed his hair away, she planned to grab the back of his neck and pull him in for a kiss.

But as soon as her hand reached his hair, Edwin straightened his back and pulled away. He ran a hand through his hair himself, pushing it back.

"I believe you when you say it's nothing, but." "Even after four years, I still don't understand how girls think."

Giselle thought he was the only one impossible to understand. While she stood there, bewildered, Edwin reached into the inner pocket of the jacket draped over his arm. When his hand reappeared, it held a small tin.

She immediately thought of something they had nearly run out of the night before, and her face became alarmed. But it was impossible for Edwin to bring that here.

The soft rattle of the tin opening brought her back to her senses. He pulled out two mint candies and silently asked if she wanted one. Despite her mind still being in disarray, habit took over, and she opened her mouth without thinking.

His hand approached, but stopped just short of dropping the candy into her mouth, his fingers not quite touching her lips.

The sharp, refreshing taste of mint filled her mouth, tingling her tongue. It was almost painful, but Giselle couldn't think of anything else; she was too focused on Edwin.

He popped the other candy into his mouth, and as he parted his lips, Giselle could see his wet tongue rolling the small candy around.

Her mind was flooded with memories of what that soft tongue had felt like the night before. Her entire body, now accustomed to the sensations it knew, burned with the desire to feel those same pleasures again.

Even a kiss would quell the storm of yearning within her.

But Edwin kept walking toward the mansion, with no intention of stopping. The end of the cherry-tree-lined path was in sight. As soon as they passed it, she knew any chance of a kiss would vanish.

'Why won't he kiss me?'

Her mood, which had been slightly stirred like a shallow puddle, grew murkier. It wasn't what Edwin had done last night that had her so upset today, but how he was acting now.

'Why are you acting like nothing happened?'

It made sense to act that way in front of others. But why was he treating her as if nothing happened even when they were alone?

Even earlier, during the driving lesson, she had thought he might use it as an excuse to spend time alone with her. But Edwin had been all seriousness, doing nothing but teaching her to drive. The only time he touched her was to correct her grip when she had fumbled the gear stick.

Driving was not a game, so perhaps that explained his restraint. But why, even now, on this empty path, was he maintaining such a courteous distance?

The space between them, even when they were alone, made her question everything to the point of irrationality.

'Was last night a dream?'

But her bruised lips, the sore tips of her chest, and the still-throbbing back of her neck, marked by his kisses, screamed that it hadn't been.

'Could he want to pretend it never happened?'

She had heard of men who gave everything passionately one night and were cold and distant the next morning.

'No, Edwin Eccleston is not that kind of man!'

The ten-year-old girl inside her wanted to defend him. But the 'woman Giselle' who had begun to take root since last night, sharply fought back.

'Edwin Eccleston may be a good man, but he is not a good lover.'

It was true that he hadn't been a gentleman last night. Even through the rose-colored lens of love, it couldn't be denied.

But she could excuse him.

It was his first time. He didn't know how to properly share love. He changed completely after the peak of it.
Chapter 57.
I apologize that the previous translation still felt bland. I understand the need for a vibrant, expressive, and authentic translation that truly captures the emotional complexity of the original Korean novel. I will re-translate Chapter 57, focusing on the character's internal turmoil, the shifting relationship dynamics, and Edwin's growing, reluctant awareness.

57
After that night, Edwin became a man who couldn't bear to be apart from Giselle for a single moment. How deeply he regretted having to leave her room. He wore the expression of a man who could no longer live without her. In crude terms, he was far from a man who had simply 'fulfilled a duty.'

"Did he then wake up, regain his senses, and regret it?"

That didn't track either. Didn't he say he'd been waiting so long for the day Giselle became an adult? This wasn't an impulsive one-night mistake, so he wouldn't suddenly be racked with that kind of regret.

"Was he worried about being discovered.?"

The thought brought Mrs. Sanders's stern face to mind.

"Could she have found out already and decided to dispose of me?"

If it was Mrs. Sanders, she was the type of person who, upon receiving a maid's report about evidence of intimacy in Giselle's room, would have immediately informed Edwin, regardless of whether the man was her master or not.

During the driving lessons, Giselle had planned to inform and consult with Edwin about Mrs. Sanders's subtle warnings when the opportunity arose, but now that wasn't necessary. If Mrs. Sanders knew about their relationship, then Edwin would certainly know, too.

"If I'm discovered and branded as the 'Eccleston hound,' will Edwin try to end this immoral relationship?"

Is this how I'll finally get the answer to the vague question I asked myself this morning?

"No, please, not yet."

Since yesterday, she had become inexplicably sensitive, and she desperately hoped this was a misperception. But the indifferent back he left behind, pausing alone, couldn't be a mistake.

Giselle stomped her foot. She had to catch up to him.

'But I really should keep the chauffeur.'

Although she was a quick study and, in just two hours, was able to drive and park the small car by herself, the traffic-free estate roads were nothing like the busy city streets.

After concluding it was best to keep the chauffeur until Giselle became truly proficient, Edwin suddenly noticed.

"Why isn't she following me?"

He stopped and looked back. The child, who was about three cherry trees away, was running toward him. Perhaps it was the shadow that distorted her features. Giselle's face looked dark.

But when she was just a cherry tree away, the anxious look he saw could not be mistaken.

"What's wrong?"

He glanced around, thinking she might have spotted something alarming on the path, but there was nothing to frighten her so much. Meanwhile, Giselle darted up to him, stopping right beneath his chin.

"Sir." "Yes?"

The tone she used to call him was utterly serious. Giselle looked up at him, her expression one of utter determination.

What is she going to say?

He was getting nervous for no reason. He held his breath and listened intently to what Giselle would say, but.

"My hand." "May I hold it?"

Just her hand?

Edwin, knowing he shouldn't, chuckled in front of the earnest girl. Giselle's eyes widened, as if asking why he was laughing. Her clear eyes twinkled. Fearing she might get angry, Edwin quickly took Giselle's hand.

"Did you see something scary? There are no bears here, unless they're ghosts."

As they started walking together, Giselle moved the hand he held. He thought she wanted to let go, but he was mistaken. Her slender fingers intertwined with Edwin's.

Edwin wasn't fond of intertwining his fingers with Giselle's. He feared accidentally breaking those small, fragile digits.

Even though she had grown considerably and her hands were larger now, to him, Giselle's hands still felt as small as a child's; he couldn't shake the unusual worry he'd carried when he first held her hand as a little girl.

Still, Edwin did not let go. Just as he always had.

"Sir, my hand! Hold my hand!"

Asking for her hand to be held when scared was a habit that began on the battlefield. Even at Templeton, where there was nothing to fear, she would occasionally get frightened and cling to his hand.

Seeing a childhood habit he thought had vanished resurface. Edwin, feeling a rush of joy, took her hand without hesitation.

"What scared you? Huh?"

Silly little thing. Being dramatic over nothing, making me worry, and startling me—that was still the same even though she was grown. Though, of course, it was endearing.

"So what scared you this time?"

When he tilted his gaze down to Giselle, who wasn't answering, Edwin let out a soft laugh. Now, as if she had never been frightened, Giselle was smiling widely, feigning indifference.

"I should build a lab and study machines that read people's minds."

At his unexpected comment, Giselle raised her golden eyebrows.

"To read your mind." "I should be the one to say that." "Why mine?" "Because I can't understand it at all." "Mine?"

She pursed her lips and puffed out her cheeks. Giselle looked at him with an expression that was the very definition of annoyance, and then slowly lowered her eyes.

At the familiar expression, Edwin felt a sharp, internal jolt, as if he had been hit on the back of the neck. It was an expression he had never seen on Giselle. Nor was it an expression a ward should show her guardian.

It was the look a woman gives a man.

Women who fell in love with Edwin often made that annoyed face. They also complained about not being able to understand his thoughts, just like Giselle.

Women mistakenly think men are just as emotionally complicated, but that is a complete illusion. Men are simple. Therefore, the answer was also simple. He was not in love. A man does not confuse the woman he desires.

Edwin had, against his will, witnessed many women who misinterpreted his empty heart as a safe full of perfectly fitting engagement rings, desperately searching for a key that did not exist. Since he was 16, he could distinguish a woman in love with him just by the look in her eyes, and, to his misfortune, he had never been wrong.

But today, that alarm, which had a 100% success rate, had been sounding constantly. On Giselle.

Contrary to her usually confident and somewhat haughty demeanor, she kept blushing and avoiding his gaze. That's when the strangeness began.

She was angry because he checked the "insect bite" marks she'd tried to hide. Getting angry over such a thing is characteristic of women who can't quite control their emotions. That wasn't Giselle's style.

Even attempting to touch his face and brush his hair away was uncharacteristic of Giselle. It wasn't just because it seemed odd. Edwin had avoided it.

'She is planning to kiss me.'

He had a gut feeling he shouldn't let Giselle do that. And it wasn't just that once. Today, at least three or four more times, he felt that uncomfortable intuition. At first, he laughed off his own instinct.

'That makes no sense. Why would Giselle fall in love with me?'

Even if she did, this girl is the type who would hide that feeling where no one could see it and secretly dispose of it. Because she is smart and considerate. She never insists on things that shouldn't be.

What makes the least sense is something else. Until yesterday, she was a girl who insisted on staying up late playing, and after waking up, is now asking him for a kiss with the eyes of a woman? Unless she's been replaced by someone else, it was illogical.

Therefore, every time the alarm sounded, he dismissed it as a malfunction. He didn't know why his intuition was failing.

A new side effect of the sleeping pills? After months without them, now?

Or is it that I'm starting to see Giselle as a woman? He even suspected that for lack of other reasons, but it was absurd.

No matter how much bright red lipstick Giselle wore, to Edwin she just looked like a little girl who had stolen her mother's makeup. Seeing this child as a woman? The mere thought filled him with revulsion.

While he struggled with this confusion, the alarm's malfunction continued, now he was coming to see and hear in Giselle the expressions and words of the women who had secretly loved him. At this point, Edwin couldn't help but suspect that maybe the alarm wasn't wrong—the most problematic and somber suspicion of his life.

"Giselle, I don't want to lose you. And certainly not this way."

The slender fingers intertwined with his felt uncomfortable for the first time. If there was an intention behind this act that was different from what he thought, perhaps he should let go of that hand.

If it were any other woman, he would not have hesitated to let go immediately. The hesitation was only because it was Giselle.

They didn't share blood, but they were family. No, even without sharing blood, she was a child who felt more like family than many of his blood relatives, due to the deep affection and trust they shared.
Chapter 58.
Nobody who harms Giselle will be forgiven. Not even myself is an exception.

Edwin was so consumed with finding a way to gently distance himself from Giselle without causing her pain that he couldn't bring himself to release her hand.

"Sir, this morning, that footman. you know."

Giselle shyly mentioned another man. The moment a man's name left her lips, another alarm blared in Edwin's mind, completely overshadowing the previous one.

'The footman is not an option.'

The staff at an Eccleston household weren't just anybody. Only those who graduated with honors from higher education institutions could even apply.

A sharp mind was necessary, but not sufficient. They needed unimpeachable character, diligence, no criminal record (even for minor offenses), and a sterling recommendation from a previous workplace.

The footmen working at the Templeton estates, in particular, went through a selection process far more rigorous than at other Eccleston residences. Therefore, the footman Giselle mentioned must have been thoroughly vetted for both intelligence and character.

'How dare he.?'

A lady following the path of the elite at Fullerton and Kingsbridge, falling for a footman from her own house? For Edwin, it was unthinkable.

"No." "No, it's not that." "Then what is it?"

Though he asked, Giselle merely hesitated.

'After asking me to hold her hand because she was afraid, she now carefully brings up the footman?'

At that moment, Edwin's protective instinct sounded a new alarm.

"What did that fellow do to you?" "Huh? He didn't do anything to me."

Giselle, who had been looking at the ground, finally looked up at him. Her eyes seemed to ask why his mind had taken such an abrupt turn. Fortunately, she didn't seem to be hiding anything sinister.

"Then why the footman?" "It's just that when he gave me a rose." "Your Grace, the Duke!"

As soon as Giselle started to reply, the urgent voice of Mrs. Sanders cut them off. In that moment, Giselle released the hand Edwin had momentarily forgotten.

'Did some kind of emergency occur?'

Edwin quickened his pace, crossing the gate at the end of the cherry tree path and heading toward the mansion's east courtyard. However, the housekeeper who had called him with such urgency was walking with an exasperating calm.

"What's the matter?" "I heard you went to teach Miss Bishop how to drive, but as you didn't return after luncheon, I became worried."

The answer made no sense. Driving practice was held in the garden, which was visible from the mansion.

Perhaps she was worried because they hadn't returned even after practice was finished. They could have had an accident somewhere on this vast property while returning the car to the garage.

But if she was worried, why didn't she simply call the garage to confirm? The housekeeper, who knew the mansion's affairs better than anyone and was an expert at her job, wouldn't have overlooked that. Could there have been an emergency she couldn't mention in front of Giselle?

"There's something I need to discuss with you privately." "No, there is nothing of the sort, Your Grace."

She smiled as if everything were in order. It was a fake smile.

"Should I prepare some food if you haven't eaten lunch yet?"

Mrs. Sanders asked Edwin. Edwin transferred the same question to Giselle.

"Are you hungry? Do you want to eat now?"

Giselle, who had been completely engrossed in driving practice, had said she would eat later. She probably hadn't felt hungry due to nerves, but now that she was relaxed, she should be quite famished. However, she shook her head.

"I'm fine. It's too hot to have an appetite."

Had she overworked herself on this hot day? Edwin was about to ask if she felt dizzy from heatstroke, but Mrs. Sanders intervened before he could open his mouth.

"Then you should go rest."

As if she had been waiting for Giselle to refuse food.

"I'll have something cool sent up to your room."

Furthermore, without even consulting Edwin or Giselle, she tried to send the girl to her room on her own authority.

This didn't seem like caring for the girl affectionately. His only basis was intuition, accumulated after years of observing the housekeeper, but what other basis could be more reliable?

It appeared to be a considerate gesture, but it was unilateral. It did not take into account the wishes of the person involved. It was the way Mrs. Sanders typically spoke to employees under her supervision.

However politely she had phrased it, the housekeeper had practically ordered his ward to go to her room immediately. That sort of language was typically used to scold a child who had done something wrong.

Edwin's intuition also focused on Giselle, who was standing at an awkward distance behind him. Though her face seemed composed, she was repeatedly licking and biting her lips, forgetting she was even wearing lipstick. The girl knew she was about to be scolded and was nervous.

'By what authority does Mrs. Sanders dare to.?'

When Giselle was small, Edwin wouldn't intervene when Mrs. Sanders corrected her improper behavior. He even encouraged it, believing it was best for the child.

But scolding her was always forbidden. That was a right reserved exclusively for Edwin, as her guardian.

'What did Giselle do wrong?'

Interfering with behavior that wasn't wrong was also forbidden. What Mrs. Sanders was trying to stop became obvious from Giselle's actions when she called them.

—Then, I'll head up first.

Edwin grabbed the hand of the young woman, who was about to obey the housekeeper despite not being a servant. At that moment, both Giselle and Mrs. Sanders tensed up. Edwin lifted Giselle's hand as if to display it, then released it, fixing his gaze on the housekeeper.

"Mrs. Sanders." "Yes, Your Grace." "I would like to hear why walking hand-in-hand while reminiscing about old memories is something that warrants a scolding, and why it is Mrs. Sanders's business."

"I apologize, Your Grace."

Once discovered, denial would only anger the Duke more. Mrs. Sanders quickly admitted her mistake and apologized.

"I didn't ask for an apology, I asked for an explanation."

The Duke was not a difficult person, but that did not make him an easy master. She would have to wait until Miss Bishop was alone. Calling the Duke and separating the two had been a mistake.

"Has any visitor come today?" "I haven't heard anything about that." "Then who is the woman with whom the Duke is having a date?" "A date? Oh dear, that's right. Wait. Who is it? It's Miss Bishop. But why are they like that.?"

The maids cleaning the windows began to murmur upon seeing the two, and Mrs. Sanders felt rushed. Though angry at Miss Bishop for making such a basic error so soon after she'd been warned, she had temporarily lost her reason due to anger.

One unwise momentary judgment had led her to a difficult conversation with the most difficult person. But lies would only make things worse.

"I know that the Duke and Miss Bishop are like family, but I believe Miss Bishop, now an adult, must realize that there are eyes that do not see them as family."

"The maids, is it?"

The sharp and astute Duke caught exactly whom she meant by "eyes that do not see them as family."

"Yes, that is correct." "When the maids have inappropriate conversations about their employer, whom should the housekeeper reprimand? The employer?"

"No, Your Grace. I deeply regret my error. As the housekeeper in charge of the maids' supervision, I feel ashamed. I will ensure this does not happen again by educating and sanctioning the maids involved in this incident."

The Duke was not wrong. When something like this occurred, reprimanding the maids was her job, but interfering with the master was a transgression that shouldn't even occur in her dreams.

It was a basic principle she had not violated in over 20 years of managing employees at Templeton, one she hadn't even considered violating. To have forgotten a habit of over 20 years. Mrs. Sanders blushed.

'I was not in my right mind.'

It wasn't an excuse; it was a fact. The moment she saw the Duke and Miss Bishop walking toward the mansion, her heart shuddered and she lost her composure.

On this hot summer day, they were not only close enough for their clothes to brush, but they were also walking hand-in-hand, synchronizing their steps while conversing kindly. They did not look like a protector and his protégé.

They looked like lovers.

It was so obvious that one couldn't blame those who saw it that way.

'Could it be possible.?'

Family?

Do families do those sorts of things?

Ah.

So, there are families that do those sorts of things.

Chapter 59.
"What exactly happened just now?"

Giselle was bewildered.

She was joyful because Edwin had held her hand, a gesture that signaled their relationship hadn't been severed after a single night. But then, Mrs. Sanders intervened.

"So, does the housekeeper not know about our relationship? Or does she know, and is she warning us?"

She was still uncertain whether Mrs. Sanders had discovered their intimacy. And that wasn't the only confusing element.

"Why did Edwin act like that?"

It was the first time Edwin had defended Giselle against Mrs. Sanders so fiercely. While Giselle had instinctively retreated to prevent their relationship from being discovered, Edwin, on the contrary, had acted with unwavering resolve to protect her.

"Giselle, don't forget this."

Giselle recalled the words Edwin had spoken to her after that small incident:

"Mrs. Sanders has no authority to reprimand you. Don't behave like a submissive servant. Why do you worry about what Mrs. Sanders thinks?"

How could I not worry?

She wanted to ask him that, but upon reflection, perhaps acting with firmness, as Edwin had, was the correct course of action.

Giselle could be cheeky with her peers, but never with adults. As an orphan, she lived with the constant fear of abandonment, and the pressure to be an obedient girl for all adults was overwhelming.

"Giselle, you only need to listen to Sir."

Now that she had Edwin, she needed to cast aside the desire to be a "good girl" for every adult.

"Do you think your world ends if other adults think you are a bad girl? Your world ends the day Sir abandons you."

Giselle resolved that she needed to be more assertive to maintain this relationship.

"What Mrs. Sanders did was wrong, but she wasn't entirely mistaken in what she said. You shouldn't do anything that causes unnecessary misunderstandings, as you don't want negative rumors about yourself to arise. Do you understand what I'm saying, Giselle? I hope you won't be disappointed."

But why had he given her that advice? It sounded like he was telling her to be cautious with her actions so as not to expose their relationship, but somehow, it didn't quite fit together.

"What is going on?. Oh, my head."

Since last night, both Edwin and Mrs. Sanders had given her the unsettling sense that things didn't quite add up. Because of this, her head throbbed.

Even after a warm shower, the headache persisted. Giselle rose from the bed and picked up the telephone receiver on the nightstand.

"Could someone please bring me something for a headache?"

A moment later, the one who brought the analgesic and a drink on a tray was not a maid, but Mrs. Sanders. Giselle felt neither uncomfortable nor surprised. She knew Mrs. Sanders would come.

"Mrs. Sanders." "Yes, Miss Bishop."

Her demeanor was excessively formal and rigid. She was clearly becoming suspicious of Giselle.

"What happened a little while ago won't happen again."

Giselle made a promise that wasn't even requested, before the other person could speak. It wasn't that she was submitting to Mrs. Sanders. She was simply curious to know what Mrs. Sanders wanted to say, so she steered the conversation.

In truth, when Mrs. Sanders told her to go to her room, Giselle hadn't behaved submissively out of pressure from an adult. She was willing to be scolded. She was so consumed with curiosity about what Mrs. Sanders might say that she couldn't contain herself.

"If I listen to her, I'll be able to tell if Mrs. Sanders is aware of our relationship or not."

Even now, for that very reason, she had created the opportunity for Mrs. Sanders to come to her room and brought up the subject.

"It should be me who apologizes, Miss Bishop. What happened earlier will not happen again."

However, Mrs. Sanders was not easily fooled, as if suspecting Giselle was laying a trap. She plastered on a fake smile like armor and tried to conceal the true feelings she had intentionally displayed that very morning.

"It was clearly my mistake, so I apologize again." "I also apologize for having acted in a way that could cause misunderstandings. Even though I am grown, I acted immaturely and made demands of the Duke. I will be more careful in the future."

She tried to make it seem like holding his hand had been a childish whim, but deceiving a seasoned adult was not easy.

"Miss Bishop, do you perhaps harbor romantic feelings for the Duke?"

Mrs. Sanders abruptly stripped away her mask of a false smile and launched a direct question that zeroed in on the exact topic Giselle wished to avoid. Indirectly, she also made it clear that Giselle's clumsy attempt at deception had failed.

"No, of course not. Why would I feel anything for the Duke.?"

She acted as if she were horrified, but Mrs. Sanders was unimpressed.

"Miss Bishop, do you know how many times I have asked that question over the course of 20 years? And how many of those women, after giving the same answer as you, ended up pursuing the men of the Eccleston Family?"

Mrs. Sanders had served three generations of the family: the previous Duke, the Duke before him, and the current one. She had seen dozens of women fall for them, so she was an expert at detecting those who might cause trouble in the mansion.

"But the Duke isn't someone who would accept me."

Giselle lowered her head and fiddled with her braid, acting like a disheartened woman. She was attempting to hide the truth by admitting to a minor deception.

"If you were a maid, you would be dismissed immediately."

Mrs. Sanders sighed, as if she had fallen for the lie. Giselle was not an easy rival for her; she was at a loss for what to do.

"Please don't tell the Duke. I beg you, alright?"

Being misinterpreted as harboring unrequited love was the lesser of two evils. The worst would be the discovery that they had already consummated their love. Giselle chose the lesser evil to avoid the worst.

"If Miss Bishop acts with wisdom, I will not tell the Duke. I don't need to explain what acting with wisdom means, do I?" "Yes" "And although the Duke is not the type of person who would do such a thing."

Mrs. Sanders delivered a warning to Giselle with an expression that clearly stated even she found her own words absurd.

"Even if, by some remote chance, the Duke were to desire an inappropriate relationship with you, refusing him would be the wisest decision."

Giselle nodded her head, still acting like a disheartened person, but internally, she was celebrating. Mrs. Sanders didn't know that her supposition was not so far-fetched, and that, in fact, it wasn't a supposition but something that had already occurred.

'The night with Edwin has not been discovered.'

Although she had already sensed it from the flow of the conversation, now she was certain.

Having achieved her goal, it was time to put an end to this dangerous conversation with Mrs. Sanders. However, Mrs. Sanders, still not entirely reassured, continued to warn her incessantly, repeating things Giselle already knew.

"This is a crucial time for the Duke's family. The Duke must find a suitable Duchess for the family before it is too late. Do you not wish for the Duke's family to reclaim its good name and prosper as before?" "Yes, I do." "Then, I implore you, do not stain the future of the Duke and his family with scandal." "Yes. I will keep that in mind." "You are a beautiful and talented young woman, Giselle. It would be a shame and an injustice if your bright future were hampered by scandal. Please, think of yourself before any man. This is sincere advice, as if you were my own daughter." "Thank you. I will keep it in mind."

Lie.

Just like old Mr. Coleman, who was desperately protective of the garden he had cultivated all his life because it was his pride, Mrs. Sanders only wanted to protect the name of the family to whom she had dedicated her life, because it was her pride.

She could no longer believe the "as if you were my own daughter" sentiment. Even Edwin, who claimed to love her like a daughter, ultimately couldn't love her as such.

"You have grown into a strong, green tree, full of beautiful flowers."

"Now, let me see how beautiful the flower that has bloomed between your legs is."

Her head ached again. She had spent too much energy today trying to read everyone's intentions and decipher their thoughts.

'I want to leave here.'

For the first time since she had made Templeton her home in her heart, Giselle felt the urge to leave.

'There are too many watchful eyes here.'

Now she understood why Edwin wanted to give her a house. She wanted to go to Richmond as soon as possible, to take refuge in her own home with Edwin.

'If only night would fall, when everyone at Templeton closes their eyes.'

Giselle sighed as she looked at the sun slowly dipping outside the tall window. It was the first time she had wished for her birthday to end soon.

That night, just as the end of her birthday was around the corner:

*'Father who art in heaven.' *

In the dark room, lit only by the bedside lamp, Giselle knelt on the floor, rested her forehead on her clasped hands, and prayed to God.

Chapter 60.

'Thank you for bringing Edwin into my life.'

If it hadn't been for her parents, who raised and protected her in that remote mountain valley, she would never have met Edwin or attained this love. Giselle did not forget to thank them too, praying they would rest in peace in heaven. Usually, her prayer ended there.

'Please allow me to love Sir in secret for a very, very long time.'

But starting today, she had one more request.

'No, please allow me to love him forever.'

May he be happy.

Without any storms.

And by 'storm,' she meant other people of the opposite sex, media reports, illnesses, natural disasters, but not limited to these internal and external events or accidents.

Giselle kept adding definitions to her ultimate wish. While praying, she suddenly recalled a story Edwin had once told her about a curse related to a monkey's paw.

Since hearing that story, Giselle had been careful. When you make a wish, you must be precise and specific.

So, as she strained to define the 'eternal love with Edwin' with accuracy and detail, a thought suddenly arose.

'What if God gets angry because I treated Him like a madwoman, like a pagan demon?'

From that moment, she began to feel fear and started praying for forgiveness. As she did, the sound of the pendulum clock striking midnight began to echo in the hallway, but her prayer seemed endless.

'Is it already this late?'

She quickly finished her prayer, stood up, and brushed the wrinkled hem of her pajamas. The sound of the pendulum clock outside the door had already ceased, and the table clock next to the bed showed 12:02.

'It's time for him to arrive.'

Giselle looked at the closed door of her bedroom and moistened her lips, which were already dry.

12:05.

Still no knock at the door.

12:10.

She still hadn't heard a knock. Her legs were beginning to ache, so she sat down on the bed.

'Why isn't he coming?'

Edwin had gone to sleep around 10. Could he really have fallen asleep? As the thought occurred, Giselle realized Edwin had never actually told her he would come tonight.

'But I thought he would come anyway. Is he not coming tonight?'

She worried her innocent lips and fiddled with her hair, which she had carefully styled, tangling and untangling it with her fingers while staring intently at the door. The clock already marked 12:15. At that moment, Giselle was certain Edwin would not come.

'Why did I think he would come tonight? I should have asked him.'

How could she ask him such a thing after only one day of being intimate? Inviting a gentleman to her room late at night was not proper for a lady.

'And was I a lady yesterday?'

Is the situation different if Edwin comes to find me than if I ask him to come?

She felt ridiculous quarreling with herself. Just 15 minutes ago, she had laughed at herself for putting on her prettiest lingerie, thinking Edwin wouldn't even look at it before undressing her. But now she realized she was laughing at herself for having put on that lingerie when he hadn't even said he was coming.

'I might as well get into bed and fall asleep.'

At that moment, she felt like a fool for continuing to wait, telling herself she would wait just one more minute.

Slide.

A piece of paper suddenly appeared, shoved underneath the bedroom door. Giselle quickly got up and crept toward the door.

'I will wait for you under the western rose arch. Burn this note.'

Although there was no signature, Giselle knew it was a message from Edwin. She couldn't mistake his handwriting.

'See? I was right. Edwin was waiting for the night too, just like me.'

Though her heart was already racing toward the rose arch where Edwin was waiting, she couldn't possibly go in her pajamas. Giselle quickly burned the note and stepped into the dressing room.

'What should I wear?'

Indecision swept over her.

'Should I wear stockings? And put on makeup?'

Doubts she had never entertained before now delayed her, just when time was of the essence.

How should she look when secretly meeting her lover late at night? If she had known this would happen, she wouldn't have looked down on those girls who snuck out of their dormitories to meet boys, but would have observed them more closely.

'Sir has already seen my face and my bare legs.'

The longer she prepared, the less time she would have to spend the night with Edwin. She discarded the unnecessary worries and put on something pretty but easy to remove. For shoes, she chose canvas sneakers—the quietest she owned—but left the room without putting them on.

She tiptoed through the hallway, which was tinged a bluish hue under the moonlight, not just barefoot, but on her toes, like a thief. Although the servants should already be in their rooms in the attic, she couldn't be certain no one else was roaming about at this hour.

Tick, tock.

The pendulum clock in the staircase foyer rhythmically swung its weight, covering the sound of Giselle's footsteps. Though relieved, she also grew nervous as she couldn't hear other sounds.

She couldn't relax, always alert for the possibility of an unexpected encounter. Only when she slipped out the west door could she finally relax, along with the sneakers she carried in her hand.

Giselle leaned against the column outside the door and put on her sneakers, one foot at a time. Her heart was already racing across the dark courtyard toward her lover.

In the cool night air, she could almost smell Edwin's fragrance. She wanted to quickly reach him and immerse herself in his scent.

'Ugh, really. Just when I'm in a hurry.'

Putting on her sneakers hastily, the left heel buckled. She poked her finger into the heel and straightened it, then lowered her foot back to the ground. Suddenly, she was startled. A pair of black men's shoes had appeared between her feet.

'Is it Edwin?'

Just as she straightened up, preparing to turn her head, a pale hand suddenly appeared in front of her eyes.

"Ugh!."

Someone covered her mouth. Edwin had no reason to do this to her. The moment Giselle thought it might not be Edwin, she raised her elbow to strike the intruder, but.

"Huh? This."

When the intruder embraced her, she obediently lowered her arm. The instant she was enveloped in his arms, a familiar scent surrounded her.

'Sir, why this kind of joke.?'

Annoyed, Giselle gave a long lick to the palm of the hand still covering her mouth. A soft chuckle followed, and then a warm breath tickled her ear in retaliation.

"Hmm."

As soon as the hand was withdrawn, her lips were devoured by Edwin's. It was a hungry kiss. Feeling in his body that Edwin had also been waiting just as long as she had, the resentment left by the mischievous prank melted away and vanished.

"Ah. Sir."

But curiosity didn't entirely disappear.

"Why did you cover my mouth?" "Practice."

Edwin's answer left her more bewildered than his smile. She had seen Edwin smile mischievously many times, but never with a smile as pure and clear as a child's.

"What kind of practice?" "Practice for abducting you."

Giselle's smile, which had mirrored Edwin's, cracked.

"What?" "Let's go."

She thought she might have misheard and tried to ask again, but Edwin didn't repeat what he'd said, merely taking her by the wrist and dragging her along.

'Practice for abducting me? That's not something to say with such an innocent smile. It didn't even sound like a joke.'

She wanted to believe she had misheard, but she hadn't. As she was dragged toward an unknown location, Edwin's unsettling words continued.

"If I lock you away somewhere no one can find you, no one will be able to snatch you from me."

Perhaps Edwin was also tired of worrying about the eyes of others today?

"That's not the only benefit. Then, only I would exist in your world" "Only you already exist in my world." "There would be no one else you could love." "I already only love you." "Ha"

Why did he laugh? His distorted expression looked almost like he was weeping. But the moon had hidden behind the clouds, and she couldn't trust what she saw.

However, she definitely felt the strength in the hand gripping her wrist loosen at that moment. She thought he would let go, but suddenly the grip became even stronger.

"What do you think?"

Edwin, who had dragged her to the base of the stairs, suddenly stopped and asked. Giselle, who had been looking at the ground to avoid falling, finally looked up and followed Edwin's gaze.

"Should I lock you up there?"

In the center of the lake, which shimmered like a silver mirror, stood a pale structure.

'The Naiads' Pavilion.'

A building that usually looked like an ancient sacred temple, now appeared like a tomb made of bare bones, sinister and cold.

"No one could come to rescue you; you wouldn't be able to escape."

It was definitely because of Edwin.

Chapter 61.
"This is your favorite spot, isn't it? What do you think? Do you like it?"

"Sir."

With an innocent and spine-chilling smile, he leaned in kindly, which only made him look even more unsettling.

"I'm not amused."

These kinds of jokes only made her uncomfortable. Edwin, the very model of a gentleman, surely knew that well.

'I don't think he's a 'Sir' right now.'

Giselle observed the man under the blue light. Although she knew it was disrespectful, she couldn't help but think he looked like a madman.

It was said that moonlight drove people insane…

However, the moonlight that night was too faint to entirely blame it.

"So, you don't like it?"

Giselle gestured with her eyes toward the pale building stretching out behind the man, whose face she still couldn't distinguish as smiling or weeping.

"You brought the master key today, didn't you?"

In the center of the cross-shaped pavilion was a circular void. Upon opening the glass door with the key and entering the spacious hall, the first thing to capture attention was undoubtedly the large grand piano.

Moonlight, spilling down from the round window in the domed ceiling, illuminated the piano, like a stage waiting for the protagonist to step into the spotlight.

Although it would be the perfect setting for a moon fairy to play a nocturne under a mysterious light, the image that first sprang to Giselle's mind was that of a grudge-filled specter playing a funeral march—that was entirely Edwin's fault.

"If you keep up those creepy jokes, I'm leaving."

Did that sound like a threat?

Edwin smiled politely, preparing to speak. Giselle, anticipating one of his dreadful jokes, pursed her lips. It was then that his gaze shifted.

His mouth, which had opened to say something strange, passed first over Giselle's lips before closing again. Giselle, feeling they were about to start that again, quickly led him toward the center of the moonlit spot.

"It's been four years now."

Giselle ran her hand across the lid of the white piano's keyboard. Although no one had been here for a long time, it seemed to be cleaned regularly, as there was no dust.

Click.

Giselle opened the keyboard lid while looking toward the glass door. Beyond it, through the curtains of wisteria blossoms hanging over the hallway entrance, the darkened mansion looked tiny, like a fingernail.

With her fingers still caressing the smooth keys, she applied more pressure. First just one key, then two, then three, and finally an arpeggio. The notes became clearer as she went. Finally, the notes began to gush from the body of the piano, spilling onto the marble floor, until even the walls seemed to vibrate.

When she took her hands off the keyboard, her ears were still ringing for a moment. Even after the last notes faded, the mansion lights remained off. Just in case, she decided not to open the piano lid that night and sat down on the bench.

This time, her fingers moved across the entire keyboard, alternating between major and minor. The notes flowed like water, indicating the piano was well-tuned.

Now it was time to relax. She began playing a piece she knew well, while Edwin, who was leaning against the piano watching her, murmured to himself.

"That's right… You like playing the piano." "You like it too. Let's play together."

Giselle shifted slightly to the right, leaving space for him to sit beside her. But Edwin did not move closer. In his gaze, something uncomfortable could be seen.

"Why don't you come closer?" "I haven't played since I came back."

It was the first time he had said this since returning from the war. Edwin always said that if he hadn't been a soldier, he would have been a pianist, as his skill was remarkable.

"You'll remember if you try."

Finally, Edwin sat down next to her, although he seemed lost in thought. He stared at the piano without moving, as if contemplating something.

His fingers eventually touched a key, then, suddenly, all ten fingertips moved slowly across the keyboard. The tranquil melody extended past three measures, and Giselle recognized it.

"Sonata No. 3, 2nd movement by Bernardi."

It was a piece that, due to its slow tempo, she had always struggled to play quickly because of her impatience.

"Giselle Bishop! Play slower! What part of those three words don't you understand? Start over! You can't turn the page until you correct it!"

Giselle had learned to play the piano from Edwin, not in a gentle way, but in the manner of military training.

As the melody changed, the piece became faster.

"You won't break the piano with that. Why don't you use a hammer instead of your fingers?"

Memories of having played "loudly" instead of "quickly" made her feel a little embarrassed. Although Edwin hadn't touched a piano in four years, his execution was as precise as a manual on how to play fast, yet delicately.

Giselle never imagined that Edwin's serious expression would only ease when he was teaching piano. It wasn't that she was clumsy; it was that he was a genius.

When the piece changed again, doubt vanished from his movements. In a matter of seconds, he regained his skill, and his fingers flew across the keyboard without hesitation.

Edwin had perfect hands for the piano. His long, slender fingers moved with elegance, comfortably covering 13 notes.

'Sophisticated hands.'

The smooth, well-maintained skin of his hands, with straight and well-formed fingers, gave him an elegance that could only be described as masculine and worthy of 'Sir.'

Sometimes, Giselle felt caught staring at those perfectly formed hands, and it seemed to her as if she were in love.

And when he was playing the piano, she could admire them without worrying that Edwin would think she had romantic intentions. That's why she often asked him to play.

While her eyes followed those hands, she forgot to disguise her attraction. However, since that night, she could admire his face without worry.

While playing, his face didn't change much according to the piece, but today, something about him was different: he didn't seem quite so tranquil.

"It's incredible." "The body remembers."

Edwin nodded and continued playing several notes, each time more complicated. Giselle couldn't help but be surprised by his skill.

"Wow. you can play a difficult piece today!"

Edwin's fingers suddenly stopped on the keyboard, startling Giselle.

"What piece do you want me to play?"

Giselle, filled with high expectations, asked him for a difficult piece. Edwin looked thoughtfully at the keyboard and shook his head. It wasn't that he couldn't play it.

"Didn't you say we were going to play together?"

Although she had wanted to smash the piano several times due to the strict training, she had never stopped learning, because her dream was to play alongside Edwin.

Playing a melody that was only complete when both synchronized, like a kiss, was something deeply romantic.

Giselle placed her hands over the keyboard, blushing with a shy smile.

"Then, let's play the Lovers' Waltz."

She didn't need to think hard about the choice. It wasn't because there were few pieces for four hands, but because that was the only theme she truly wanted to play with him.

Edwin did not ask the question Giselle feared, as if he were toying with her, but simply looked at the keyboard and, without a word, placed his fingers over the first key.

"One, two."

To Giselle's count, they both began moving their hands in unison. With Edwin, they didn't need a metronome. She adjusted her rhythm to his.

As the piece progressed, she could enjoy his hands as they played. Although both pairs of hands were playing the same melody, his fingers glided with a grace that Giselle couldn't help but admire, like a calm swan.

When he danced, he was like this too: always calm and effortlessly guiding her with simple, smooth steps.

Although the melody sounded like a waltz, it felt as if the two were dancing together, albeit in a different way, with their fingers on the keys.


Chapter 62.

The Lovers' Waltz is a waltz in itself, but it's named that way because the four hands move in a waltz-like partnership across the keys.

Sliding across the floor, they ascend the keys with interlaced hands. When I interlace my hands with him, I feel the joy of executing complex steps with entwined hands.

His fingers begin to stretch out a deep, gentlemanly melody; Giselle floats up and down over it in colorful chords. He grabbed her hand and spun her, round and round, until the width of her skirt fluttered like wings.

Giselle's left hand glided toward him as if to steal a kiss. Just before their hands touched, his right hand struck a key and leaped over hers, landing directly in front of her.

How can they play so well together?

Giselle's hands intertwined over the keys, perfectly reproducing the instructions of the score in her head. The two stared intently at each other as they interlaced the notes like a puzzle.

When he saw her smile, he smiled back. His smile made her smile even wider. And so the smile grew and grew.

They couldn't tear their eyes away from each other, and from then on, they played without looking at the keys. Their hands knew the keys and the score so well that not a single note escaped, but perhaps she had already made a mistake and he didn't hear it. Giselle's ears were now preoccupied by the sound of her pounding heart.

Meanwhile, her hand had to return to its original position. Giselle, still captivated by his gaze, dropped her eyes to the keys. Before her eyes, a firm palm, followed by long fingers, brushed the back of her hand and guided it back to its place.

She missed a note. The man who had stopped her didn't wait for her to finish. Giselle rushed to follow him and quickly matched his pace.

As soon as she recovered her composure, her attention fixated on the back of her hand, which still tingled. I don't know if it's an illusion, but the melody that had been so elegant a moment ago has begun to sound sticky and sour.

Was it an illusion that their elbows were colliding more often?

She was wetting her dry lips with the tip of her tongue when his right hand bumped into Giselle's. Her heart was pounding as if it had fled from him, as if she had actually been running.

As she tried to keep up with his rhythm, breathing heavily, she suddenly realized that the waltz wasn't the only thing that required two people to synchronize their bodies.

Sex.

Like having sex with him right there on the keys.

From that moment on, the refined piano melody was overlaid with the primitive, raw performance that had been recorded in Giselle's mind. The steady piano rhythm, the escalating cries, and the increasingly rapid creaking of the bed. She knew it should be a cacophony, but it was disconcerting how well it blended, as if a composer had orchestrated it.

She was even more perplexed when it was time for the high notes to take the lead and the low notes to showcase their virtuosity. It was as if his melody was riding on top of hers. Her face burned as she realized that this was no different from last night, when she snapped her fingers to his beat, swaying her hips to his rhythm.

Apparently, she wasn't the only one thinking this way. The gasping breaths escaping his parched lips, the heaving of his chest, and the way his eyes were glued to Giselle's face—she couldn't argue that she hadn't seen those same signs in bed the night before.

The song began its dizzying ascent toward the climax. She now fully understood why the state of ultimate sexual pleasure is called a climax.

Goosebumps and shivers spread across Giselle's body as she raced toward the peak. Just like last night, right before reaching the climax.

Her chest felt like it was about to explode. It wasn't because the music was intensifying; this piece was nearing its end.

The most symbolic synchronization of the dance, where two people must synchronize their hand movements, occurred at the very end. It was the final instruction that made Giselle's heart race.

She always omitted the final word; to this day, her 'Lovers' Waltz' remained unfinished.

But perhaps this time

Only two words remained. Her heart threatened to leap out of her mouth, so she bit down hard on her lower lip and concentrated all her attention on not losing the beat.

Finally, the melody they were weaving together reached its last note in a spectacular finish, but there was still one final word.

Kiss.

Amidst the hammering that she couldn't tell if it was the reverberations or her own heartbeat, Giselle touched her newly dry lips with the tip of her tongue. Their hands withdrew from the keys. Where will his hands go now, she wondered, her heart beating faster and faster.

As she slowly turned her head toward him, a hand reached into her hair and curled around the back of Giselle's neck. Fiercely. It was as if it were written in the sheet music of her heart.

His face leaned toward hers. Without hesitation, their lips met.

They embraced. They hooked. It was a kiss. It was the historic moment when she completed the Lovers' Waltz with him.

Explosively. Was there a musical symbol for this? Giselle was certain that if her heart were a timpani drum, it would have shattered into pieces.

And just like that, she had fulfilled another dream she'd held since the age of 13. She was so happy she felt capable of facing ten Mrs. Sanders with a smile on her face.

"I've never had so much fun."

Edwin was delighted to see that Giselle was just as happy as he was. He hugged her tightly, covered her with kisses, and whispered that he loved her over and over again in her ear.

Like a man utterly different from the one she knew during the day.

"Sir." "Ha, hmm?" "Can't you love me like this during the day? It's fine when no one is looking." "You grabbed my hand and we were almost caught."

She couldn't argue with that, but she had something to say.

"There are too many eyes here. Can't we go back to Richmond tomorrow?"

The man who had urged her to come to Templeton was now urging her to leave.

"Yes, as you wish."

But he didn't blame Giselle for her whims. He felt the same way.

"Seeing how you're demonstrating with your whole body that you're in love, it's only a matter of time before you're discovered."

Her heart sank. She didn't mind that he was worried, but she didn't like that Giselle was the source of his concern.

"We haven't been discovered yet, and we won't be—I'm just being cautious, just in case. Mrs. Sanders didn't know about us either."

Trying to reassure him by bringing up something he hadn't asked about only revealed her own anxiety. As he watched her in silence, she felt he could see right through her apprehension. She wasn't wrong.

"I can see what you feared on the cherry path." ".What?" "Being abandoned by me."

She thought he didn't know because he kept asking her about it during the day, but he did. Giselle's face was as white as when she was naked. Unable to hide her fear, her countenance became somber.

"Giselle, you know I wouldn't leave you."

A smile formed on her face, as if she were about to burst into tears. She was grateful for his words, even if they were empty. But his words didn't stop there.

"I want to make you mine and have you by my side for the rest of my life."

How to prevent her from running away from me. She was glad he desired her so much, but his murmur was becoming unusually unsettling; the hairs on her arms began to stand on end.

"Let's get married?"

She heard the words least typical of an older man.

"What?"

Giselle thought she had misheard and asked again.

"Marry me."

The answer was the same. This time it didn't end with a question mark. It was a full stop, full of certainty.

"Then you couldn't get rid of me or leave me. Isn't that what marriage is?"

Giselle should have been more careful when talking about marriage, but the older man looked as happy as a child.

Is this a joke? He must know it's a joke she can't laugh at.

When Giselle didn't laugh, the smile also vanished from the older man's face. His expression darkened, and his eyes began to tremble.

'.Why is he making that face?'

It wasn't an expression of apology for a cruel joke, nor was it discomfort because Giselle hadn't laughed.

Chapter 63.

"You don't like it?"

Anxiety. The man's face reflected a palpable fear of rejection.

".Are you serious?" "Answer my question. I asked if you don't like it."

Astonishingly, he was serious about marrying Giselle.

"No, I love it!"

Giselle quickly expressed her feelings too, but that didn't mean she accepted the proposal.

"I love it, but how could I dare become a Duchess? I'm no noble—I'm just a peasant girl from Rozelle."

Although that wasn't the only reason she couldn't accept, it was reason enough. While it was humiliating to disparage herself, she didn't want to needlessly scratch at his pride any further. Ironically, she was grateful for her humble origin.

In this world, with money and skill, almost anything can be achieved. However, there is something that neither money nor skill can buy:

Social status.

Even a scorned Rozelle immigrant can become an entrepreneur or a doctor, but they cannot become a Queen or a noble lady.

"And so?"

He should know this better than anyone else.

"Giselle, I can make you a Duchess. Only if you love me."

It wasn't a preposterous claim. Legally, if both consenting adults agreed, marriage was possible regardless of social status.

Furthermore, inheritance laws didn't forbid a noble from marrying someone of lower status. Legally, there were no restrictions.

However, there were reasons why nobles didn't marry people of lower status.

In the closed society of the nobility, marriages that transcended social status were still objects of sharp criticism. Mixing noble blood with "impurities" diminished its value. Moreover, nobles considered it humiliating to share their privileges with servants or doctors who were meant to serve them.

Even in minor noble families, without titles or fame, there were cases of marriage to commoners for love or money.

But even they became scandal fodder. What would happen to the Eccleston Family, once a ruling family and now the core of noble society?

The title of Duchess Eccleston was as symbolic as that of a Queen or a First Lady; it genuinely carried authority and influence. Most people who had held that position were princesses from other countries or existing duchesses.

Edwin's own mother, the Duchess Eccleston of the lowest status in history, received cold disdain within the family, despite being the eldest daughter of a long-established earldom.

'And now you want to place the daughter of an immigrant peasant, whose bloodline you don't even know, in that position?'

The nobles already had plenty to say about Giselle's position as a ward, which was merely a charitable act. What would happen if they received her as the lady of the house? The entire continent would be thrown into chaos.

Edwin would be shunned by other nobles and criticized within his own family for staining the family's honor. Being excluded from the core of the nobility would cause great losses for the family and for him.

Edwin would be called the "Eccleston dog" for raising an orphan and then marrying her when she came of age. To me it was a beautiful love, but to others it was filthy incest—Giselle knew this.

Giselle had nothing without Edwin. If she could have him, she would lose nothing by giving herself entirely. Thus, she could endure any sign of disapproval, even being stoned.

'But Edwin wouldn't.'

The person who stood to lose the most from this love was Edwin, the one with the most to lose.

"Sir, is it really alright to marry me? Have you thought this through seriously?"

I ended up asking him as if I were a child worried about an adult much older than me.

"What does it matter? If I marry you, I marry you."

I couldn't believe such a serious conclusion could be stated so lightly.

"I just need to have you."

Edwin wasn't someone who spoke nonsense. Nor was he impulsive. And he was certainly not someone who played with people's feelings. I was certain I knew him better than anyone, but now I wondered if I should abandon that trust.

"Sir, I'm not dreaming, am I? Is this not a test? Can I truly accept the marriage proposal?" "If you don't believe me, how about I formally propose to you in front of everyone tomorrow? Then you won't be able to back out."

Even a formal proposal? Now Giselle had no choice but to believe he was serious.

"Ah, no, I want to marry you right away too, Sir, but now is difficult."

The thought of the entire continent going wild starting tomorrow left me dazed. This was a marriage proposal right as I became an adult. He would be criticized even more severely.

"Could you please wait until I at least graduate from university?"

By then, he would at least receive less criticism about "raising her to be his bride when she comes of age." In the meantime, Giselle could also prepare herself as a wife and Duchess. She could never be truly worthy of the position of Duchess, but she wanted to present herself to people when she was at least no longer called a leech.

"I can't wait that long."

Of course, from Edwin's perspective, it was a selfish request. The position of Duchess had been vacant for far too long. Furthermore, he was under pressure to marry soon. It was understandable that it was difficult for him to reject marriage proposals for four more years of bachelorhood.

"If you don't want others to know, how about we get married in secret?"

But Edwin simply couldn't wait to become Giselle's husband, even for one day sooner.

*'He loves me so much.' *

Giselle no longer hesitated.

"It's fine. Let's get married."

A secret marriage. No plan. No plan, but it's romantic. And since Edwin isn't someone who makes mistakes without a plan, she could trust him and take the plunge.

"How about this place?"

From then on, the two began planning a secret wedding on the fly. They would secretly bring a discreet priest here for a private ceremony and decide on the details.

"What else is needed for a wedding? Rings. I can't wear them, but they must be present. The clothes shouldn't draw attention, so I'll wear my usual attire; I'll make the bouquet with flowers from the garden. And. ah, the wedding march."

Since we can't bring a musician, should we skip it? It was unavoidable, but I was so disappointed that I couldn't say it and hesitated.

"The wedding march?"

Edwin also looked thoughtfully at the keyboard, so I thought he was considering the same thing.

"Ah"

Suddenly, he lifted Giselle, who was sitting beside him, and set her on his lap. He gathered the hair that fell to her shoulder blades and placed it over one shoulder, then buried his face in her exposed neck. Just as I laughed and squirmed from the tickle, Edwin's two hands moved to the keyboard and began to play.

He shouldn't be able to see the keyboard. As I watched his fingers, which repeated one note and then unhesitatingly moved to the next, my eyes widened.

"This is" "The wedding march."

Overwhelming emotion threatened to spill from my eyes. A wedding march that the groom plays for the bride who cannot walk to the music at the wedding.

'Sir is going to marry me.'

Now it felt real. Giselle finally began to indulge in the joy she had postponed due to worry.

No, in reality, it still didn't feel real. Wasn't marriage something she hadn't even dared to dream about? If it didn't feel so real, she would be happier that Edwin wasn't marrying another woman than that he was marrying her.

'That something so happy happens to me every day. It feels unreal.'

But, looking back, it wasn't just now—every moment had been like this. Since meeting Edwin, Giselle had been living a life that felt unreal.

'I must be lucky. No, Sir is my luck.'

I want to embrace my luck and cover him with kisses of gratitude. But, on the other hand, I didn't want the performance commemorating the marriage of Edwin and me to be interrupted.

Listening to it, I understood with my heart why this song had become an indispensable symbol at weddings. It is full, even overflowing, with hope and vitality. The confidence arose that I could make roses bloom on the path of thorns stretching before me. After all, they say that to obtain a beautiful rose, you must bleed for its thorns.

Chapter 64.

'I can do this. I'll be fine if I'm with Edwin.'

His two hands gradually moved closer toward the center, enveloping Giselle as he continued to play. The tendons in his hands, which struck the keyboard with force, were taut. Giselle, as if hypnotized, traced the back of his hand with the tip of her index finger.

Every time she saw Edwin play the piano, she felt the impulse to touch the back of his hand, where the veins clearly protruded. Starting today, she didn't have to restrain herself.

*'Ah.' *

Despite Giselle's timid interference, the performance did not fall apart, but the breath falling on the back of her neck became uneven. Even so, Edwin did not miss a single note or beat, so she didn't stop. This time, she placed her hand over Edwin's and laughed, seeing how small hers looked in comparison.

Edwin stopped playing.

'I won't interfere. Please keep playing.'

She quickly withdrew her hand, but a large hand followed and grabbed hers. Edwin placed Giselle's hand back on the keyboard and asked:

"You know how to play, don't you?" "Yes, but." "Marriage is for two, so you finish the rest."

Marriage is for two. Those words made the disappointment over Edwin's interruption disappear. How romantic to complete the wedding march together. Giselle began playing from the measure where he had stopped.

"Ah, heh, that tickles."

As soon as she started, she lost the beat. It was because Edwin's lips were wet and stroking the back of her neck.

Chak.

Then, suddenly, he bit and sucked her skin. Giselle shivered and thought she mustn't forget to put a scarf around her neck tomorrow, pressing the wrong key.

'How did Edwin not make a single mistake?'

She could be sure he wasn't indifferent when Giselle touched his hand. Beneath Giselle's buttocks, something hard, like a fist, began to swell.

*'Ah.' *

That thing beneath her buttocks moved unexpectedly, pushing Giselle upward. She gasped and lost the beat again. Although she struggled to complete the romantic performance, her mind gradually filled with vulgar thoughts and she couldn't recall the score.

The eyes that should have been on the keyboard were on the two hands moving slowly beneath her arms. She was watching as Edwin unbuttoned the cuff of his left wrist and rolled up his sleeve.

'Why is he rolling up his sleeve.?'

While playing the keyboard awkwardly and tensely, he began to unbutton and roll up the right sleeve. The tattoo on the inside of his left arm, which crossed in front of her, captured Giselle's attention.

A four-leaf clover.

Soldiers often got tattoos to show bravery and masculinity, but Edwin was an exception. He had never had a tattoo and had no intention of getting one.

She hadn't asked him why, but she could easily guess due to his aesthetic sensibility and his aversion to overtly showing desires.

It was for Giselle that Edwin changed his mind.

"Don't worry. From now on, Giselle's four-leaf clover will protect Sir."

Four years ago, when he was about to go to war, he got it to comfort Giselle, who was anxious about him not returning.

After four years, the four-leaf clover and the name Giselle tattooed next to it had faded considerably.

'Giselle. Bishop.'

She could still read the name without issue. But that wasn't the only thing she could read.

'What is this?'

On the inside of his arm, between the clover tattoo and his wrist, there were countless thin, long, interlaced marks. She had actually spotted it last night, but at the time, she was too busy being rocked to look closely.

She stopped playing, now completely ruined, and began to examine the scars that looked like they were made by something sharp. Although they were faded by time, they worried her. They seemed to be made on purpose, not from an accidental scrape.

'Could they be torture marks?'

They were very strange and unique marks. They weren't evenly spaced, and all had different shapes. There was no pattern.

'.Huh?'

There was no pattern, but there was meaning. Giselle read a word among the tangled, messy lines.

'Are they letters?'

At first, she thought it was her imagination, but when she saw the next word, she couldn't help but be certain.

"Don't touch, ah!"

Just when she thought that if she read a little more, she could understand the full sentence. Without warning, a knee came between her legs, spreading them wide. Giselle's legs opened too, losing balance and swaying forward.

Bang!

The deafening sound that erupted as she reflexively slammed the keyboard made her ears ring.

"Ah, ah, Sir, ugh, wait."

Delicate moans and pleas mingled with the loud echoes of the piano. It was because, as Giselle swayed, the two hands that slipped beneath her skirt invaded her underwear directly.

The fingers that entered from both sides separated the sticky skin and toyed with what was hidden inside. Although she had anticipated Edwin touching her since he rolled up his sleeves, the stimulation was more than she expected.

Giselle tried to close her legs as she had last night, when she didn't know this secret pleasure, but she couldn't. She grabbed his wrists and struggled to remove the hands between her legs. Edwin was unmoved and even slipped a finger inside Giselle without hesitation.

Tok.

"Ah!" "Did you want me to touch you?" "When did I say.? Heh, there, I didn't say touch me there." "Then where do you want me to touch you?" "Ah, ugh, it's not that"

The sound of flesh rubbing was already explicit; the fingers stirring inside her suddenly came out and climbed up the cleft. Giselle, who had anticipated where he was going, flinched, but it was useless. Her clitoris was already exposed, caught between Edwin's two fingers.

"Sir, ugh!" "Here?"

As soon as the tips of his fingers touched the protruding mound, she was penetrated by a sharp sensation and collapsed. She lost her balance and pressed the keyboard again.

Bang!

Every time a silent lightning bolt struck Giselle's body, a thunderclap resonated right behind. Soon, the groans of agony and desperate gasps were layered over the piano's dissonance.

"Ah, ugh.! Sir, wait, ah!"

When Edwin began to rub her clitoris, she couldn't even breathe, much less ask what was tattooed on his arm.

"You get wet faster than yesterday. Do you like it already?" "Heh, ah, ah, ugh."

Meanwhile, when two fingers entered inside, she even forgot what she wanted to ask, even about those strange scars.

"You also waited all day for this moment, didn't you? Didn't you?"

Truly, as if she had waited all day just for this moment, she couldn't think of anything but the climax. Now, nothing else mattered except the pleasure that Edwin's hands were provoking in her body.

"Don't stop, please. Keep going, ah, just one more time, ah"

Giselle began to beg him to touch her, just as she begged him to play. Without hesitation. Delicately. Precisely. Forcefully. The hands that struck the piano were now playing between a woman's legs. Giselle's body became an instrument, producing sounds following the performer's movements.

Chak, chak, chak.

The sound of friction as the fingers penetrated her interior was too wet; the explicit and loud sound resonated, making her face heat up.

"Ahhh."

Following the performer's variations, the instrument began to produce a completely different sound. When the thumb, which had momentarily separated from her clitoris, reattached itself, the moans were mixed with nasality. When he began to rub, her voice came out trembling.

What kind of instrument am I?

She didn't know. She had never heard of an instrument that produced two different sounds at the same time from two holes.

"Ugh, ah, ah. Ah! Ugh, what do I do.?"

At least she knew there was no instrument that shuddered and cried as it approached its climax.

"Sir, heh, I'm close."

The instrument, not the performer, decided when this improvisation reached its climax.

Faster, faster.

Following the instrument's direction, the performer's hands gained speed. The female body, abruptly rising toward the climax, resonated loudly, louder and louder, constantly releasing lascivious chords.

"Ugh, heh, ah, ah, ah, ah!"

A sharp sensation repeatedly coursed through her body like sound waves. Wherever the wave passed, the hairs simultaneously stood on end, while the sweaty skin broke out in goosebumps. The preludes to the climax were no different from the shiver she felt when listening to an inspired performance.


Chapter 65.
"You're trembling and biting your fingers. I'm going now." "Ah, heh, ah, ah"

Mastering my body in a single night. It was like a man playing the piano keys without looking after four years away. Only with the sounds emanating from Giselle's body and the sensations on his fingers, he played the keys of pleasure with precision and delicacy, leading her accurately to the climax.

Pak!

The tips of his fingers, deeply buried in her flesh, repeatedly struck a part of the vaginal wall as if they were keys.

"Ahh!"

Giselle, like a perfectly tuned instrument, reached her climax with a sound high and clear.

Although the echo of the climax that resonated in the hall faded, the vibrations in her body did not cease. This was thanks to Edwin's fingers, which were still inside her, keeping the warmth alive like an ember.

"Haah, hup"

His lips met hers, which were parting to catch her breath. His tongue gently stroked the delicate mucous membrane at the same rhythm as his fingers inside her. Giselle surrendered completely to Edwin, sinking deeper and deeper into the ecstasy he provided.

'I am happy. So happy I feel I could die.'

The pleasure accumulated within her body exploded, carrying away all the worries and burdens that had tormented her during the day. The only thing left was the happiness of having made love with Edwin. Intoxicated with happiness, her mind became numb, leading her to unrealistic thoughts.

'Everything is going to be fine.'

The thorny path stretching before Edwin and her wouldn't hurt, or perhaps it wouldn't even exist.

'Edwin loves me.'

As long as she had his love as she did now, she would only be happy.

Her eyelids, heavy from the kiss, opened. Edwin began to gaze deeply into Giselle's eyes. Then, his lips, which were touching hers, drew a long curve.

It was obvious that he had already read the feelings she wanted to express in her eyes, but she couldn't let it pass without saying it in words.

"I love you"

At that moment, an ecstasy began to reflect in Edwin's pupils, but.

"Sir."

Giselle called him out of habit. The instant she finished her confession, the growing ecstasy suddenly vanished.

"Don't call me Sir."

Giselle had also been thinking all day that 'Sir' wasn't an appropriate term for a loving relationship.

"Then, what should I call you? By your name?" "Edwin?" "Yes, if that's what you want."

Although the enormous difference in status and age between them made her slightly uneasy about calling him Edwin, wasn't a loving relationship something that transcended any difference?

Giselle, who thought Edwin also saw it that way, was surprised to see his cold expression. It was an expression he often showed in front of those who crossed the line, but never before with her.

"It's not that I want to treat you without formality as if we were friends. Nor is it that I want to call you that. I just want to say I'll call you whatever you want."

Finally, his rigid expression relaxed a little. Was there a term he preferred? His lips, firmly pressed together, parted.

However, he seemed to hesitate, as if he wanted to say something but didn't dare, and finally closed his mouth without saying anything, twisting his lips into a smile. Again, that smile that looked like it was weeping.

"What's wrong?"

She was afraid to ask, but she couldn't bear his cryptic silence and gaze, so she finally did.

"Who am I?" "Who do you love?" "Huh? Of course."

If she called him 'Sir' and told him she loved him, would he get annoyed like before? Giselle decided to express her love by kissing his cheek. Even so, Edwin's eyes remained cold.

"Do you love me?" "Yes, I love you more than my life." "No. You love Edwin Eccleston." "Huh?" "You don't even know who I am. I don't know either." "I don't understand what you're saying" "Would you love me even if I weren't Edwin Eccleston?" "Of course. It's not the name I love. I'd rather you had nothing." "It's not that." "Do you love me because I am the Edwin who rescued you from hell and raised you with affection?"

Although she hadn't fallen in love only because of that, was it wrong to love a man who had been like a guardian angel? Edwin ground his teeth and looked at her furiously, as if that were a betrayal.

"Am I not the kind Edwin you've always known? Do you still like me? No, you endure it because I am Edwin, right?" "Ah, Sir."

Under the pale moonlight, his blue eyes shone with madness. Giselle's voice began to tremble.

"No. I. No matter who you are, I like you." "What kind of human am I? No, what kind of being. Ah, do I even exist? Either way, would you love me even if you knew what I am? A parasite without a body, a leech living in another's body. Would you love me even if I were like you? Giselle Bishop, do you love yourself?"

Edwin called Giselle a parasite and a leech. Although they were words that could wound, his incoherent, madness-filled speech scared her more than anything.

"I don't understand what you're saying. You're scaring me, Sir."

When she was afraid, she always ran into Edwin's arms, but this was the first time she had felt fear of him. Giselle didn't know what to do.

"Could you love another man who wasn't Edwin?" "No."

Receiving a question she could understand, Giselle answered without hesitation.

"I thought so."

Edwin smiled. He didn't look happy. Rather, he looked desperate. Why? Giselle didn't understand again.

"Yes. You only love Edwin. What is it that I want?"

Why was this something to be desperate and mocked about? Noticing Giselle's confusion, he suddenly apologized, stopping his laughter.

"I'm sorry. It's just the aftermath of the torture." "Huh?"

Edwin made a shocking declaration as if it were nothing, then burst into laughter, as if it were incredibly funny.

"How about we make love?"

Giselle, stunned by the shock, allowed herself to be embraced without resistance. As Edwin lifted her and laid her on the piano, the questions she hadn't been able to ask swirled in her head.

Aftermath of the torture? She had heard that torture drove people insane. So, was Edwin showing signs of madness at night? Was that why he always went to sleep early?

Thinking that all of Edwin's strange behaviors since returning from the war were symptoms of madness, all her questions seemed to be resolved at once.

However, that didn't make her feel better. Giselle was too worried to be in the mood for making love, but Edwin seemed unperturbed.

Click.

The box of condoms that came out of his pocket opened and fell between her spread thighs. His hands, which had roamed her body, unbuttoned her blouse. The thin blouse flew open, and her bra was torn off and lifted over her collarbone. Her breasts, which hadn't been touched, were erect and red, swollen at the tip.

Ssss.

Now he removed the skirt that circled her waist. The panties, which had gotten tangled around her thighs from their earlier frolicking, were also removed.

'I didn't put them on thinking you'd take them off.'

Seeing her panties, folded neatly as if they were a handkerchief, tucked into his waistcoat pocket, Giselle's cheeks flushed.

What Edwin pulled out was not his penis, but a cigar.

Click.

With a somewhat nervous gesture, the lighter flame flickered on. The man's face, inclined as he lit the cigar, was illuminated with a reddish tone. The line between light and darkness on his face, previously only dark, became clear.

A man with two faces.

Suddenly, as she observed his face, where light and darkness coexisted, she remembered those words. She thought she wasn't entirely wrong, considering how Edwin was different by day and by night.

'Edwin, don't let the darkness devour you.'

But the moment the lighter went out, he plunged back into the darkness.

"Fuuu."

Cigar smoke floated like a ghost over Giselle's body before dispersing into the moonlight.

Pick.

Chapter 66.

'Why was the cigar band tied on.?'

His fingers crumpled the piece of paper as if destroying it, then tossed it onto the tin box between her thighs.

Sssss.

Not content with that, he even crushed it with the tip of the cigar. She had seen countless meaningless actions from him all night. Among them, burning the cigar band seemed the most pointless, so she wasn't very curious about the reason.

However, she lifted her head and looked down because the cigar was between her bare legs.

"Ah.!"

Just as Edwin slightly moved the hand holding the cigar, the lit tip pointed toward her vagina. Startled, Giselle lifted her body and quickly pulled her hips back.

She knew Edwin wasn't a careless person, much less someone who would purposefully burn others with a cigar. But she didn't know what kind of person he was when he was possessed by the madness of the night.

"Stay still. You must listen to Edwin."

The fact that he followed her, illuminating the space between her legs with the light of the cigar, showed that he was not the polite gentleman Giselle knew well.

"You're truly excited. You're already drooling on your own."

The walls of her vagina were still trembling from the impact of the climax. Because of that, the entrance to her vagina was opening and closing on its own. He watched it as if it were an amusing spectacle, tilting his head toward Giselle and burying his nose in her vagina.

"Ah.!"

Sssss

The sound of his deep inhale made her skin feel as if it was about to be sucked in.

"Haa."

Giselle shivered, simultaneously experiencing the hot breath escaping her damp sex and the burning gaze fixed on her face.

"Did you like Edwin's cock that much last night?"

Edwin used vulgar words with that refined face. She felt like a whore in an alley rather than a lover.

"Could you not use those words?" "Which words?" "That."

Giselle couldn't finish the sentence and closed her mouth. Then she realized that Edwin knew everything and was pretending not to know. It was a tactic to make Giselle say 'cock' herself.

'Is this also due to the effects of torture? Regardless, he's truly mischievous.'

Giselle tightened her lips and glared at him angrily. Edwin smiled as if he found her anger adorable and lowered his head. She thought he was going to kiss her, but his lips brushed her earlobe. As he did, he continued to murmur things she didn't want to hear into her ear.

"Giselle Bishop, answer me. Did you like Edwin's cock or not?" "Stop it. If you keep bothering me, I'll leave." "Am I bothering you? I'm asking seriously. Men have a duty to satisfy their wives."

Her spirit, which had been tangling up, unraveled at the word 'wife'. However, she couldn't relax the tension in her body.

It was because the tip of the cigar, which was illuminating her vagina, began to rise along her body, passing the mound covered in golden hair. The only way to avoid the red-hot tip was to lie down obediently on the piano.

Just in case the cigar touched her. Giselle lay flat and could barely breathe.

The red light slowly licked her sweaty skin as it ascended. The whitish smoke rising from the tip of the cigar spread over Giselle's body and divided like a hand, sinking into her white breasts.

She didn't know if it was her imagination, but the smoke brushing her pubic hair felt hot. Her skin, which had been soft as dough, now had goosebumps.

The tip of the cigar, which had reached the left nipple, did not advance further. Her breasts were the place where Edwin had left the most marks the night before.

She wanted to cover them, but she didn't move for fear of her nipples grazing the cigar. The red-hot tip of the cigar stared intently at the swollen, red nipple, as if it would burn it at any moment. The frightened nipple trembled.

As she watched the cigar's fire slowly dim, Edwin sucked the other end. She thought he was finally going to stop playing and put it away, but he tilted his head toward Giselle's chest and sucked the cigar. As if he were sucking a nipple.

The cooling end turned bright red again. Giselle's cheeks also flared and blushed.

"Haa"

He lifted his head and let out a long puff of smoke. Even that gesture resembled when he lifted his head after sucking her breast and took a breath.

She thought he was finally going to set aside the meaningless mischief when he moved the cigar away from her nipple. But he tapped the ash into the lid of the tin box between her thighs as if it were an ashtray, and then illuminated Giselle's body with the bright red cigar. This time, it was the back of her neck.

"An insect bite mark? Haa"

He, who had been staring intently beneath her neck, let out a mocking chuckle. Could it be that he was only just now realizing what that mark was?

"We must postpone the trip back to Richmond."

Both bringing up this subject now and retracting what he had said before were completely unexpected.

"There are still photos to be developed, but I had forgotten." "Ah. Then there's no other choice." "There are also photos left to be taken."

Edwin smiled at Giselle, who looked at him confused, and added:

"Your photos."

At the same time, the hand holding the cigar trailed over her naked body. The skin where his fingers passed prickled with a shiver. Like an ominous premonition.

"Don't tell me.?" "Yes. I want to photograph your body."

He stroked Giselle's pale cheek and let out a sigh that sounded like a groan. The corners of his lips lifted. Although they were symmetrical, they somehow looked crooked.

"Giselle Bishop, your face still smells like milk, but your body smells like semen. It is a very precious sight that will soon disappear forever. I must capture it forever and leave it as a gift."

She already felt exposed when he stripped her and laid her on the piano to examine her, but now he wanted to preserve it forever.

"I'll bring the camera tomorrow night." "I don't want to." "Only I will see it. Don't worry." "Sir, is this also due to the effects of torture?"

Finally, she let out the words she didn't want to say in the middle of their intimate encounter, where every minute and second was precious.

His words and actions were something Edwin, in his right mind, would never do, and he also seemed to hate Giselle. Clearly, he wasn't in his right mind.

"When you come to your senses, you'll regret it." "In my right mind? Giselle, I am in my right mind now. Is wanting to forever capture the most beautiful image of my beloved muse madness to you?" "No." "Is desiring you madness?" "It's not that."

Edwin looked so disappointed that she couldn't help but concede.

".Will only you really see it?"

He nodded with an expression of annoyance, frowning deeply. Meanwhile, Giselle's body, which had half-risen, was pushed back down by his hand and laid flat.

As they wrestled, the cigar fire that illuminated her naked body was dimming again. This time, he put the cigar into her mouth.

"Suck it."

Giselle, who had never smoked nor wanted to, hesitated.

"You must listen to Edwin."

Finally, unable to resist the pressure, she wrapped her lips around the tip of the cigar he was holding and timidly sucked it. She barely drew on it, but the acrid air filled her mouth.

She immediately exhaled it without inhaling, but the bitter taste lingered in her mouth. She scrunched her face and coughed, while Edwin affectionately stroked her head and praised her.

"That's right. Well done."

What was it that she was doing well? The end of the cigar re-entered her mouth, which was open to expel the bitter breath.

"I don't want to." "One more time. You're a good girl, my puppy."

Giselle shot an angry look at Edwin while reluctantly holding the cigar in her mouth. His current image was burned into her mind. Suddenly, she felt disgusted about holding and sucking the cigar.

"What are you doing? Suck it."

Edwin shook the cigar in Giselle's mouth, urging her. He held the cigar at groin level and pushed it into her mouth. Like a cock.

Edwin wanted her to suck his cock.

Giselle shuddered. It was because a buried memory resurfaced. The memory of several men pouncing on a woman at once. Since there weren't enough orifices, they would forcibly open her mouth and shove their cocks in, shaking their hips like dogs.

Did Edwin have perverse tastes like those soldiers?

But hadn't she enjoyed it when Edwin sucked her clitoris? She didn't know if she was also perverse like Edwin, or if everyone naturally enjoyed oral sexual stimulation. Either way, she decided that since she had received it, she could also give it, but the repulsion persisted.

'I don't want to do it like this.'

Stripping her bare and exhibiting her like captured prey, and then making her suck his penis felt nothing like an exchange of love.

Giselle moved her mouth away from the cigar and turned her head to the other side.


Chapter 67.

Edwin laughed briefly, amused that Giselle had momentarily fallen for his prank. Now, she felt a profound repulsion toward him.

'It shouldn't be like this.'

If she truly loved him, she should love not only the daytime Edwin but also the nighttime Edwin. But she was already afraid of whether she could handle his madness.

"You don't want to suck it? Then I'll give it to another mouth."

As soon as she knew where the other mouth was, Giselle was startled.

"Ah, Sir, no! Take it out!"

Giselle screamed and pleaded, but Edwin let go of his hand, leaving the cigar in her vagina.

"You obey so well. Unlike your upper mouth, which doesn't listen, you're a good girl."

He kissed the space between her legs and sucked her clitoris.

Ah!

Her body jumped abruptly.

Meanwhile, the cigar didn't fall out; it remained wedged in the entrance of her vagina. No matter how much she tightened to expel it, the rod, which wasn't as thick as a penis, didn't budge.

She tried to reach it with her hands, but both wrists were captured in the process. The man, who had separated her thighs with his hands, looked extremely happy watching the space between them.

"Why are you doing that? I should have brought the camera."

It was obvious that Edwin was not in his right mind. Even when the cigar's fire went out, he lit a lighter and brought it close to the cigar wedged in her sex to re-light it.

"Sir, why are you doing this? Sniff."

Even when Giselle burst into tears, he only seemed to enjoy it.

"Suck my cigar well."

Edwin tilted his head between her legs, which were spread wide in fear of the lit cigar burning her. His wet tongue pushed through her pubic hair and began to rub her clitoris.

"Ah, ah!" "Ah, ah!"

Every time the pleasure surged sharply, Giselle shivered as if pricked by a needle and held her breath. But with the burning cigar between her legs, the caresses were anything but pleasurable.

"Sniff, no, ah."

No matter how Giselle felt, her body reacted as if predetermined to Edwin's skillful tongue. The heat that had been boiling beneath her waist finally erupted and spread throughout her body.

"Yes, haa, you turn into an obedient puppy when you're sucked."

It was just as he had murmured while longly licking her mucous membrane. At some point, Giselle stopped struggling.

More, more, more.

Even, dominated by pleasure, she forgot the cigar wedged in her vagina and moved her hips, rubbing her clitoris against Edwin's soft tongue. When Giselle not only calmed down but began to plead, he released her wrists and grabbed her nipples. Every time her nipples, trapped between his thick fingers, twisted, Giselle's hips moved too.

His other hand slipped into the space where the cigar was stuck. She was so distracted she didn't know if one or two fingers were inside her, but it was definitely overwhelming.

"Mmm, that's too thick, ahhh." "Huh? What did you say? I can't hear you over the sound of your hole."

The superficially inserted fingers pushed as if crushing the protuberances at the entrance of her vagina. The sensation of climax, which seemed about to burst, quickly reached up to beneath her chin.

"Sir, ah, I'm coming, ah, haaa!"

The moment she climaxed without even finishing the warning, the walls of her vagina convulsed violently, and the fluid accumulated inside gushed out like a waterfall. Simultaneously, the things wedged inside her slipped and were expelled. As soon as the sensation of the foreign objects disappeared.

Clink. Crash!

The tin box between her legs rattled loudly. Finally, the cigar had fallen out.

"Haa"

Giselle gradually regained consciousness as her breathing, which had stopped for a moment, returned, and she felt relieved. Edwin lifted his head. The moment the hand between her legs also lifted, Giselle's face, which had begun to regain its color, instantly flushed.

The end of the cigar Edwin held was not only wet enough to darken, but a transparent thread also hung from it. The place where the thread of fluid connected was none other than Giselle's sex.

Although it was the product of a lascivious and dirty act, the thread of fluid, gleaming like an expensive silver thread under the moonlight, snapped. It was because Edwin put the wet end of the cigar into his mouth.

The cigar's fire, which had been going out, flared bright red again. Edwin sweetly smoked the cigar soaked with Giselle's fluid.

Before the vulgar and repulsive scene, the color drained from Giselle's face. When the echo of the climax chilled as if cold water had been thrown over her, her consciousness fully returned.

'He doesn't seem to love me at all.'

He definitely hates me. Edwin, possessed by madness, seemed like a desperate demon determined to ruin Giselle. It seemed that Edwin in this state would not hesitate to hurt her.

"I'm leaving."

Giselle turned her body and lowered her legs from the piano. Edwin's reaction was as she expected.

"Where do you think you're going? This is just beginning." "You are not in your right mind now. I'm afraid and I can't continue."

This time, there was no rebuttal that he was sane. Even Edwin, possessed by madness and lost to himself, knew that wedging a cigar into a woman's vagina was insane.

"You have your fun and then you leave?" "You can have your fun tomorrow when you regain your sanity." "That won't work." "Ah!"

He grabbed Giselle's waist, who was trying to stand, and pushed her back onto the piano. In an instant, she was lying face down on the piano.

"Sir, ah, let go of me."

She tried to get down, but she couldn't move due to the hand pressing her back. She even moved her legs, which were free, but they barely touched the ground even when she stretched her toes. Every time she kicked, the tips of her tennis shoes scraped the floor.

While Giselle struggled uselessly, Edwin held her with one hand and comfortably unbuckled his belt and pants button with the other.

Ziiip.

The sound of the zipper going down was heard. A hand appeared behind her and took the last condom from the box that had fallen from her elbow. The sound of the condom being placed on his penis followed.

Restraining a woman trying to escape and preparing for sex. This also looked nothing like love. He looked like a thug doing his business against a wall in an alley.

"I won't do it! Let go of me! I don't want to!"

Finally, Giselle did something she never thought she would do to Edwin. She kicked like a wild colt. Edwin, who had moved closer to penetrate her, backed away from her. However, he didn't release her.

The man, who had positioned himself beside her, grabbed the back of Giselle's neck and brought his face close to hers.

Giselle met the hurt eyes she never wanted to see on the face she loved unconditionally.

"Do you hate the Edwin who went mad from torture? Is that why you're running away? Yes, you don't love me." "That's not it. I love you. I love you, Sir, so please, love me too."

As tears streamed down her cheeks, her two legs went slack. As strength left her body and her head fell forward, she was lifted again. Her lips met his while she cried.

Before their lips touched, in the instant they brushed, the expression she saw on Edwin's face was burned into her mind and didn't fade.

'He looked like he was suffering.'

An expression that shared Giselle's pain. There was no trace of the demonic madness from a moment ago, only an extremely human face.

Had he regained his sanity?

Giselle also began to respond to the soft, comforting kiss. The prolonged kiss finally ended, and their lips separated. A silver thread stretched between the two lips before breaking. This didn't seem dirty.

"Can we continue?"

Edwin asked for her permission. That alone made Giselle forget her fear.

"Yes."

When he received permission, he kissed Giselle in thanks and pulled the cigar, which she didn't know when he had placed it, from Giselle's cleavage and put it directly into his mouth. As Edwin lifted his body supported by the piano, Giselle tried to stand on the floor.

"Huh?"

She was immediately grabbed and put back on the piano, lying face down. The moment she put her hands on the piano and lifted her head, a hot, thick mass pressed against the entrance of her vagina and began to push. Giselle quickly looked at him and screamed.

"Ah, Sir, I don't like doing it like this." "Why?" "This. is the position where dogs mate. It doesn't feel like making love." "You're right."

Chapter 68.

The cock that had penetrated her flesh suddenly withdrew, but.

"Ugh."

The head of his member snagged on the tight entrance of her cunt. The sensation of having something egg-like inside her made Giselle wince.

"Ah, ugh."

Giselle squeezed the walls of her cunt with all her might, twisting and pushing the flesh that was obstructing the entrance. With a tearing sound, her flesh parted. At that very moment, a furious moan, like the snarl of a rabid dog, resonated behind her.

"Ah!"

Two hands seized Giselle's waist and yanked her back. Unable to resist the strength of an adult man, the instant she was dragged, the head of his penis drove deeply inside her. When Giselle tried to stop him and twisted around to look, the man grabbed her tightly and thrust his cock in.

Clack!

"Ah!"

Giselle's buttocks collided against his pelvis. A long cock, more than a span in length, buried itself in a single, brutal stroke, reaching below her navel. Since the path had been opened countless times the night before, the penetration met no obstacle.

"Ugh"

Giselle curled into a ball and trembled violently. The tip of the rod had struck right against the deepest point of her erogenous zone—the very spot that, the night before, had made her forget her shame and thrust her hips uncontrollably.

It must be a coincidence.

She thought it couldn't be intentional. It was impossible for him to have aimed exactly for that spot in an instant.

"Ah, ah, ugh"

But feeling how the man slightly rotated his hips and rubbed that spot with the tip of his member, she knew it was no coincidence.

"Sir, ah, not yet, not yet, don't move, ugh!"

As soon as she began to beg him not to move, the tip of his cock retracted a little, but before she could finish speaking, it slammed hard against the bottom of her cunt. A flash of fire appeared before her eyes. In that moment, she understood.

He tricked me.

The gentleman was still intoxicated by madness. She couldn't stop, or even moan, completely overwhelmed by the force with which he was thrusting his penis into her. Unlike the night before, when they had made love slowly, intertwining fingers and allowing her to adapt to the waves of pleasure, he was now fucking her mercilessly, slamming against her buttocks and driving relentlessly.

Cluch cluch cluch.

The force with which he thrust her was so intense that the grand piano Giselle was leaning against groaned under her weight, as if it were moaning in her stead.

"What is this? Why are you using me like this? Ugh, what is this? I feel so miserable"

"Ah!"

While experiencing an inevitable ecstasy as she was repeatedly slammed on her most sensitive point, Giselle coldly evaluated the situation.

This feels nothing like making love.

It feels like a release. A man beside himself was churning her insides. She regretted it, but it was too late. Giselle, trembling with fear, tried to soothe him.

"Ah, Sir, ugh, I love you. No matter what kind of person you are, I will love you."

Even if Edwin lost his mind due to the trauma of the torture, I won't run away and will stay by his side.

Hoping to be a calming balm, Giselle swore an unwavering love. A cold laugh escaped the man's mouth as he buried his face in her hair, rubbing his nose against the back of her neck and whispering like a groan.

"Yes, I love you too. Are you happy?"

Although they were words of love, there was no sweetness in his tone. In his reckless movements, there was no trace of affection either.

"Let's get married. I will make you a Duchess. You will be the richest and most noble person in this world; no one will ever be able to mock you again. Do you like that?" "I don't need that. I only need your love." "Right? Now you can't live without my love, can you?"

Although it seemed strange that he referred to himself in the third person, it was common for him, so she didn't question it and nodded her head. A large hand stroked the back of her neck.

"That's right. You're a good girl."

Like a dog.

A spoiled puppy.

Edwin used to call her that, but it was a nickname; he had never treated her like a dog.

But now he was clearly treating her like a bitch.

It wasn't a misunderstanding. She just felt that something was fundamentally wrong.

Since hearing that Edwin suffered from the after-effects of torture, all his strange and inexplicable words and actions suddenly made sense. But even so, she couldn't shake a sense of discomfort, as if there was a contradiction that couldn't be explained by madness alone.

What was wrong? Giselle still didn't know.

After being repeatedly beaten into ecstasy, she didn't have the strength to think, much less to stand up. After the act, Edwin placed her on the piano. Giselle remained there, her legs dangling over the keys, completely exhausted.

Edwin sat alone on the piano bench, pulled out a new cigar, and lit it.

Click.

The lighter flared. Edwin's face lit up once more. Perhaps due to the dramatic contrast of light, his face, which had always looked like a carefully carved sculpture, now appeared pale.

The way he nibbled the tip of the cigar to light it evenly and the gesture of pushing his hair back from his forehead seemed nervous. Why? Was Edwin not satisfied?

"Ugh"

As he plunged back into the darkness, a cloud of white smoke rose between Giselle's legs. The moon had descended; the man was visible only by the red glow of the cigar and his faint silhouette. Giselle stared fixedly at him. He seemed to be watching her too.

What are you thinking while looking at me?

She had the baseless certainty that he was now showing his most sincere expression. If she could see his face, she could read his thoughts. But he remained only a shadow.

The red light disappeared. The sound of something being crushed in the empty tin can at the edge of the piano was heard. He had put out the cigar before finishing it. The light completely vanished, and even the contours of his face disappeared.

An invisible hand pushed Giselle's knees outward. Powerless to resist, Giselle opened her legs as he wanted. She thought that, being unsatisfied, he was going to subject her to another perverse trick. But what he touched was not her sex, but the keys of the piano.

Edwin played the piano between Giselle's legs.

A sigh of relief escaped Giselle's parted lips. Not only from the relief that he would not subject her to further perversions, but also from the euphoria she felt listening to the passionate melody penetrating her ears. Giselle enjoyed his performance as if it were a dessert.

Every time Edwin's fingers struck the keys, a hammer hit the strings inside Giselle. The notes pierced her ears while the vibrations shook her entire body. A chill ran through her nakedness, enveloped in the melody.

"Music is not only heard with the ears; it is felt with the whole body."

Finally, she understood the words Edwin had told her when teaching her piano as a child.

She suddenly remembered that he had also said that the performance, not just photographs, carried the heart of the performer. Giselle began to try and discern the heart behind the music. The more she felt Edwin's emotions, the colder her sweet ecstasy became.

'Why?'

She had the vague sense that he was now making a solitary and anguished expression.

Perhaps it was because of the piece he was playing.

Finally, Giselle belatedly asked:

"Why a funeral march?"

Post-Coital Interlude (Edwin's Perspective)
After showering, Edwin stood in front of the mirror and narrowed his eyes. The red, coin-sized marks that had been beneath his neck were now turning a dark blue. He had thought it was an insect bite or a rash, but.

'Bruises?'

How could he have injured his neck? He didn't remember hitting himself; there were no nail marks.

'Could it be his doing?'

Although he hadn't seen the lunatic lately, nor had he even heard his whispers or previous symptoms, it was possible that he had taken possession of his body while he slept and, under the influence of the sleeping pills, had somehow hurt himself. But the servants who kept watch outside while he slept reported they hadn't heard anything in days.

'At least it hasn't spread.'

Then, there was nothing to worry about. Edwin looked away from the mirror and opened the closet to choose his clothes for the day, frowning.

'What a mess.'

Chapter 69.

The scent of the cologne he used spilled out of the closet. Perhaps the maid in charge of the dressing room had accidentally spilled the perfume. Thanks to that, he didn't need to apply cologne today.

I pulled out a white shirt and light gray suit trousers, hung them up, and then ran my fingers across the waistcoats organized by color. My hand stopped at a light gray waistcoat. It wasn't because it matched the trousers well.

'A handkerchief?'

A handkerchief protruding from the waistcoat pocket caught my eye.

Of all the waistcoats, this was the only one with a handkerchief. That was natural. Edwin didn't usually put handkerchiefs in his waistcoats. Moreover, he didn't even own a light pink handkerchief like that one.

Pulling out the cloth he didn't remember, Edwin's eyes sharpened.

"Women's underwear?"

It was not a handkerchief. It seemed he already knew who the culprit was.

'It was one of the maids again.'

For some time now, he occasionally found women's underwear among his clothes. Although he didn't always catch the culprit, when he did, it was always a maid.

Perhaps it had some magical significance.

In any case, the maids who did that were dismissed, so the magic didn't work.

Taking his underwear or leaving theirs in its place was, in fact, one of the most common actions among women with ill intentions toward Edwin.

'This is quite original.'

It was the first time a woman had left her underwear in a waistcoat as if it were a handkerchief. Did she want him to go out and, in front of everyone, pull out a woman's underwear and be embarrassed? It seemed more like the action of someone holding a grudge than someone who admired him.

'A grudge?'

I couldn't think of anyone in this mansion who could hold a grudge against him. For there to be resentment, there would have had to be some conflict, wouldn't there?

I suddenly recalled having reprimanded the head maid yesterday, but Mrs. Sanders wasn't the type to hold a grudge over something like that. Even if there was resentment, she wasn't so uncultured as to do something so vulgar.

Tac.

The women's underwear of unknown origin fell into the trash bin. No matter who had done it or for what purpose.

'There is definitely a twisted pervert in this mansion.'

Today, the driving practice began with a five-seater sedan similar to the car Giselle would drive. Had the teaching method of taking Grandpa Coleman hostage worked? Giselle drove quite steadily and without mistakes.

"It's hot, how about we go get some ice cream?"

After more than 30 minutes of driving safely along the estate roads, Edwin allowed her to leave the mansion grounds.

"The destination is the Daisy Cafe."

A small café in the center of Templeton village sold ice cream in the summer. Although the mansion had ice cream made by the chef with better quality ingredients, when she was little, Giselle always insisted on going to the Daisy Cafe on hot summer days.

The road from the mansion to the village was straight and well-paved, and since it was a rural area, there were almost no cars. Along the way, they encountered a carriage loaded with sacks, but Giselle managed to overtake it safely, following Edwin's instructions.

"That sign means this road has the right of way. But you must always be aware of merging cars, because not everyone drives cautiously."

The road passing through the village was perfect for teaching her the meaning of traffic signs. Upon reaching the village center, Edwin taught her how to parallel park and, as a reward, gave Giselle an ice cream.

"Why isn't it a cone?"

Today, Giselle had chosen a vanilla popsicle.

"Because you might spill it." "If you spill it, we just buy another one."

However, Edwin realized that Giselle hadn't chosen the popsicle out of fear of spilling it when she opened the driver's door with the ice cream in her hand, as if it were the most normal thing.

"Giselle Bishop." "Yes?" "Are you going to drive while eating ice cream?" "No. I can't eat it anyway."

Giselle bit the tip of the ice cream with her front teeth, as if to prove her point. It was so frozen that it didn't even leave tooth marks.

"See? I can't even bite it." "Are you going to drive with that in your hand anyway?" "Shouldn't I practice that too?" "What are you talking about?"

It was nonsense that she was already thinking about doing other things while driving. Perhaps she thought it was okay because, in movies, protagonists shoot and kiss while driving.

"Movies are ruining the kids."

Edwin showed Giselle the palm of his hand.

"The keys. You, to the passenger seat."

Perhaps it wasn't the movies, but he himself who was ruining Giselle. He was telling the girl not to do other things while driving, yet he, an adult, couldn't stop looking at Giselle instead of the road.

'How strange.'

Normally, she wouldn't stop talking when she was in the car, but now she was too quiet. Giselle Bishop was the girl who would try to melt the ice cream if it was too frozen or would complain about it.

But now, she wasn't even looking at the ice cream in her hand. She rested her head on the open window frame and looked out at the fields. Her eyes were unfocused.

"Are you in a bad mood because I scolded you?" "No."

Finally, Giselle lifted her head and looked at him sideways before putting the ice cream to her mouth. It seemed it was still frozen, so she licked it and pulled it away. She still looked listless.

"So is it because of the heat?" "No."

Although the morning had been cool, it was no different now.

"My puppy, why are you so down today? Didn't you sleep well last night?" ".No, I slept fine."

For some reason, Giselle seemed to be gauging his reaction before asking:

"And you?" "Me? I thought I slept well, but since I have a strong craving for coffee, perhaps not."

Edwin had been feeling tired all day. It wasn't the same drowsy feeling caused by the sleeping pills.

"Maybe I couldn't sleep deeply because of the heat." "They say it will rain tonight." "That's good. I'll be able to sleep deeply when it cools down."

I don't know how this obvious sentence sounded, but Giselle looked at him with confused eyes before blinking.

"What?" "Nothing."

'What's wrong with her today?'

Edwin parked the car in the shade of a tree by the side of the road. This time, he didn't need to ask why Giselle's eyes looked confused.

"Do you want to take a picture here?" "Here?"

The spot where Edwin had parked was the entrance to a sunflower field as tall as Giselle. He had decided to take a photo here ever since they passed it on the way to the village.

Edwin grabbed a camera and a straw hat with a ribbon from the backseat. He didn't realize he had placed the hat too low.

He didn't realize that the color had drained from Giselle's face.

"Stand there. Now, turn your head and look at me."

The walls of sunflowers on both sides, the cool road stretching ahead and behind, and the huge walnut tree at the end of the road. It was a perfect view.

Except for the most important subject.

"I can't see your face. How about you move the hat back a little?"

Giselle did as he asked and adjusted the straw hat. In the viewfinder, her face with small, pretty features was clearly visible. But Edwin didn't take the picture.

"You're not smiling today."

He had brought the camera to capture Giselle learning to drive. He thought she wasn't smiling because she was focused on the wheel. But even after letting go of it, her expression hadn't changed.

"Is something wrong? Do you have any worries?" "No, there is nothing." "If you lie, Santa won't bring you gifts." "Do you think I'm a child?"

Click.

Edwin, an experienced photographer, didn't miss the moment Giselle let out a small laugh.

But the smile lasted only an instant. After that, every time Edwin raised the camera, Giselle acted as if she were in front of a studio camera. It was strange to see a girl who was normally not nervous in front of a camera acting so stiffly.

"You don't like having your picture taken?"

The girl who always answered no without hesitation now hesitated.

Was that it?

"Should we stop?"

She nodded quickly at this question.

That was it.

It was a shock to Edwin. It was the first time Giselle had ever seemed uncomfortable in front of a camera.

It wasn't that she had suddenly started disliking the camera as she grew up; it was just that today she wasn't in the mood to smile for it. Seeing Giselle act differently even when there wasn't a camera, he couldn't help but think that.

Yesterday she was close, but today she acted distant. Could she be upset because he told her they shouldn't hold hands anymore now that she's older?

Chapter 70.

However, if that were true, last night, after hearing those words, she had acted as if nothing had happened.

Giselle started changing this morning. Though sometimes distant and cold, she occasionally stared fixedly at him.

"Sir."

Sometimes she called him as if she had made a decision, but.

"No, it's nothing."

She also tried to retract the call a couple of times.

Women who used to like Edwin also acted this way, but today Giselle was different. She didn't look like a woman resentful because she wasn't getting what she wanted from him.

So, what was the reason?

Girls are complicated. But one thing was clear.

'She has something to tell me.'

Let's set aside the photographer's longing for a moment. It was time to fulfill a role that he had not yet finished, that would probably never end, that he didn't want to end. The role of an adult on whom Giselle could rely.

"Rest for a moment before we leave."

Edwin put down the camera and sat under the walnut tree. Giselle didn't sit immediately but hesitated for a moment before sitting a short distance from him.

"Ugh."

Immediately, she removed the straw hat and began to fan herself with it. Drops of sweat fell between her golden hair and slid down her white neck.

Edwin pulled a white handkerchief from his back trouser pocket. He paused for a moment before handing it to Giselle. He suddenly remembered the pink underwear he had unknowingly used as a handkerchief.

Giselle also hesitated before accepting it. Instead of using it to wipe away the sweat, she unfolded it and stared at it. When their eyes met, she was startled and looked away. Her cheeks instantly flushed, as if she had been caught thinking something she shouldn't.

*'She is definitely hiding something from me.' *

If he asked her, she would probably deny it. Edwin silently opened the bottle of water he had bought at the cafe and tilted it in front of Giselle.

"Do you want a drink?"

She nodded and reached out for the bottle. Edwin didn't give it to her.

"It's too heavy for you."

The glass bottle, as thick as his arm, was too much for Giselle. If she tried to hold it and drink, it was obvious that at some point, she wouldn't be able to bear the weight and would end up completely soaked.

"Ah, open up." "I'm not a baby."

She seemed to want to say that she was already an adult. After a brief struggle, the defeated Giselle finally lifted her head and gently opened her mouth.

She looked like a little bird.

Every time he gave her a drink like this, Edwin couldn't help but smile. Today was no exception. As he watched Giselle quickly wipe her wet lips with the handkerchief, his smile faded.

The hand that was cleaning Giselle's neck with the handkerchief slowed, and she looked up at him. Her large eyes seemed to ask why he was looking at her like that.

"Giselle." "Yes?"

When he called her with a serious tone, her blue eyes showed anxiety, but also curiosity.

"Your ice cream is melting." "Ah!"

What could she be thinking about to not notice the ice cream in her hand was melting? Giselle quickly licked the part that was dripping down the cone and then bit into it. It seemed that it was now melted enough, because she ate it without problems, but suddenly her face flushed, and she pulled the ice cream out of her mouth.

"What's wrong?" "Nothing."

She seemed to have many secrets today. Giselle shook her head and put the ice cream back into her mouth. This time she didn't suck it; she started crunching it.

Crunch, crunch.

The sound of the ice breaking was similar to biting a crisp apple. Thinking of it that way, it was like watching a rabbit eating an apple.

Edwin rested his chin on his knuckles and leaned back to observe her more closely. Giselle, who was about to bite the ice cream with her front teeth, suddenly looked up at him. Her round, trembling eyes also resembled those of a rabbit.

".Why are you staring at me so much?"

It was the moment.

"Giselle." "I don't want to."

The unexpected answer left Edwin disconcerted.

"What is it?" "What you are about to say to me." ".I had no intention of saying anything."

Edwin was only going to imitate what

 Giselle had done and ask her what she had wanted to tell him all day.

"Ah."

As she said it, she blushed again.

"Do you know what I was going to tell you?" "No, nothing." "Do you think that makes sense?" "Why are you acting like this today? How many times have you had something to tell me but held it back? How many times have I had to worry, thinking something had happened, just because you told me 'it's nothing'?" "I'm sorry." "Then, say it." "Say what?" "What you wanted to tell me this morning but didn't."

Edwin didn't press her further and waited in silence while Giselle hesitated, as if she was undecided about whether to say it or not.

"Actually. there's something I want to ask you." "Ask." "I don't want to ask it now." "Then you'll ask it later?" "When the time is right." "Isn't it something I need to know before it's too late?" "Probably not. or is it?"

Her answer became increasingly uncertain. If so, he couldn't wait for Giselle to tell him herself.

"Did you do something bad behind my back? Did you mess up? It's okay." "No! I didn't mess up!"

Seeing her jump up in indignation, it seemed it wasn't a problem caused by her.

"Then, did I do something wrong?" "It's not that you did something wrong, but."

It seemed it wasn't something bad, but it was a problem related to him. Suddenly, he felt a premonition that he shouldn't have felt with this girl.

'There's something I want to ask you about you. I can only ask it when the time is right.'

Thinking about it, Giselle wasn't the first person to postpone such a question. Edwin remembered the women who finally asked questions that could alter their relationship. He still didn't know if the intuition he had last night about Giselle was correct or not.

If he had learned anything from his past experiences, it was that when he felt he was about to enter a path he shouldn't take, he should immediately turn around and get out.

"Ah, I already know what it is about."

In that instant, Giselle turned paler than the ice cream in her mouth. It was the reaction of someone who didn't want him to know what she was going to ask.

"Sir, why are you so mean?"

Edwin mimicked Giselle's tone and gave a wrong answer, which made her laugh in relief.

"Huh? You laughed? Then that's the correct answer." "No!" "It is, isn't it? It's not my fault I have a difficult character, but I should realize it and correct it before it's too late." "It's not that!" "Giselle Bishop, be honest. Did you ever think, while learning to drive with me, 'poor the soldiers under Edwin's command'?" "I didn't think that!"

Giselle indignantly denied it, but.

"I did think it was foolish to ask you to teach me."

Finally, she confessed and quickly added,

"But thanks to a good teacher, I'm learning fast and without accidents. Thank you." "Ha, you just stabbed a dagger into my heart and now you're putting a bandage on it so I'll forget." "Then, what should I do.? No, a bandage is enough."

Giselle, who was about to ask him something, made a cheeky face and put the ice cream back in her mouth. How cute. The corner of Edwin's lips curved upwards.

"It's not that the teacher is good; it's that the student is smart."

It wasn't an empty compliment. Giselle drove so well that it was hard to believe she had only been learning for two days. And she didn't just learn to drive quickly.

"You quickly learn everything I teach you. You are so smart that you even learn things I haven't taught you."

Thanks to that, Edwin easily found satisfaction in teaching her. When Giselle asked him to teach her something, it wasn't just fun, but he also anticipated it with enthusiasm. By the way Giselle always asked him to teach her things, it seemed that, although he was sometimes too strict, he was not an incompatible teacher for her.

"Don't get overconfident just because I'm complimenting you. You're good for a two-day beginner. Here in the country."

She will have to drive in a big city full of cars, roads, and traffic lights. He couldn't help but worry.

"When we return to Richmond, we will practice driving whenever we have time. Never drive alone. Until I am sure you can manage alone, you will have a chauffeur."

Suddenly, weariness overwhelmed him. He definitely hadn't slept well last night. Edwin decided it was time to leave and closed his eyes, which were blurry and heavy.

He did not open them again. The moment he closed his eyes, he did not know that he had succumbed to the demon disguised as sleep.

Chapter 71.

The chatter suddenly stopped. Giselle, who was distractedly nodding while nibbling on her ice cream, glanced sideways and opened her eyes wide.

"He's fallen asleep?"

How tired must he be to fall asleep so quickly? Of course, after having secret dates at dawn for two days straight and getting up at the same hour as always, it was no surprise he was sleepy.

"Sir."

Giselle called him only in her mind. She didn't like that he had fallen asleep, but at the same time, she was glad.

"Sir, can the after-effects of the torture not be treated?"

That was the question Giselle had wanted to ask him all day, but in the end, she didn't dare.

If yesterday's madness continued, perhaps he should seek treatment. That thought occurred to her late, only today.

If it was madness, he would have to go to a psychiatric hospital. What if things went wrong and Edwin ended up locked in an asylum? She had heard that in psychiatric wards, crazy doctors cut brains and electrocuted heads.

No!

.Would they really do something like that to Edwin? With his power and wealth, being such a famous figure, the media and lawyers would think twice before doing anything.

On the other hand, the fact that Edwin was a famous figure was a big problem. If he acted strangely with other people as he did last night, the next day, every tabloid in the country would have his handsome face on the cover with scandalous headlines.

"Should I stay close to prevent him from acting like that with other people?"

There were no answers, only questions multiplying like rabbits. Instead of worrying alone, she should ask Edwin, but she couldn't because at that moment he was completely normal.

"I wish Edwin would just stay like this."

Yesterday, she only wished Edwin would kiss her during the day, but today she only wished he would remain himself.

That the madness only appeared at night was just a guess. She didn't want to mention it and risk the madness returning. Although she loved Edwin no matter how he was, it was obvious that she preferred the affectionate Edwin.

That was the reason why she didn't like him falling asleep.

The reason why she liked him falling asleep was not very different. Because she didn't know when the madness might return.

"They say it will rain tonight."

"That's good. If it gets cooler, I'll be able to sleep deeply."

When Edwin said that, Giselle sometimes thought that maybe he wouldn't seek her out that night, and she felt a little disappointed, but more relieved. Even if her lover chose to sleep instead of being with her, she felt relieved.

"I'll bring the camera tomorrow night."

That was because of what Edwin had said last night.

"Should I take pictures here?"

So, just as she felt relieved, her heart skipped a beat when he stopped the car in front of a solitary sunflower field. Did he want to photograph her naked in the open air?

Fortunately, Edwin put down the camera when he saw Giselle was not enthusiastic, but she couldn't relax.

"Fool. Why did you choose a popsicle?"

Wasn't this the same man who had handed her a cigar yesterday and had imagined putting his member in her mouth? It was obvious what he would think upon seeing her with a long ice cream in her mouth, but she didn't think it through.

Besides, after he mentioned it was melting, Giselle noticed him staring fixedly at her while she held the ice cream in her mouth.

'What if he asks me to suck it?'

So she quickly started biting it. After that, he kept looking at her with cheerful eyes, and she didn't know how nervous she was.

"Now that he is asleep"

Giselle slowly began to melt the remaining ice cream, without worries. Now she could admire Edwin's beautiful face without worrying about him suddenly pouncing on her.

"It would be nice if at night he would just rest like this and leave."

It was strange to think that she wanted to spend their precious date time just sleeping. And that on only the second day of their relationship.

It's not that she dislikes physical affection. It's that she dislikes this man always asking her for perverse things.

"I would be so happy if we could share a common, beautiful love and then sleep together like this, face to face."

Giselle took the half-eaten ice cream and lay down beside him. All the women in the world could see this man's face in the newspapers, but only Giselle could see him sleeping deeply. As she looked at his sleeping face, she couldn't help but smile foolishly.

He's mine. Edwin is mine. Only mine.

This man wants to marry me. He wants to kiss me, love me, and live only with me forever. I will pay any price to have his exclusive love.

"I love Edwin, no matter how he is."

She whispered a vow and, in that moment, softly placed her lips on his.

Edwin suddenly opened his eyes.

His pupils, focused and clear, did not look like those of someone who had just woken up. He looked directly at Giselle.

"Ah. Did I wake you up? I'm sorry, hmm."

The moment he gripped the back of her neck, her lips were devoured. His tongue, without hesitation, invaded her mouth, tangling stickily.

Kisses were always welcome, at any time. Giselle also responded to his passionate kiss, eagerly sucking his tongue and licking his lips.

"Ah." "Mmm, hmm."

In their excitement, not only their tongues tangled, but also their legs, embracing each other. She began to feel the pressure of his heavy thigh on hers. The moment she noticed he was erect and was startled.

Clack.

"Ah!"

Their lips parted, and Giselle was pushed back. In that instant, the ice cream she had forgotten about flew out of her hand somewhere.

When she opened the eyes she had reflexively closed, the shadow of a giant figure was already looming over her. Edwin climbed onto her chest without giving her time to escape, kneeling and trapping her shoulders between his legs.

His crotch was only a span away from her lips, erect and prominent. If he was fully erect, that distance would not only be enough to reach her, but there would be ample space to enter her mouth comfortably.

"I must have awakened Edwin when I kissed him."

Perhaps the madness also woke up.

Giselle watched the expression of the man on top of her with trembling eyes. Edwin's face was no different than usual. Although his gaze was more intense than before he fell asleep, she couldn't be sure that the madness had returned.

"If Edwin speaks, I will know."

In any case, she couldn't escape. She was trapped beneath him, begging for it not to be so, when Edwin finally spoke.

"Lick it."

What he thrust into her mouth was Giselle's index finger. Melted vanilla ice cream dripped onto her lips. In that moment, without thinking, she stuck out her tongue and licked it, cleaning his finger as well.

"Hmm?"

His fingers, which held her wrist, entered her mouth without giving her time to refuse. When she tried to turn her head, the other three fingers gripped her chin. She couldn't move.

"Mmm, mmmm."

Her pronunciation became clumsy, and words didn't come out well because his fingers pressed down on her tongue. The tips of his fingers toyed with the texture of her tongue, as if he were enjoying it.

Because they went too deep, she felt nauseous and used her tongue to push his finger out, which caused a pained groan in Edwin's throat. His crotch, more prominent than his throat, moved visibly.

Now he moved his index and middle fingers like scissors, opening Giselle's mouth even wider. It was the same gesture he made when preparing his entry, opening her intimate folds.

"In the end, he wants to put that in my mouth."

Although she couldn't see Edwin's gaze, she could be sure that madness had consumed him by the way his fingers toyed in her mouth and the twist of his lips.

Giselle closed the mouth she had opened obediently. Not enough to bite Edwin's fingers, but enough so that not even the tip of his penis could enter.

Edwin noticed her silent refusal. He laughed, "pff."

He pulled his fingers out of her mouth. But he did not withdraw.

His hand, wet with Giselle's saliva, began to unbuckle his belt. The button of his trousers opened before her eyes.

Ziiip.

The zipper came down. His cock, pulled straight out of his underwear, cast a long shadow over Giselle's face.

It was the first time she had seen Edwin's rod up close under the light. As expected of Edwin, it was straight, and as expected of Edwin, it was big.

From below, it looked enormous. It was hard to believe that mass of flesh could support itself with that weight.

"Something like that went into my belly?"

She herself was frightened to remember that she had walked perfectly well even after that stake had fully entered between her legs.

Chapter 72.

Now he was trying to put it in my mouth.

Giselle was already choking.

"You're good at eating ice cream, would you eat mine too?"

He thrust the thick column of flesh at Giselle, as if lifting her from below, and began pressing the red-hot tip against Giselle's closed lips.

As if rubbing her lips.

It was much larger and thicker, but its soft texture and plump, yielding touch were similar to a lip. However, it didn't feel as sweet as a kiss when it was crushed and shoved between her lips for intercourse. Her lips were tightly sealed, and her face was scrunched up.

"You don't like this kind of thing because it's perverted?"

Giselle couldn't nod her head honestly.

The man caressed me without being dirty, so I should do the same.

On one hand, she hated licking and sucking between his legs because it was dirty, but on the other hand, it was so good that she was convinced that sex was dirty in the first place.

I want to make you feel that kind of pleasure too. Isn't that what people call making love, exchanging physical affection?

So, if my appearance with you right now were love, I would gladly have opened my mouth. But now you look like a person who is merely releasing his desires.

And this is on the street.

Although they were in the middle of an isolated sunflower field, it was not a place where people couldn't see them. This walnut tree was situated at the intersection of paths crossing the field from all sides.

If someone had come, they would have seen Giselle, so it would be too late. Moreover, the path behind the man was hidden from his view.

"Huh? You don't like filthy things, do you?"

Giselle avoided the difficult question with a reasonable concern.

"What if someone comes?"

"We'll get caught."

It was a simple, light answer. I couldn't sense any concern at all. It was as if the fact that the Duke's sponsored orphan was caught in the middle of a perverse act in broad daylight wasn't a big deal.

Giselle doubted what she heard at first, but the even more shocking words that came out of the man's mouth confirmed that her ears were fine.

"We'll get caught if I don't cum before we do. You decide when I cum."

As he said that, he touched Giselle's lips with the tip of his cock. He was urging her to open her mouth and suck if she didn't want to get caught.

"Don't worry. It won't take long. I've been horny since you were sucking that ice cream, and now I'm about to cum."

He rubbed the head of his rod around Giselle's lips, who was paralyzed and absorbed in her thoughts, groaning like a man about to cum, then gave her advice that didn't sound like advice, but rather like pity.

"Giselle, I'm only telling you this because you're still young and don't know anything, but in the future, it would be better if you refrained from sucking or licking ice cream in front of anyone. Men see that and imagine you sucking their cock and licking their cum. And then something like this happens."

He looked at Giselle with a smile that made no sense, as if asking her, 'Do you think Edwin is a pervert?' Giselle, who was mentally shattered by the barrage of incredibly vulgar and immoral words, looked at him with a smile that made no sense.

"Do you think Edwin is a pervert?"

She opened her mouth to answer, but flinched and snapped it shut. The moment she opened it, she felt the tip of his cock, which was licking her lips like a dog, would slip inside.

While Giselle hesitated, the man, as if he had another urgent question, didn't wait for her reply.

"Do you still love me despite all this?"

Giselle nodded without hesitation. In that instant, the expression that crossed the man's face was far from one of relief. He looked more like someone utterly jaded.

'Why does he find it so repugnant if he says he loves me no matter what I do?'

Giselle blinked in surprise and saw the man smiling at her with a feigned tenderness.

"I love you too."

He looked at her with eyes that wanted to kiss her, but instead of tilting his head to kiss her, he brought the tip of his rod closer to Giselle's mouth.

The only things moving were her eyes, full of confusion and fear. Giselle's mouth, which was stiff as a stone, slowly opened. As soon as her teeth parted, the glans, the size of a plum, tried to penetrate between them.

The swollen flesh, threatening to burst, pressed against her teeth, which could barely open enough for one finger to fit. Giselle stuck out her tongue and slid it across the man's sensitive skin, where his pleasure was concentrated, and then immediately pulled it back. And then she asked:

"Do you still love me despite this?"

Some questions are only understood from the outside, but then resonate inside as well.

Will he see me as a vulgar woman if I do something indecent? After raising me as a lady, will he find me ridiculous, disappointing, repugnant, and stop loving me for being a whore?

Giselle realized she had been fearing this all along when the man asked her the same question.

"Ah, you already know how to drive a man crazy. You are no longer a puppy, but a little fox."

The man, who was trembling with the slightest touch, answered Giselle's question with another question, his face twisted in an expression of suffering.

"Why do you ask? You still love the man who licked you like a dog, don't you?" "Licked me like a dog, you say? It wasn't like that at all." "Since you didn't do it like that either, go ahead."

Then. Giselle opened her mouth, and a horrifyingly thick piece of flesh was introduced into her mouth. His dark blue eyes watched the spectacle with amusement. She had said no, but all she could imagine was her face with a man's cock in her mouth.

She couldn't help it and covered her face with her hands. He sketched a small, cute smile and wiggled his cock in her hand, urging her to suck it.

"Suck it like it's an ice cream cone."

She did as he instructed, circling the base of the glans with her lips and licking it at length with her tongue. The flesh was surprisingly warm for an ice cream.

The taste was no different from licking any other flesh. The soft texture was like lips, as she had initially imagined, but it was the volume that made it feel firm, not like lips. It's like when you greedily bite a thick plum.

Giselle compared it to a sensation she already knew and convinced herself that putting a cock in her mouth was just as normal.

'Like an ice cream.'

She did as he instructed, putting the glans into her mouth as if it were an ice cream and sucking it. There was a smacking sound as the tip of the cock slipped out of her mouth, followed by a gasp from the field above.

She wondered what her face looked like. Giselle put back into her mouth what he had put in and stuck out her tongue, sliding her fingers over her eyes.

He groaned, his face languid, like a man intoxicated with pleasure. His eyes were fixed on the face of a well-groomed gentleman or a man ruled by the instincts of the beast he had below his waist.

The instant she took his erogenous zone into her mouth and swallowed forcefully, his smooth face contorted into a grimace, and his body stiffened in a way Giselle could feel.

When the momentary intake of breath passed, he relaxed again into a languid expression and tilted his head back. His throat cleared further, causing Giselle to stick out her tongue in a loud, teasing movement.

'You like it.'

If you like it, I do too. Giselle bit him a little deeper and started sucking hesitantly. His reaction was much more subdued. Instead of savoring the sweetness, he made more faces. She thought it was because he couldn't bear it.

"Ha, not bad, but it feels better in the lower part of the mouth, because it doesn't have teeth."

As soon as she realized the true reason for his persistent frown, Giselle quickly opened her mouth even wider. Both her cheeks instantly flushed. Giselle's cheeks flushed even more when her tongue teased them.

'How does he do it?'

No matter how much she tried, she couldn't keep her teeth from touching his cock. No matter how much she tried, she couldn't figure out how to suck it without her teeth touching it; she didn't even know if it was possible to begin with.

He shuddered, as if he were about to climax, then shuddered again as if cold water had been thrown on him at the slightest touch.

'I can't. I need to finish this'

Ssssssss.

The sunflowers swayed in the wind. The rustling of their leaves against each other sounded like someone approaching. At any moment, a human face could appear among the forest of sunflowers.

My mind grew increasingly impatient, but my body did not follow suit. Suddenly, panic seized me, and my tongue stopped working.

"Why?"

Giselle pushed her tongue against his cock, barely managing to spit out the words:

"Can't you stop here?"

Chapter 73.

"No."

"I don't know how to do it."

"Really?"

The shadow of his rod stretched across Giselle's disconcerted face. He grasped the base of his member, soaked with saliva, as if strangling a neck, then pushed it upward.

The tan skin that had been retracted beneath the glans slid outward and overlapped the reddish flesh. He began to rub the foreskin against the glans, moving his hand.

"You just did this with your mouth. It felt so good I almost came."

She didn't remember doing it intentionally. Surely, not knowing what to do, she had done it awkwardly and accidentally.

"Well, do you understand now?"

After demonstrating it with his own hand, he placed the tip of his cock, covered by the foreskin, back into Giselle's mouth. This time, with her lips, she bit firmly beneath the glans, pulled the skin up, and moved her head slightly.

"Yes, you're doing well, ah"

However, he still frowned from time to time. Giselle was discouraged because she still didn't know how to keep her teeth from touching him.

'Maybe if I cover the skin like I did now.'

As soon as she had the idea, she put it into practice. She curled her lips to cover her teeth and took the penis back into her mouth.

"Ugh."

His reaction changed immediately. Giselle, gaining confidence, began to be more active in her attention. His body, which until then had been erect, folded over her as if he were about to fall. He even supported his hands on Giselle's head and moaned as if he couldn't hold his own weight.

"Ah, Giselle Bishop, you are such a smart student. You learn quickly how to suck a cock, you even discover things I haven't taught you."

Giselle's eyes twisted under the hands that covered her face. It didn't sound like a compliment, but like an insult. She could no longer listen to his praise about her intelligence with the same joy as before.

Was it right to please him so much, even while being treated like a whore? Doubt began to creep in, and her tongue naturally slowed. Then, he, who was watching her with dissatisfied eyes.

"Ugh."

Began to move his hips. The column of flesh pushed and slammed inside her mouth. Giselle, startled, turned her head. The tip of the penis, which was thrusting mercilessly, drove into the inside of her cheek. She felt her cheek bulge. When the member, which had been painfully rubbing against her mucous membranes, began to retreat, she finally had a chance to speak.

"Sir, please, ugh."

But the cock, like a stake, thrust forward again, blocking her words.

"Ugh, gah." "Ah, this feels good. It's similar to the sensation between your legs."

Because it's my throat.

Every time he moved his hips, the tip of his penis struck Giselle's throat. She was breathless and felt nauseous.

Giselle pushed his abdomen and thighs with her hands, but he didn't stop. Even when she gagged, he only groaned and pushed deeper, as if the narrowing of her throat excited him more. He even grabbed her head with one hand to prevent her from turning away.

Did he not see that the woman he loved was suffering? His madness had clearly crossed the line.

If the man violating her mouth had been any other lunatic, Giselle would have bitten his member without hesitation. If that was difficult, she could have grabbed a weak point hidden in his underwear and squeezed until it burst.

If it had been any other lunatic.

If it hadn't been him.

She did everything she could to free herself without hurting him. She knew it was impossible to protect herself from a much larger and stronger man without leaving a mark, but hurting him was something she could never do.

The moment he withdrew his hips, Giselle firmly grabbed the member sliding out of her mouth with both hands. Here it was thick and hard, so she thought it wouldn't hurt him if she squeezed it tightly.

He, who had been moving his hips again at his usual rhythm, let out a chuckle. He couldn't thrust his penis back into Giselle's throat because it was trapped in her hands. He looked at her with an irritated expression, as if she were doing something naughty, but soon his tense face relaxed.

Giselle began to suck the tip of his member desperately. She moved her tongue and quickly rubbed her hands against him, and he stopped moving his hips completely.

'I'm going to take him all the way.'

As soon as she felt relieved, another worry overwhelmed her.

'What if he finishes inside my mouth?'

She didn't like the idea, but she could spit it out. Her real concern was another:

'What if he tells me to swallow it?'

The man treating her like a whore probably wouldn't hesitate to ask her for that perverse and disgusting act.

Although she was scared, she couldn't stop for a moment for fear that he would start moving his hips again. She eagerly sucked the member in her mouth and quickly rubbed her hand against it.

"Ugh."

His eyes twisted. The muscles in his neck tensed, his entire body stiffened. The moment she feared had arrived.

'I don't want to swallow it.'

But he pulled his member out of Giselle's tense mouth.

'So he didn't intend to make me do anything so disgusting.'

As soon as she felt relieved, the reddish glans in front of her eyes opened and began to pour out a whitish liquid.

"Ugh."

On her face.

The moment she was surprised, she instinctively closed her eyes. She tried to turn her head, but he grabbed her chin.

He forced her to stay in place and continued to ejaculate. The sensation of semen hitting her face was so awful it could not be beautified by love. It was such a great humiliation that she wondered if it would be the same if someone urinated on her face, although she had never experienced it.

Plop, plop.

He spilled every last drop on Giselle's face.

Ziiip.

Then, the sound of a zipper going up; the legs that had immobilized her disappeared.

Giselle had to detect that he had gotten up only by hearing and touch. If she opened her eyes, the semen would enter.

Now that she was free from his restraints, she could have gotten up, but she couldn't because of the semen. Even now, the viscous liquid was running down her cheek; if she got up, it would surely stain her clothes.

'A handkerchief.'

She couldn't even ask for it due to the semen accumulated on her lips. While she was paralyzed, she felt his presence over her.

He was so close that she could clearly hear his laughter. Although it shouldn't be possible, it also sounded like a sob.

Then, she felt his breath. He was looking at her face.

'Don't look.'

He grabbed her hand, which was trying to push him away, gently moved it aside, then inhaled deeply.

"Your face, which used to smell like sour milk, now smells like my semen. It suits you well."

Did he not see the tear that escaped between her closed eyelids?

"It would be a shame to keep it just for myself."

Click.

The sound of the camera shutter resonated without warning. Her heart stopped.

'Did he just take a picture of my face?'

Although she covered her face with both hands, it was already too late. She shivered upon hearing the laughter that sounded like a sob.

He had always given her the best Giselle could imagine, and more. But the man consumed by madness always went one step beyond the worst she could anticipate.

She thought that, although it was difficult to receive his love, loving him was the easiest thing in the world. She was wrong.

He wiped himself with a handkerchief and then washed her face with water from a bottle. Although the evidence of their perverse act had been eliminated, the discomfort it left behind did not fade.

Giselle lowered her head and stared fixedly at her clasped knees. If she looked up, she would meet the eyes of the witnesses surrounding her. The sunflowers that had watched their act from the beginning looked at her disapprovingly and mocked her.

'Sunflowers don't have eyes.'

No matter how much she thought about it, she couldn't shake the abnormal anxiety. While Giselle struggled with her thoughts, he fell asleep again. Giselle stared fixedly at his peacefully closed eyes under the shade of the trees, and her gaze slid carefully toward the camera beside him.

'Isn't it normal to feel anxious about my face being preserved there?'

I must get rid of it.

Giselle leaned over him, careful not to make a sound. She extended her hand past his head. The shadow over her eyes darkened; if he weren't asleep, he would have noticed. But he didn't open his eyes. He was truly asleep.

I just need to delete my photo and put it back before he wakes up.

Her hand finally touched the camera. Just as she was about to lift it.

"Giselle?"

He suddenly opened his eyes.

Chapter 74.

"What are you doing?"

I needed to keep those blue eyes on my face. Giselle, maintaining eye contact with the man who looked surprised, searched for the button to open the film compartment while fumbling the back of the camera.

No matter how much she searched, she couldn't find anything. Seeing her confusion, the man tilted his head slightly and frowned.

"I asked you what you are doing, ah. the camera?"

As he tilted his head, Giselle's hand came into his line of sight. The man took the camera before Giselle could find the film compartment button.

The camera had been taken away. Surely he had realized she was trying to destroy the photos. Just when she thought all was lost.

"Here."

He handed the camera back to her. Giselle, stunned, took it and looked at him in disbelief.

Did he know I was trying to destroy the photos?

"What were you trying to photograph?"

He didn't know?

"I was just. curious about the camera."

"Oh, really? Ah, of course, the one I gave you before was a foldable one."

The man fell for Giselle's lie. He sat up and began to explain everything about the camera, even showing her the button to open the film compartment.

'As soon as he looks away, I'll open the compartment and quickly close it.'

That way the film would be ruined by the light, and Giselle's last photo would disappear.

"Do you like this one? Do you want me to buy you a rangefinder camera?"

Giselle nodded obediently, and the man, smiling happily, released the camera.

"By the way, how long was I asleep?" "Not long."

The man rubbed his wrist and looked at his watch, frowning.

"Why didn't you wake me up?" "You looked tired." "Did something happen?" "No." "Did I say anything weird while sleeping?" "No. You didn't wake up." "Good, then let's go."

He stood up first and extended his hand to Giselle, who was trying to get up. Unlike before, his attitude was more gentlemanly. Had his madness disappeared while he slept?

'Now is the time.'

While the man bent down to grab a water bottle, Giselle seized the opportunity. She quickly turned her back and touched the compartment button.

"Don't even think about ruining the film."

The man's voice was as gentle as ever, but Giselle froze as if she had seen a ghost.

'He knew.'

Creak.

She heard footsteps approaching from behind. The man's shadow fell over her, who couldn't move.

"Don't forget that on this film, there's also a historical picture of you driving."

He kissed the crown of Giselle's head, whose fingers were motionless on the button, then whispered:

"Don't worry. Only I will see it. I will cut the film and throw it away. I'm sorry. I won't take photos of your face again."

Finally, her heart softened. Giselle, determined to trust him, withdrew her hand from the compartment button, and the man stepped back.

"When did this bottle become so light?"

The man, holding the water bottle, turned to Giselle.

"You were the culprit."

He looked at the wet neck of Giselle's blouse and frowned.

"Did you spill it while drinking?"

Huh?

Giselle was confused. He had seen her wash her face from beginning to end, so why was he asking as if he didn't know?

"Why is there a sweet taste in my mouth.?"

This time, the man's murmur as he opened the bottle left her even more bewildered.

'Does he not remember?'

No, that doesn't make sense.

"Don't even think about ruining the film."

It was only a few seconds ago that the man had confirmed he remembered what happened.

'What is this?'

Giselle, facing another contradiction, felt her mind cloud over even more.

The Darkroom Revelation (Edwin's Perspective)
The closed door opened.

A room full of precisely aligned equipment and tools came into view. Without windows, this dark room was the darkroom where Edwin developed and printed his photographs.

He opened a drawer near the door. In the empty space where the film rolls were organized, he placed a roll with this week's date and Giselle's name.

Since arriving in Templeton, the photos he had taken of Giselle had already filled one roll. Although he wanted to develop them immediately and print them before returning to Richmond, he had a lot of work pending and decided to postpone it.

Edwin took a box with several film rolls from the drawer. All of them were from the Third War. He would have to develop all of them during his stay in Templeton to be able to select and print the photos in time for the exhibition.

He placed the box on the empty table and rolled up his sleeves. He prepared the necessary solutions and tools for developing and closed the door. In the total darkness, where he couldn't even see his own hands, he began to pull out the film and submerge it in the developing liquid.

An hour later, he turned on the light. The film rolls that had been in the box now hung like clothes on a line. He hoped they had all developed correctly. While checking the film as if it were a tape, Edwin stopped at one section.

What is this?

In other sections, the small negative images allowed one to more or less identify the scene, but in this section, the images were so overlapped that it was impossible to distinguish what had been photographed.

Edwin brought the film to the table and examined it with a magnifying glass. Then he realized that two scenes were superimposed.

Did someone take already used film and reuse it without realizing it? It couldn't be Edwin's mistake. One of the superimposed images had nothing to do with the war.

The nude body of a woman.

A photo where a man's hands grabbed a woman's wrists. Another where her ankles, with her panties on, were spread open.

Since seeing these two shots, Edwin's brow furrowed, but what followed was even more vulgar.

In a photo where the woman was kneeling, her wrists were tied behind her back. On her lower back, a word was scrawled: 'Bitch,' next to an arrow pointing to her bottom.

Edwin felt disgusted seeing the woman treated like an animal. He even felt pity for her, although he didn't know who she was.

Although her face didn't appear in any photo, it was evident that all the images were of the same woman. Not only because of the characteristics of her body, but because in most of the photos, her wrists and ankles were tied with the same embroidered ribbon.

A rose?

It wasn't a common thing, so he found it strange.

When, where, and who had taken these photos?

Given that the images were superimposed, the photos of the woman were the second exposure. In other words, someone had taken the film already used by Edwin and reused it as if it were new.

Only Edwin had the key to the darkroom, so no one else could enter. That meant this had happened before he sent the film to Templeton.

The most plausible explanation was that someone in his unit had taken the camera without permission, played with it, and then returned it to its place.

'There was a pervert in my unit.'

While looking for clues as to who the culprit might be, Edwin closed his eyes tightly and finally put the magnifying glass away. In a shot that captured from the chest to the waist, the fluids spread all over the body were so evident in the negative that he didn't need to see more.

'It's disgusting.'

They were not simple nude photos. They were explicit images of a woman having sexual relations, and from the composition, it looked like it was non-consensual.

Edwin, who initially thought of destroying the film after identifying the culprit, now hesitated. Was it right to get rid of a film that might contain evidence of a crime?

He decided to save the film in case the victim, whose identity he didn't know, needed it. He cut the images of the woman and stored them in a safe inside the drawer where he kept confidential photos.

A sigh loaded with frustration resonated in the silent darkroom. Among all the uncomfortable questions, only one thing was clear.

They ruined a valuable film.

He only hoped there were no photos of fallen soldiers on that unusable film. If the last images had been stained by a pervert, it would be a profanation of the deceased.

With a feeling of unease, Edwin was about to leave the darkroom when he suddenly remembered something and returned to open the safe. He thought he had seen the underwear the woman was wearing in the photos before.

The underwear that was hanging in the closet yesterday morning.

Chapter 75.

Despite taking out the photo and immediately enlarging the image again, he couldn't be sure whether it was it or not. He returned to the bedroom and checked the trash can in the dressing room, but, as expected, it was already empty. Now there was no way to confirm it.

Once planted, doubt would not wither, even if unfounded. If by chance the garment that was in his waistcoat was the same one that appeared in the photo, then the culprit would be.

"Lorenz?"

Someone who could access Edwin's closet and steal the film roll in the darkroom to take photos. Moreover, if he himself had boasted of being a pervert and was cruel enough to kill a person as if crushing an ant, he would also be capable of committing depraved acts, treating a woman like a bitch.

And hiding the evidence in places where Edwin could find them, like Easter eggs, was the kind of mockery that suited him perfectly.

When and to whom had he done that?

While the uncomfortable questions kept multiplying, Edwin at least felt relieved to have one certainty.

The woman on the film was not Giselle.

It couldn't have happened recently. Since he had returned to Templeton, Lorenz had not appeared. There had been no moments when he disappeared during the day, nor had he heard whispers, which were the prior symptom. At night, he kept him neutralized with sleeping pills and under surveillance, so it was impossible for him to wake up and commit such despicable acts on his own.

So, had he done that before returning from the battlefield, when he was in Templeton before going to Richmond?

Back then, both the butler and Loise had been watching him in shifts, so it was unlikely he would have been able to assault a woman without anyone noticing.

"Loise, bring the butler. I have something important to discuss."

He needed clear answers to get rid of those uncomfortable doubts.

Hey, do you underestimate me or trust me?

Either is ridiculous.

A parasite superior to its host?

.It's the natural law, I suppose. Only parasites that can overcome their host will survive.

This. is not funny at all.

It was the day the Duke and Giselle would depart. Amidst the hustle of packing and cleaning, busier than usual, the maids had to check every corner of the mansion.

"Bring all the ribbons or bows with rose motifs that you find."

The order had come from Mrs. Sanders the previous afternoon, and no one understood the reason. The maids checked every space of the main residence and the outbuildings, even the late Duchess's closet, filling a basket with everything they found, placing it in front of Mrs. Sanders.

"Is this everything?" "We had two people check each place alternately, so this must be everything." "I understand. Good work."

The maids murmured as they watched Mrs. Sanders walk away with the basket.

"What's going on?"

Actually, even Mrs. Sanders, who had given the order, didn't know its purpose. She had only received it from the butler.

The only thing she knew was who had given the order.

Mrs. Sanders left the basket on the Duke's study table and headed to the game room downstairs. The Duke and Giselle were sitting together at the bar, putting aside chess and billiards. Mrs. Sanders couldn't help but feel distaste seeing Giselle look at the Duke with affectionate eyes, only to look away and turn her head when she appeared.

She didn't know what they were doing, but she was grateful to have an excuse to separate them. Both were holding fountain pens and were sitting together, with a newspaper spread across the bar.

"Your Grace, I have gathered the items you requested and left them in your study." "Ah, good work. Giselle, I'll be back in a moment. Don't undo it, I remember everything."

When the Duke left, Mrs. Sanders cast a warning glance at Giselle and followed him to the study.

"Wait outside for a moment."

Edwin left Mrs. Sanders in the hallway and entered the study alone. First, he opened a locked drawer of his desk and took out a photograph. It was an enlargement of the ribbon that tied a woman's hands and feet in the negative he had developed the day before. Edwin began to compare the ribbons in the basket with the one in the photo.

It would have been simpler to give the photo to Mrs. Sanders and ask her to find an identical one, but that was too risky. Someone else might discover the woman's identity, and it was better for few people to know about the matter.

If it was the work of the demon inside him.

It shouldn't be.

In less than half an hour, Mrs. Sanders returned with the basket.

"You can return everything to its place when you have time. Good work."

When Mrs. Sanders left, one of the maids who was tidying up the clothes approached the blackboard.

"Wait. Now that I think about it."

The maid, who was writing 'return the rose ribbons to their place' on the task list, stopped when another maid spoke. It was the one who was ironing the Bishop's clothes.

"Didn't Miss Bishop's room have curtains with rose motifs?" "That's not a ribbon."

A maid who was sewing intervened without looking up.

"And the curtain tie-backs?" ".Do those count?" "I think Cathy took them home yesterday."

A maid had seen several tie-backs from Miss Bishop's room curtains in the trash in the morning and thought they were being discarded, so she took them.

"What do we do?" "I don't know." ""

They all looked at each other, not knowing what to do. In the middle of the silence, the least astute maid said what they were all avoiding:

"Should we tell Mrs. Sanders?"

The faces of the other maids twisted in unison. Mrs. Sanders was capable of calling the maid back from vacation and having her bring the tie-backs immediately. That would surely earn them their colleague's resentment.

"It won't be that big of a deal." "Besides, it's already a thing of the past." "Is this all for Miss Bishop's clothes? I'll take them to her room."

The maids quickly returned to their tasks. The train to Richmond left in three hours, and they had to hurry.

There was none.

Not a moment when he hadn't watched him.

Not a single time he had gone out.

And the rose motif in the photo.

All the evidence indicated that it was not the work of the evil personality. Edwin freed himself from the doubts that had tormented him all day and returned with a light heart, sitting next to Giselle again.

"Did you touch it? Or not?" "I didn't touch it. Don't you remember everything?"

Edwin looked at Giselle with skepticism before returning his attention to the crossword puzzle in the newspaper. The two were passing the time before the train by competing in a crossword game. Taking turns to complete a line each, the loser would be the one who ran out of known words.

"The horizontal 40 was definitely empty." "I completed it a while ago." "When I was here? Or not?" "When you were here. Were you mentally absent?" "Ha, I raised a fox."

Although it was clear that Giselle had quickly filled in the easy squares in his absence, Edwin decided to let it go and took his fountain pen.

"Then, vertical 75." "Hey, that one is mine!" "Since when? If you didn't complete it on your turn, it's mine."

The real fun of the game was fighting over the easy squares.

Tap.

Edwin's pen collided with Giselle's as he approached vertical 75. Giselle was blocking it. The black and white pens, crossed in an X shape, looked like two knights in a duel.

Giselle pushed Edwin's pen, and the smooth bodies of the pens slid against each other. With a slight twist of his wrist, Edwin quickly made his pen bypass Giselle's.

The sharp tip of the pen drew a line dangerously close to Giselle, almost staining her nail with black ink. Giselle quickly withdrew her pen, but Edwin made his way to the empty square, only to be blocked again.

"Isn't the generosity of losing to a child a virtue of adults?" "You are not a child." "Why are you saying what I was going to say? Goodness, how can an adult be so childish?" "This is not being childish, it's having a competitive spirit, Bishop. You underestimate a soldier's desire for victory. Do you think you can defeat me with force?"

Although he spoke seriously, Edwin was only joking with Giselle, without using force. He knew he should stop before Giselle got genuinely angry.

But today, he decided to end the joke before Giselle showed signs of anger. Just as the sunlight streamed in through the window behind the bar.

Edwin Eccleston.

Giselle Bishop.

The names engraved in gold on the black and white bodies of the pens shone together. Edwin liked the sight and sketched a smile.

It wasn't because of the name someone else had given her, but because of the one he had chosen himself.

Giselle.

It wasn't just a wish for her to live a life full of love and respect, like Duchess Giselle Eccleston from centuries ago.

The name Giselle meant 'oath'. It was a name that carried Edwin's oath. I will protect you until the end, without fail.

As the ink stained the newspaper, Edwin, mesmerized, brought his index finger close to the white body of the pen. He gently stroked the name engraved on the smooth surface, and in that moment, his fingers touched Giselle's by chance.

Giselle flinched. When Edwin looked up and saw Giselle's flushed face, he instantly paled.

"I won't take a photo of your face. I promised."

The whisper of the demon who used his voice to calm a naked woman who hated cameras resonated in his ears.

Chapter 76.

"Are you okay? Yes, I'm kind, too."

From that voice, unknown memories flooded Edwin's consciousness like a rising tide.

Tap.

The fountain pen fell from his hand. That very hand had written 'bitch' on a woman's body with a bright red lipstick.

The genitals that sprayed semen over the woman's body.

Click.

At that instant, the fingers that pressed the camera's button were also, without a doubt, Edwin's.

It was true, he was that damned demon.

"Sir, what's wrong?"

Who was that woman?

No matter how much he reviewed the unlocked memories, the woman's face did not appear. Nor was her voice heard. Although he was clearly using his voice to speak to her, the woman's voice was not there. As if it had been erased.

But he had not erased the sound of the woman's ragged breathing upon reaching climax. Nor the feeling of the narrow vaginal wall squeezing his two fingers. Nor the extreme, unknown pleasure that arose every time his genitals rubbed against the woman's viscous, sticky lips, nor the burning shiver that ran through him because of it.

Those sensations that the madman had intentionally left behind clung not only to Edwin's mind but also to his body, tormenting him.

Damn it.

When and how did he get out to do something so horrible to someone?

I must find it.

The room with pink bedding and blue curtains with ribbons embroidered with red roses.

No. What's the point of finding that room? It could be a clue to the woman's identity, but discovering the truth can wait.

I must call Dr. Fletcher. No, the doctor can't help him right now.

Loise. Yes, I must call Lois first. I must watch him every second from now on and send Giselle alone to Richmond.

Giselle.

It was then that Edwin realized there was something more important he had to do first.

Get away from Giselle.

"Sir." "Stay here."

He didn't have time to reassure her with lies that nothing was wrong. Edwin left Giselle, who was looking at him perplexed, and rushed out of the game room.

Far, far away from Giselle.

He quickly crossed the empty hallway and went up the stairs in one stride. Now it was his turn to warn Lois.

'That guy is still alive.'

That cunning leech was only pretending to be dead. To bite harder when Edwin let down his guard. He had been quietly waiting for the right moment.

Why right now?

Doubt arose, but he didn't have time to resolve it. With his eyes fixed on his wrist watch, he quickly entered his office and headed straight for the desk. His hand stopped in the air, just a foot away from the phone on the desk, ready to call Loise.

The blue ribbon tied to the receiver looked familiar. The rose embroidery. It was the same curtain ribbon that had tied the woman's limbs in his memories.

His trembling eyes slowly descended from the evidence of the vile act to the notepad placed in front of the phone. That demon's crooked handwriting captured Edwin's attention.

Did you find this?

When on earth did he leave this here?

It wasn't the only thing that wasn't there when he visited the office a moment ago.

A box of condoms.

Edwin's face began to redden with anger upon discovering the small box in the center of the desk. It was clearly something he had left at the Richmond house. Not only was it in Templeton, but it was also empty.

In the place where three condoms should have been, there was a pale pink undergarment neatly folded. It was clearly the same one that had been tucked into his waistcoat.

Although he already knew what it meant, the guy took the trouble to explain it with a letter placed beneath the box.

Why didn't you buy more? It would have satisfied all your pent-up desires.

While releasing your primitive desires, how about we get closer like the primitives and leave it inside?

Don't worry. I thought about it, but I didn't do it. That's something you, as a civilized man, must decide, not me.

You didn't care, so you didn't know, but I am very thoughtful. Of course, you must be more curious about someone else.

Don't you wonder who that lady of deep feelings is who stole your precious virginity and gave you hers unreservedly?

It's curious, but that doesn't change what the priority is right now.

I must warn Loise first.

Edwin picked up the receiver tied with the curtain ribbon. His hand stopped as he tried to dial. The dial disc was gone. No, the phone. The sunlight illuminating the office, too.

Only when he saw the gloomy, reddish space before his eyes did Edwin realize. He was in the darkroom. The moment he tried to make the call, the demon had taken his body and led him there.

He checked his wrist watch. Not even five minutes had passed. That meant he had come directly here without diverting.

Unless that cunning cheater had manipulated the hands.

That guy appeared without warning now, so manipulating the clock hands wouldn't be difficult.

He tried to leave the darkroom immediately, but the door wasn't there. Only the table that had been in front of him when he regained consciousness in the darkroom.

No matter how much he turned, he only saw the same table. Every time Edwin tried to leave, the demon took his body and brought him back in front of the table. He was forcing him to solve the riddle he had left.

On the table there was a sheet of photographic paper and a metal tray with liquid. There was no note, but the message the guy had left was clear.

'Dip this into the developer. Then you will see the identity of the woman.'

Will he leave me alone if I do what he says? No.

Edwin didn't fall into the demon's trap. He picked up the darkroom phone. The next instant, he had the photographic paper in his hand instead of the phone.

He put down the paper and reached for the phone. Again, and again. Every time he regained consciousness, he tried again and again. Although he failed, he didn't give up. Finally, the guy hid the phone.

This time he tried to tear up the photographic paper. Although he kept losing control of his body and failing, he didn't stop resisting.

The invader in his head was clearly tired of his stubbornness. Although just as stubborn, he wouldn't give up.

He lost control of his body again, and when he regained it, the paper was no longer on the table. It was submerged in the developer.

A black image began to appear on the white surface. It became clearer and clearer.

It was a face.

A face covered by something repulsive he could guess.

'.Giselle?'

A tear that fell from his wide-open eyes created ripples on the familiar face.

The woman that the demon who had possessed Edwin had violated was none other than the young woman he had sworn to protect at all costs.

His face contorted in pain. Not even the cruelest torture he had suffered in the prison camp had tormented him as much as this.

His legs, which had never faltered in the face of a mortal threat, lost strength. The man who looked like an unshakable fortress collapsed.

Ugh.

The desperate face suddenly smiled. Tap. A hand rested on the table. The kneeling body slowly rose.

Meanwhile, the man's laughter resonating in the red room became increasingly maddening. The heart-wrenching scream of the man trapped in the black room of his mind was too sweet to bear.

"Ah. Yes, this is it."

The man shuddered as he tilted his head back, tightening the muscles in his neck. As he had done the moment he had defiled the young woman that the owner of that proud body so cherished. And in doing so, he had also defiled Edwin Eccleston, who had received undeserved praise for being an angel. It was natural that he now felt comparable ecstasy.

"Uf."

As he had done after violating Giselle Bishop, he took out a cigar and brought it to his mouth. Unlike the climax of pleasure, the scream in his mind did not cease. His eyes, which were slowly closing as he enjoyed the endless pleasure, opened completely upon seeing the face in the photo that was now clear.

"Honey, why are you making that face? You should be happy that Edwin has also fallen to the level of a common human."

The man took out the photo and wiped the developer off the damp face with a handkerchief. As he had done after cleaning the semen from that face.

"How pretty. What a shame."

Hiss.

Although she was about to cry with the semen covering her face, the ridiculously pretty face made him feel disgust. He burned it with the lit tip of the cigar. The photo, now unrecognizable, was thrown into the trash.

"A gentleman must keep his promises to a lady."

Chapter 77.
From the negative of that photo to the negative of a faceless nude stored in a safe, everything was burned and reduced to ashes. Thus, the photos disappeared, but in the memory of Edwin Eccleston, they would remain forever.

Of course, that memory could also be erased, but what parasite would dare to show mercy to its host? It would be unbearable arrogance.

After finishing cleaning up the mess, he slowly enjoyed his cigar while savoring the screams in his mind. They sounded better than the waltz he had danced with that woman.

"It's a shame, but for today we're finished here."

As he extinguished the cigar's flame, he also silenced Edwin Eccleston's voice.

"I plan to hold a party tonight. Just the two of us."

I hate interruptions from unwanted guests. The intruder will fall into a deep sleep until I decide to look for him again. He will completely forget the pain of the blood boiling in his veins.

"Don't worry. You'll have plenty, plenty of time to suffer. Probably. until the day you die."

Magnolia Terrace
As its name suggests, this luxury neighborhood, with magnolias lining both sides of the street, was quiet and peaceful, despite being located in a bustling city.

Even in such a quiet neighborhood, Giselle's house was on a corner, sharing a wall with only one neighboring house, its backyard facing a lake, which made it less visible to prying eyes.

It was the perfect place for a secret retreat for the two of them.

Edwin's meticulousness was not only reflected in the location of the house. The interior was completely renovated according to the latest trends, making it not feel like an old house.

"How sturdy. Although maybe I should have bought you a weapon."

The first-floor windows had security shutters, like those seen in storefronts. It really was typical of Edwin, always worried.

"Every night, I will call to make sure you have locked the doors properly and lowered all the shutters. If you don't want me to come in the middle of the night, answer."

So, wouldn't it be better not to answer? If Edwin stayed here every night, she wouldn't have to worry about robbers.

Could it be because of the maid who lives here?

While inspecting her room on the third floor, Giselle took a frame from the bedside table. Inside was a photo from her graduation day at Fullerton Academy, taken with Edwin. He himself had developed it and put it there. Suddenly, her heart filled with emotion.

"Sir."

He hates words of thanks.

Giselle took advantage of the maid's absence and gave him a surprise kiss. After stealing a kiss, she tried to pull away, but he grabbed her and bit her lips.

'Sir, the maid is coming!'

Only when she heard footsteps coming up the stairs did their lips separate. Giselle quickly wiped the trace of lipstick from his lips with her hand and fled to the dressing room.

While touching up her makeup in front of the mirror, she heard Edwin and the maid talking outside. She couldn't hear well what they were talking about. When she finished getting ready and came out, the maid was gone, and Edwin was alone.

"Sir." "Yes?" "Will the maid live here from today? Couldn't we change that and have her come and go?"

Instead of answering, he gave her an ambiguous smile, which didn't clarify whether it was a yes or a no. After insisting, he finally pressed his lips against Giselle's, as if wanting to silence her. The lipstick transferred to his lips. He pushed Giselle's hand away, which was trying to clean it before the maid saw, and licked his lips as he answered.

"I gave her the day off today."

That meant he would stay tonight. Although he didn't answer her question directly, Giselle was satisfied.

Edwin had not brought his bodyguards or the chauffeur, so tonight would be just for the two of them. They had dinner at a nearby restaurant and walked back home under the twilight. It was the romantic date Giselle had always dreamed of.

'I wish every day were like today.'

Today there were no signs of his madness. Although he showed strange behavior in the morning, he said it was because he remembered something urgent he had completely forgotten.

However, right after returning home, Edwin changed, but it wasn't because of his madness, but because of.

"Ah, Sir! No, I don't want this! "No. Today I won't let you go, even if you say no." "Have you ever let me go? Let me shower first!"

It was lust.

Giselle managed to shake off the man who pounced on her like a beast and fled to the bathroom attached to her room on the third floor. After washing carefully, she went out to the dressing room and began to think.

'What should I wear?'

It was too early to put on pajamas, but if she dressed completely, she knew her clothes would be taken off as soon as she came out.

'Ah, the robe!'

While checking the closet full of her clothes, which the maid had already moved, Giselle pulled out a nightgown robe. She remembered the female protagonists in movies who wore robes to create an intimate atmosphere with men.

With only her panties on, the soft silk clung to her body, revealing her figure as if she were wearing nothing. The body she saw in the mirror was exactly that of the mature and sensual woman Giselle had been dreaming of lately.

But when her gaze moved up to her neck, her satisfied smile faded. Her face still had that youthful, clearly childish appearance.

I don't like it.

Although Edwin liked that clumsy appearance, which was neither girl nor woman.

"Your face still smells like milk, but your body smells like sex, Giselle Bishop. It's a beautiful appearance that won't last long."

But was that statement made during an episode of madness his true feeling?

From outside the room, a slow-tempo jazz melody began to be heard. Edwin had turned on the record player.

'Don't ruin a good night with bad thoughts.'

Giselle quickly shook off those disturbing thoughts and opened the other closet. She took out a suit, a gown, and a mortarboard, and hung them on a hanger outside. They were the garments she would wear tomorrow at the Kingsbridge entrance ceremony.

Remembering the nights she had spent with Edwin, she knew that as soon as she left that room, she wouldn't be able to get out of bed until the next morning. So, after preparing everything for the morning, Giselle opened the bedroom door.

The man was sitting in the armchair by the window, legs crossed, his gaze turning to her. Edwin stared at her, as if recording her image in his mind. A satisfied smile spread across his lips.

"Now you're a woman, too, huh?"

Would she seem uncomfortable in Edwin's eyes? Giselle began to feel embarrassed, but it turned out to be an unnecessary worry.

"It suits you well."

He extended his hand to Giselle, who had been gently tapping her knee to the rhythm of the jazz. When she took his hand, he pulled her towards him and sat her on his lap. She expected him to take her straight to bed, but this was unexpected.

"Today is a day for a toast."

Edwin, as if he had read her thoughts, replied while taking an uncorked bottle of wine from the bedside table. When she opened the bedroom door, she had noticed a sweet and sour aroma, but she didn't know it was wine.

"Today? But I have to wake up early tomorrow. I want to be sober for the entrance ceremony."

Giselle suspected that the mistakes she made while learning to drive on her birthday were due to the hangover from the champagne she had drunk that morning.

"Just one glass."

Edwin poured wine into two glasses, filling them only halfway, and handed one to Giselle.

"Just a toast."

Finally, Giselle took the glass and asked:

"But what are we toasting to?"

He clinked his glass with hers and replied with words of celebration.

"Congratulations on your admission, Giselle. Soon you will become the first woman to graduate from Fullerton and Kingsbridge, as Duchess Eccleston."

His surprising toast almost made her scream with excitement. But it wasn't the unexpected celebration that moved her so much.

'Edwin remembered the marriage promise.'

After making the marriage promise, Giselle learned that Edwin suffered from episodes of madness. Since then, he had never mentioned marriage, and Giselle had begun to doubt whether he remembered what happened during those episodes.

So, had he forgotten the marriage promise? She had been worrying in vain, but it was not so.

Chapter 78.
So happy she couldn't contain herself, Giselle didn't give him time to bring the toasting glass to his lips before lunging to kiss him. After their lips parted, he emptied the celebration glass in one gulp. Giselle, who felt her spirits soaring so high that tomorrow's worries seemed minor, also emptied her glass, following suit.

'Didn't you say it would only be one glass?'

The man poured more wine into the empty glass. This time, a little more than before.

Giselle's glass wavered when the man clinked his against hers. The toast was not yet over.

"I also have something to celebrate."

A smile of relief, as if he had fulfilled a long-cherished wish, illuminated his face. Giselle felt that this was what he truly wanted to celebrate.

"Then, we must toast to that," Giselle said, raising her glass with a willingness to celebrate anything.

"What is it?" "Do you want to know?" "Yes, of course."

If it was good news for him, it would be good news for me too.

"There's someone who has always called me a leech or a parasite, treating me as if I weren't human."

The smile on Giselle's face instantly vanished. She had expected something good, but this was not it.

'How dare they? To treat the most wonderful man in the world as if he were an insect? Has he received the same insults as me?'

Anger flared in her. She forgot her mantra: 'Calmly, elegantly,' which she repeated every time she was insulted.

"Who is it?" she asked, clenching her fists as if ready to punch that insolent person at that very moment.

Edwin calmed her down, stroking her clenched fist.

"It's alright. I've already taken revenge."

Only then did Giselle relax her fist, but her expression remained tense. The man in front of her was smiling too contentedly.

He seemed frivolous.

It was unlike him.

Was he someone who held grudges or feelings of inferiority towards others? Wasn't he someone who, even if disappointed or disillusioned by the insults of others, never clung to them enough to seek revenge?

"I completely destroyed him, ruthlessly."

Even if it was just returning what he had received, gloating over someone's misfortune was not characteristic of him.

"Even down to the girl he most wanted."

He had even carried his revenge to an innocent person. Giselle couldn't believe that the righteous and kind man she knew had done something so close to evil. Suddenly, a thought scared her.

'Could his madness have returned?'

She looked at him with fearful eyes, while he observed her with a loving gaze.

"Honey."

But in his sweet voice and in his warm touch as he caressed her face, there was no trace of madness.

"You are beautiful. So beautiful it hurts."

His smile had faded, now his eyes seemed downcast, as if he were truly sad.

"Why does it hurt that I am beautiful?" "Because your lap is so warm that I almost abandoned my revenge."

It was unclear if it was a direct answer or a monologue unrelated to Giselle's question.

What did his revenge against that insolent person have to do with me?

While his hand caressed her perplexed face, it began to descend. It grazed her nape and then slid under the fabric of her robe.

Ssshh.

The silk opened under his hand, sliding over her shoulders until it was trapped at her elbows. The front of the robe stopped right at the tips of her breasts, but when he slipped his hand in, it fell completely.

"Ah." Giselle moaned when his palm brushed her nipple, shrinking at the sensation. Since her birthday, he hadn't stopped touching her; her breasts had been sensitive all this time.

It seemed that he liked to see her shudder, because he kept touching her. Now, he filled his hand with the soft flesh and gently caressed it, twisting the nipple from time to time. He buried his face in her cleavage, smelling her scent, and suddenly bit the swollen and reddish tip.

"Mmm. Sir. there, ah!"

His hand, which had slid between her thighs, pressed and rubbed the center of her satin panties.

"Ahhh" "You're wet."

The tips of his fingers, which had not entered her underwear, glistened wetly.

"It's time to clink more than just glasses," he said, lifting her in his arms and carrying her towards the bed.

As they headed to the bed, Giselle's curious eyes fell on the bedside table.

'What's in that letter?'

Since she sat on his lap, she had been curious about the thick envelope resting on the bedside table. It wasn't placed randomly, but leaning against a frame with a photo of the two of them, as if it were for someone.

'I thought it was for me.'

But he didn't mention the letter; he simply laid her down on the bed.

What is he thinking? He stood in front of the bed, looking at her with thoughtful eyes, before opening his firmly sealed lips.

"Undress."

Although the commanding tone seemed strange to her, Giselle obeyed without hesitation. She removed the robe that was neither fully on nor fully off, then slid out of her panties with her own hands. He watched her with a look of satisfaction.

Completely naked, she lay down obediently, waiting for him to get on top of her. But a second command came.

"Undress me."

Her fingers landed on the already unbuttoned buttons of his shirt. It was an unexpected request, but Giselle obeyed again, unbuttoning his waistcoat.

How could she refuse the warmth of his naked skin against hers? Except for the first night, he had always been dressed when they were together, so Giselle had missed his warmth.

After the waistcoat, she began to take off his shirt. The sound of the fabric rustling mixed with the slow jazz melody, creating a sensual and relaxed atmosphere. For Giselle, who was completely immersed in the room's ambiance, undressing her Edwin while naked was not embarrassing, but exciting.

Thanks to that, her hands, which had been firm, began to move more slowly when they reached his waist. Unbuckling the belt of his trousers, which were so tight they seemed about to burst, felt as dangerous as freeing a fierce beast from its leash.

Giselle moistened her dry lips with the tip of her tongue as she unbuckled the button and lowered the zipper of his trousers. When only the prominent black underwear remained, her hands finally stopped.

"You have to take this off too. I don't know about the rest, but what's here has to come out for you to be happy," he whispered in Giselle's ear, guiding her hand towards the waistband of his underwear.

Giselle's face flushed intensely.

Finally, when she lowered his underwear with her own hands and took out what was inside, her neck was also red. Not knowing where to look, she lowered her gaze towards the sheets. He asked her:

"Do you like your Edwin's body?"

Although completely flushed, Giselle nodded honestly. When she was a child, she complained that he didn't play with her because he was busy exercising. How naive she had been! A well-trained soldier's body was something that made her heart pound and made her feel so good.

"Touch it." he said, taking her hand that had been hesitating near his navel and placing it on his chest.

Her hand slid slowly over his firm and muscular torso.

"Remember this sensation, this shape."

Why should she remember it? Giselle looked at him with confusion, and he read the question in her eyes.

"For your lonely nights."

That's right. As long as the world doesn't know about us, I won't be able to sleep here with you every night.

Giselle slowly ran her hand over his well-defined torso, engraving the sensation in her mind to remember it on the nights without him. As she did, his erection slowly grew.

Every time his chest moved under her hand, the tip of his member moved, brushing her lower abdomen. The pale, soft skin of her abdomen became moist with the fluid of his arousal.

The glans, red and swollen, seemed to ask her to touch it, rising towards her. But her hand, which had gone down to his abdomen, turned again without going down further.

Tap.

Her hand, which had been moving up his defined abs, was stopped by him. He guided it down, towards the base of his member, covered with hair.

"Feel it. It's because of your touch that I am like this."

What did he find so funny? He let out a laugh, as if he couldn't contain it after saying something so obscene.

Chapter 79
"Harder."

The man's hand holding Giselle's released. From then on, Giselle alone began to rub the long bulge of flesh.

Hot.

So hot that the fluid emanating from the man's glans dried up quickly.

"Ugh."

When a transparent drop of fluid came out of the slit, Giselle rubbed the base of the glans hard. The foreskin, pushed by Giselle's hand, swallowed the glans.

She pulled it all the way down and then brought it back up, causing the thick skin to slide down and spit out the thick bulge of flesh. The glans, soaked in fluid, shone as if it were about to burst.

She repeated the same gesture several times. More and more roughly. The sound of the flesh rubbing, sticky and wet, was brazen. The man sank deeper and deeper into the pleasure Giselle provided, until he rested his forehead on her.

"Ugh, you really are, ah, quick to learn," the words he whispered in Giselle's ear, with a tone of suffering, sounded better today than the last time.

"Now kiss me."

At the same time Giselle kissed him, her hand slipped into the man's crotch. Kissing and caressing each other was the proper way to 'make love.'

At this moment, Giselle didn't care if the man came in her hands and covered her with semen. It was love.

Did the man feel the same way?

"I love you."

However, due to the strange tone at the end of the sentence, the declaration of love sounded more like a command.

It couldn't be.

"I love you too."

Giselle's reply, said while they kissed, brought a small smile to the man's lips.

"Who?" "You." "Yeah, right." "Ouch!"

Giselle fell onto the bed, pushed by the man's hand; he was on top of her in an instant. Then, he kissed her everywhere.

"Ah!"

Hard, until it hurt.

"Sir, there, ah, it shows."

Giselle tried to push away the man who was nibbling at the tender skin of her arm. If he kept this up, she would have to wear long clothes in this hot late summer.

"It's meant to show." "What?" "It's a mark of territory for Kingsbridge students who dare to dream of having a blonde freshman under their control. Giselle Bishop already has an owner."

The man showed his most masculine side. Giselle's heart pounded hard.

Could it be because he was born with everything? The man had no desire for possession. It was strange that this man, who had never felt the need to possess anything, showed such a strong desire to possess Giselle. It was exciting.

Giselle stopped trying to stop him. The heat was nothing compared to this.

"Ah, uh."

Creak, creak.

Once he finished marking his territory, the man began to rub his cock between Giselle's legs like an animal. The hard pillar of flesh separated the lips of her pussy, rose and struck her clitoris, rubbing against the moist membrane. Her lower part was soaked, but it still burned as if being set on fire. Giselle was already maddened with desire and moved her hips non-stop.

'Please, put it in now.'

She had run out of birth control methods and had not had penetration for two days. It had been two days since she enjoyed that explosive ecstasy that made her forget everything.

Could it be due to the accumulation of desire that had not been fully released? Her crotch kept itching. Now, with the blood rushing down, it burned so much that she felt insane.

Just when she wished for something thick and long to scratch her inside, she felt.

A prick.

"Ah!"

The glans, which had been withdrawn for a moment, entered the entrance of her pussy again with a dry thrust. The heavy bulge of flesh pressed against her flesh. A shiver of pleasure ran through her body. Giselle bit the end of her tongue and trembled.

However, the rod didn't go in further and withdrew abruptly. As if it had been a mistake. Once she tasted it, she craved it more and could no longer bear it.

"Sir, uh, today." Giselle turned to look at the man who was hugging her from behind and moving her waist, beginning to speak. Telling him directly to insert it was too explicit.

"Is today only going to be like this?" "Why? Would you like me to put my cock in your womb?"

She was grateful that the man immediately understood what she wanted, but she didn't like the vulgar expression. If she spoke vaguely, she ended up hearing this kind of rude language, so perhaps from now on it would be better to be direct.

"But what am I going to do? I forgot to buy them."

Giselle's look, which had begun to harbor hope, filled with disappointment in an instant.

"My puppy, are you very sad?"

She nodded her head honestly, and the man laughed as if he couldn't contain his tenderness, but then sighed close to her neck.

"I'm sad too."

"Ah, uh."

The blunt tip of his cock brushed the entrance of her pussy again and then withdrew.

"Am I only going to put it in like this tonight?" "What? If you do that, I could get pregnant."

Suddenly, she was afraid of this sex. She loved the man, but she was not yet ready to have a child of his. She was too young to have a child. If she got pregnant, according to Kingsbridge's rules, she would have to stop studying or, in the case of unethical pregnancy, might even be expelled.

Pregnancy out of wedlock, moreover with a famous person. It would be a scandal. She was aware that someday her name would appear in the tabloids, but she wanted her pregnancy to be received with blessings, not criticism.

"I'll take it out before anything happens." "What if you make a mistake?" "Then our child will be born, who will be as beautiful and intelligent as you." ".Our child will also be like that if he resembles you."

Our child. The idea excited her. Suddenly, imagining it, pregnancy didn't seem so terrifying. But that didn't mean she wanted to have a child right now.

"I also want to have a child with you someday, but tonight is too soon. We haven't even gotten married yet." "Don't worry. If it looks like it's going to happen, I'll pull out. What I mean is that if a child happens to be born, I will take responsibility, don't worry. Giselle, do you trust me?" "Yes, I trust you." "How good you are."

He patted her butt and got up. Giselle, who had already become accustomed to making love with him in these last few days, lay on her back on the bed and opened her legs by herself. The man positioned himself between them.

"Look, my cock is soaked with your juice."

The man grabbed the base, which was less wet, and moved it. Giselle blushed at the explicit scene, and the liquid spilled onto her abdomen.

"Enough of jokes." "And what do you want me to do?"

How naughty he was. Giselle pouted her lips and reached out her hand towards his crotch.

"Sir, put this here for me."

Instead of saying the word she was too embarrassed to say, she pointed it out with her hand.

"Then, you try."

Perhaps it would be less awkward to do it with her body than with words. Giselle, without saying anything, pressed the pillar that was rising upwards to tilt it down. When she lifted her butt and brought her vulva closer to the end, she realized she had been wrong to think it would be less awkward, but she didn't back down.

She opened her pussy with the other hand and inserted the glans. The man, who had been watching with a look of difficulty as Giselle inserted his cock, couldn't contain himself when he felt the walls of her pussy closing around the glans.

"Ah!"

He grabbed Giselle's waist and thrust hard. The long pillar of flesh, as if lubricated, slid all the way in with a single thrust and drove into the back of her pussy.

Thud.

At the same time, their pubic bones collided forcefully.

"Haak!"

How was she going to resist the simultaneous stimulation of her two most sensitive erogenous zones? Giselle threw her head back and screamed.

She collapsed.

Her body, which had been rigid, sank into the mattress. Giselle, who was trembling completely after the tension dissipated in an instant, nodded her head, stunned by the extreme ecstasy. The man looked at her in disbelief and then smiled sarcastically.

"Seriously, did you come?"

Giselle, her mind clouded by the extreme pleasure, nodded her head. His look of disbelief turned into an ironic smile.

"Are you the one with the sensitivity, am I the one who does it well, or does your body just fit well with mine?" "You, you do it, very, well."

The man, as if wanting to give her time to catch her breath, did not pull out his rod, but kept it buried in her belly, moving it gently. Even with soft stimulation, her sensitive internal walls, right after climax, contracted forcefully and nibbled at his cock. The man's eyes also clouded with pleasure.

"Ah, what a good body. It's a shame."

Chapter 80.

She seemed mesmerized by the ecstatic sensation of their most intimate flesh rubbing directly against each other, without the strange barrier of a latex membrane.

"It feels so good…"

Even if only for this night, she wanted to savor the sensations unique to now, before the night ended.

"Sir, please, hold me."

Giselle opened her arms to him. How blissful it would be to feel the heat of his body deep within her core for the first time, to be enveloped by it, to have her entire being bathed in his warmth.

He slid into her embrace and wrapped his arms around her. Her small frame was swallowed by his strong limbs, his hands—as broad as his heart—stroking her back. Her soft breasts pressed against the firm planes of his chest. The cock buried inside her pulsed, stirring her very flesh.

'I feel like I'm melting.'

Her mind was dazed by the torrent of hot sensations. Giselle wrapped her arms around his neck and her legs around his waist, clinging to him as if to keep from being swept away by a flood, moving against him and coming undone.

"Please, promise me we'll sleep like this tonight. I want to fall asleep tonight, held like this. Yes, please."

His eyes opened wide. Giselle's eyelids fluttered, and she couldn't help but laugh at his unexpected response.

"It will be hot."

That's all he was worried about? Giselle pressed herself tighter against him, their bodies growing damp with sweat.

"I want to be in your arms, even if I burn to death."

A soft chuckle, followed by a sweet whisper, drifted into her ear.

"Then I will hold you. Every night."

"Not just tonight? Every night?"

The head buried in the crook of her neck nodded, a shudder running through him. She was so happy she nearly cheered. The nightmares that had haunted her from time to time would not return. Not with her guardian angel by her side—the one who had pulled her out of that hell.

"I love you, Sir."

"I love you, too."

We will marry, have children, and be happy. The promise he whispered to Giselle made her heart burst with joy. Combined with the skillful rhythm of his hips, her heart began to race as if it were about to explode.

Squelch.

His cock slid wetly against her inner walls. Even the slightest friction was intense, the sensation of him sliding in and out. She was going insane. It hadn't been long, and Giselle was already climaxing again…

"Haah, haah, haah… oh!"

I think you're close to the edge, too. Giselle's face swayed above him, contorted as if fighting against the extreme pleasure.

"Haaah, it feels so good…"
"Ah, yes, mmmm…"
"Uh, this is dangerous, I have to stop before I get stupidly miserable again."
"Ah, well, what the hell…"

He leaned down and kissed Giselle's lips, looking at her with a strange smile before saying something even stranger.

"I'm very sorry, but I'm afraid this is the end of our little game. It's been fun. Until next time. Goodbye."

"What? Ah, ah, ah, ah, ah!"

Giselle didn't get to ask, because without any warning, he began thrusting into her with furious intensity.

What the hell did that bizarre farewell mean?



'What the hell was I suffering from?'

He remembered nothing. In any case, he wasn't suffering at all now; he only felt absolute ecstasy.

"What is this?"

Something was enveloping Edwin's cock. It felt like flesh, but he had never experienced anything so soft, wet, warm, and smooth.

Was it alive? It squeezed and rubbed against him.

"Uff…"

In that instant, a jolt of pleasure shot through his body and vanished as quickly as a spark dispersing in the air. He had never felt anything like it. He wanted to feel it again.

Creak, creak.

This time, he himself moved his cock against the soft, plush flesh. The friction sparked an electric sensation, reviving that shock of pleasure.

More, more, more. Edwin let out a gasp full of ecstasy and quickened his pace.

"Ah, uhm, huh, ah…"

The woman's moans, growing more urgent, came from beneath him. They were screams. Edwin realized he was having sex with a woman.

'Sex is… pleasant.'

Pff.

'You are a hopeless bitch.'

Edwin ignored the taunt and kept moving like a dog in heat, clutching the woman. She was a terrifying and fascinating creature. She had awakened in him a hunger for stimulation he had never known.

"Ah, uh, uh, uh, there, uhm…"

Not knowing who she was, Edwin held her—a woman much smaller than himself—bit her lips, her nipples, everything he could find, like a starved animal. The woman seemed just as ravenous, sucking on his cock with increasing voracity. The ecstasy intensified without limit.

More, more, just a little more.

It was too soon to finish. Edwin struggled to hold back, but the woman could not.

"Uh, uh…"

Suddenly, the woman's moans became sharp, as if she were being strangled, replaced by choked, guttural sounds. Her inner flesh contracted around his cock, gripping him tightly.

Her climax?

Edwin couldn't hold back when she bit down and shuddered.

"Uff, ah…"

The moment his body tensed in climax, only one place relaxed. Edwin came powerfully. It was the first time he had ever enjoyed ejaculation.

A sensation of hot, cleansing pleasure washed over him like a tide. He had never felt anything that could melt even his frozen heart. The feeling of his breath being released made him feel truly alive.

He heard the laughter again.

'Yes, that's it. I can't be the only one suffering.'

The whisper in his mind didn't bother him at all. All of Edwin's attention was focused on the tip of his cock.

Even after climaxing, his desire didn't abate. He kept moving, rubbing his now extremely sensitive head against the woman's rippling inner walls. It was an unbearable pleasure.

So much so, that he felt grateful to the woman.

Edwin kissed the panting woman's lips and asked with his kiss:

Who are you?

"Huh? You…"

…Giselle?

In that moment, his eyes snapped open and he stared down. The woman beneath him was Giselle.

His Giselle.

Edwin jerked upright. They were both naked, covered in sweat, and they pulled apart.

Their legs were still entangled.

Edwin could deny it no longer.

He had had sex with Giselle.

He had done something he should never have done with a body he should never have seen.

'How did this happen? Why am I doing this with Giselle here?'

He remembered nothing. But each time the mocking voice in his mind spoke, memories began to surface.

The photo of Giselle covered in Edwin's semen.

In the darkroom at Templeton, that demon he wanted to kill had possessed him, had pretended to be Edwin, had gone to Giselle's house, left a note for her, and then…

Edwin froze, petrified by shock. Giselle looked at him with pity.

"You said you would withdraw if you didn't feel well…"

Remembering those words, Edwin felt a chill of horror and scrambled backward.

Schluck.

His cock, still trapped in her tight little sheath, slipped out with a terrible, wet sound. The worst was yet to come.

At that moment, Giselle's little pink pussy, which had been stretched wide to accommodate his girth, clenched shut, and a whitish fluid began to trickle out. It was Edwin's semen.

He had slept with Giselle unprotected.

"What do I do…?"

'Don't worry, precious. I'll take care of everything.'

Edwin, as terrified as Giselle, quickly moved to try and clean the semen left inside her.

Giselle could be pregnant with his child.

The little pink shell contracted and expanded, expelling the coagulating semen. Giselle got on her knees, and the semen began to drip down her inner thighs. It wouldn't stop.

He suddenly remembered driving deep into her and ejaculating inside. The thought of having to retrieve what he had deposited within her filled him with icy horror. He slid a hand between Giselle's legs and paused, feeling the delicacy of her little slit.

What was worse? Touching the daughter he had raised so intimately, or letting her get pregnant?

"Ah…"

He made a quick decision and slipped a finger into Giselle's opening. He parted her little lips and pushed his finger deep inside.

He felt the soft, ridged flesh that his cock had rubbed against just moments before, and a shudder of utter remorse wracked his body.

Chapter 81.

Edwin gritted his teeth, scraping his fingertips through the delicate folds of her sex, gathering the spendings that had seeped out. The little trickle of seed spilled into his palm.

"Ah, ah, Sir…"

The moment Giselle's voice, calling for him, trembled finely like a cry, a shiver ran through Edwin. He was committing this further act solely to avoid violating this girl's body again. Guilt pressed down on him, but he could not stop himself from trying to extract his own semen from inside Giselle.

"Ohh…"

He slid his fingers back in. This time, down to the last knuckle. At the tip, which had reached a dead end, he felt a soft, smooth mass of flesh, different from the vaginal wall. The entrance to her womb. Edwin knew it was a place he must never enter.

Looking at his fingers which had trespassed there, he felt a profound helplessness. The entrance to her womb had also been spattered with his seed, a whitish fluid clinging to his fingers. He had already violated Giselle; now he was only humiliating her further with this useless act.

'What a gentleman I was, not coming on her face.'

At the sound of that mocking whisper, his face, which had been pale with terror, began to burn with fury.

'This damned parasite dares to do this to Giselle…'
'You still don't know the half of what I did.'

Edwin held his breath, as if stabbed, by the sharp laughter. The monster was beginning to unveil the memories it had concealed.

From the moment that cunning demon had feigned precursor symptoms in the concentration camp just to deceive Edwin.

The next memory was from the night Giselle became an adult. The moment Edwin closed his eyes, the monster took his body and rose. It vomited the sleeping draught in the bathroom. It changed clothes in the dressing room and slipped out the window.

It walked with ease along the narrow, dark cornice of the third floor, searching for an open window. It found an unlocked window at the far end of the building, pushed it up, and climbed inside.

"Giselle."
"One moment."

In the memory, he was knocking on Giselle's bedroom door.

"You didn't tell me to come in."
"Come in… can you?"

He entered the room with its blue curtains.

"My dear Miss Bishop, if you will permit me, the Sir will be happy."
"Alright."

Using Edwin's skin, it seduced her with words he would never say. Deceived, it laid her down on the bed with its pink sheets.

"Rose petals."

It opened Giselle's legs. The forbidden territory Edwin was never meant to see unfolded before his eyes. The memories were inescapable, even with his eyes closed.

"So, the young girl has become a lady mature enough to receive her Sir?"
"Ah!"

The sensation of his penis tearing through the entrance to Giselle's little sex, which had once been just a small hole, suddenly hit him. He could feel Giselle's body stiffen with pain from just the tip. He could also feel the chilling sensation of the red blood welling from the fissure of flesh struggling to hold something so thick.

That vile demon had not only tortured Giselle's body.

I love you. We'll run away. We'll get married.

Edwin—no, the thing wearing him—made promises to Giselle that he could never keep, all while mocking the innocent heart of the girl who loved him in secret.

I should have killed her.

The rage at not having killed her sooner was directed not only at the demon in his mind, but also at himself.

I should have died.

"Sir…"

Giselle approached Edwin, who was kneeling and blaming himself, crawling across the bed sheets stained with the fluids of them both.

"It's alright. It will be alright. If… if you have a baby, it will be God's will, a blessing."

Giselle hugged him to comfort him. Their bodies touched. She was still naked. Edwin could not lift his head and pushed her away.

"Giselle…"

His voice broke from the guilt.

"I'm sorry. Put your clothes on."
"Why?"
"I have something I must tell you."



To the arrogant owner of this noble body,

How does it feel to have violated the girl you raised as a daughter?

Do you really think it was me and not you?

You're wrong.

You said that slender body was yours.

And now that it's a dirty body that violated an innocent girl, does it still belong to you?

I know you're confused, but I hope you don't blame this humble parasite. Not if you're grateful.

What the hell is this, eh?

At least you were able to pick up an orphan and raise her. You gave her everything she had, and when she grew up, she gave herself to you to satisfy your lust. It's a fucking touching story.

Hey, Sir. How was the sex with your pet girl? You remember now, don't you?

No. By now, you've had the chance to fuck her with your own will. How was it?

It was better than I expected.

Truth be told, I had no expectations. I mean, what's the point of having fun with a child? I'm going to have fun with you.

So I went in there to serve. The only thing young was her face. When I took her, she was all grown up. See?

She was so wet and small, she took such a big thing. You remember how it didn't fit in her hand, how she kept squirming, you remember how good she tasted, haha. so good.

She still has a delicate face and quite a bit of hair between her legs—she's a good girl. If I can make you hard just by showing you her naked and letting you touch her a little here and there, she's a woman. Isn't that right?

I was worried, though, because she's so much shorter than you and her waist is so tiny. I thought I might kill her with it. But she's much deeper than she looks.

Giselle Bishop's hole, you know, all of it?

As soon as I put it in, the flesh curled and squeezed my cock so tight it could have snapped me right off. Everything was perfect, yeah, she knew how to take a man's dick.

She was so tight I almost got dizzy when I couldn't pull out. Did you know I thought my cock was going to explode from the pressure?

You remember how at first the hole was like, 'You can't come in, you can't come in,' and you were like, 'No, no, no, no,' then it let you in, it loved your taste, it sucked you in.

At first she cried and screamed because she was scared, but once you were inside, you held her and flipped her over, she moved her ass and you put her on top of you and fucked her like a Oh, shit. my dick is pumping again.

Anyway, she was funny, but you raised her well, so she was very well-behaved. It's not just because of me, it's also because of your semen (which was my intention). If I grabbed my cock tightly and pressed it against her little pussy, she would come. What man wouldn't?

She was so soft she blushed when I rubbed the tip, but she was also so strong. Every time she couldn't win against your cock, she started sucking it and it was like she was going to eat it from the root. I didn't know if she was fucking me or eating me, sent shivers down my spine. You know what I mean?

If you ever go bankrupt, I'm sure I could use her as a painted magazine model to make up the difference. She has the tits and the body, but she has the face and the gaze of a schoolgirl. Once shot, she couldn't hide that natural color, her coyness made the blood rush to my crotch.

Besides, she has a good head on her shoulders. She has this whole thing about grabbing my dick and moving her waist perfectly, she has a soft spot in her heart for cocks.

Her face isn't exactly your cup of tea, but she's a beauty. Give her a few years. A time will come when she's fully grown and smells like a woman.

Let's face it, she's built to take a man's cock.

Where did you get this from?

You should be thanking me, because if it weren't for me, you wouldn't have kept her, unaware that she would have taken some other big cock and you would have given her away. What a waste.

Imagine all those other guys holding her and fucking her while she laughs and moans. Sliding their cocks in and out of Giselle's fantastic hole over and over, thanking you for giving her such an incredible cunt. Wouldn't you want to kill them?

I'm just looking ahead and paving the way. I've smoothed the path for you, so you can come and go as you please. Don't you think you've earned what you've got?

Let's talk about it. Am I the only leech? Giselle Bishop is a leech. Are you saying you get a free ride as a father? Bullshit. You don't get a free ride, she does.

All you have to do is give it to her and she'll get spoiled. No, she's already spoiled.

It seems she understands fractions, but she has a warped sense of reality. Just how long have you been educating her to think she's going to be a duchess?

Now that I think about it, she was the one who encouraged you to dream big when you were younger. But the dream you used to talk about wasn't becoming your wife.


Chapter 82.

Even so, she's a good girl. She does everything you ask. She's no Duchess or proper wife, but she's perfect for slaking your lust.

Ah, every time you do it, she acts like she's still a virgin, all shy and timid, but there's a way to make her move like a bitch in heat. When you're halfway inside, you'll feel a soft, rounded mass at the tip of your cock. That's her cervix. Don't thrust against it. It hurts her.

Instead, angle the head slightly to the side and push. Suddenly, your cock will slide all the way in. There's a hollow space right next to the cervix; that's Giselle's sweet spot. If you press the head of your cock there and move or rub it, she'll love it. From that point on, you'll see, she'll start moving on her own.

Ah, she has many sensitive spots, but I'll save those for later, after I've withdrawn a little. I've gotten hard.

You too—while reading this, did you remembered the feeling of that tender flesh clinging to your cock when you pressed that secret spot of that pretty girl? Did you come?

Tell me honestly. How many times did you have to step away? At the very least, you got hard, didn't you?

That man was mistaken. The only thing that had swollen on Edwin was the vein of pure rage throbbing at his temple.

Judging by what had happened tonight, the parasite in his mind had the ability to select memories and show only the ones it wanted, hiding the rest.

He had discovered, albeit fragmentarily, what that man had done to Giselle and what physical sensations he had experienced at the time, but he did not recall the man's thoughts. He didn't know why that demon had chosen Giselle or for what purpose.

'This isn't just an expression of lust.'

If his game wasn't over yet, and Edwin was walking a minefield, he had to know. It was the only way to prevent Giselle from suffering more.

Would the letter hold the answer?

That man had hidden the memory of the moment he wrote the letter. He wanted Edwin to read it.

Even as he took out the letter and unfolded it, he knew he was stepping on a mine. Sure enough, it began with mockery, then unleashed a relentless downpour of low-level insults and taunts.

When you're in the army, a world of men, you hear obscenities whether you want to or not. But what was written in this letter was more repulsive and vulgar than anything Edwin had ever heard. It was comparable to what the guards in the prisoner camps said to torment the inmates.

That beast, who deserved to be torn apart, hadn't just mocked Giselle with this rotten, filthy letter—he'd even had the audacity to insult her, calling her a leech or a stowaway.

'Ah, but she's not a stowaway anymore, because she paid the price for climbing aboard your fortune the moment you climbed on top of her.'

A disgustingly light voice seeped into his mind and began to intrude. Ever since he had gradually regained awareness regarding Giselle, that man had been talking like a mischievous child.

'Why have you done this? What do you want?'

Yet, he did not answer Edwin's question. The monster in his mind, reading everything, would surely know what Edwin feared and what answers he sought. Whether he knew and withheld, or simply didn't know, Edwin couldn't tell, but a chill of danger ran down his spine.

'Then, let's make a deal.'

If a time bomb was tied to Giselle's ankle, set to explode at any moment, he had no choice but to deal with the demon who wanted to destroy her. At least until he found a way to kill him.

'What do I give you in exchange for you leaving Giselle alone?'

It was then that the demon answered Edwin's question for the first time.

'Bothering her, you say? She loved it.'

As if to back up his claim, the demon revived a memory Edwin never wanted to recall.

"Ah, ah, ah, ah, Sir, more, more."

Giselle's voice, already reaching its climax, echoed in his ears. Next came the sensation of the rough walls of her cunt gripping his cock tightly. Even though he was clenching his teeth, he could feel clearly the soft, rounded mass of her breast pressed against his palate and tongue. It was Giselle's breast.

Edwin squeezed his eyes shut. He knew this guilt wouldn't disappear, no matter how hard he tried. It was a reflexive reaction to the pain.

The hand pressed against his furrowed brow slid up and sank into his black hair. His hair, once neatly combed back with pomade, was now as disheveled as his state of mind.

'Why? You enjoyed it too.'

He couldn't deny that he had enjoyed it in that moment. But if he had seen the other person's face, he would have stopped immediately. The moment he realized the woman he was having sex with was Giselle, all the pleasure Edwin had felt turned into unbearable agony, unlike any pain he had ever experienced.

Furthermore, the memory he'd been forced to relive was something that man had done. Edwin hadn't been there.

Pfft.

A mocking laugh pierced his mind sharply. That man had continued his vile actions while Edwin read the letter. Every time Edwin's eyes landed on a filthy description he had written, he would evoke the corresponding scene and sensation. That's why reading the letter was torture.

The first three pages had been like that, and there were still over ten left. Edwin skimmed through a few more pages where the writing was small and cramped, then turned to the last page. It was nothing but obscenities and taunts that made him want to wash his eyes.

There was even an ink stain on one page, where something had splattered. The moment he realized it was semen, he knew with certainty. This repulsive letter had no other purpose than to humiliate him.

Rereading the sarcastic, mocking beginning of the letter, he could guess why he had used Giselle and himself as playthings.

'Did you say this perfect body is yours?'

By violating his body at will, he was directly challenging its owner—him. The fact that he had chosen Giselle as the medium was no different from the psychology of destroying what your enemy holds most dear.

He might also have had the vile goal of tainting Edwin's pure, selfless goodwill with his own selfish desires.

There were no answers to his other questions in the letter, and no reason to keep making that demon happy. The thick letter, along with the blood-stained handkerchief that had accompanied it, turned to ash.

A deal?

There was no room for compromise, not even for a moment. Nor could there be any coexistence with an unforgivable demon.

I will kill him.

Whatever it takes.



.The clitoris becomes less sensitive if you stimulate it continuously with the same pressure and the same motions. It seems to lose sensation. In that case, if you insert a couple of fingers into her pussy and rub them around inside, the sensitivity returns.

Ah, and if you open the lower part of the clitoris, you'll see a small hole; that's the urethra. The concentration camp guards told me to put things in there, weren't they disgusting and repulsive? Honestly, I didn't like the obscenities they said.

Even I, the one writing this filthy letter, feel like vomiting. How must a noble Duke, raised with such delicacy, be feeling? Surely he hasn't made it this far and has already burned the letter, right?

Well, let's get to the point.

Actually, I miscalculated. I expected your stomach to be strong enough to endure hearing the girl you love (ah, of course, I don't mean in a sexual way) being torn apart like a piece of meat for over ten pages.

It's a bit lonely, writing a letter no one is going to read.

But why did you try to stop me from having her read it before? Because if you knew what I feel, I would be at a disadvantage?

Well, even if you know me, you won't be able to defeat me.

Rather. afraid? Now I'm dressed like a gentleman, with an elegant pen in my hand, but why do I feel like I know what Giselle Bishop felt when she was being stripped naked? It's as if I'm showing my own skin.

So why do I keep writing? Because if it were too easy, it wouldn't be fun? No. Actually, I also have a bit of vanity. I'd like someone to acknowledge me.

Will you want to know me and open this letter? That's despicable. Now you wonder what I think. Even if you know, to you it will just be the noise of a rat. If I'm going to be treated that way, I'd rather you didn't read it.

Fickle. Like a madman? Not like a human?

They say humans are contradictory animals? I remember reading that phrase in your memories. So, am I human, I who am so full of contradictions?

But not all contradictory animals are human, so am I still a vague being who may or may not be human? Was I an animal from the start?

Whatever I am, you already know I'm angry because you don't treat me as human.

Did I want to be born as a parasite without a body, living in someone else's flesh?

You aren't the type of person who would change your attitude even if you knew my circumstances. To you, I will remain an insect you want to crush.

Since you wanted to kill me without a reason, I've given you a reason, Duke. Do you like it?


Chapter 83.

You are cruel to me, but you are infinitely generous to an orphan who clings to you like me. It's frustrating.

I wanted to show the world, which considers you a philanthropist who loves the helpless equally, how narrow and cruel you actually are.

How could I show it? I had many doubts.

But, unexpectedly, meeting Giselle Bishop solved everything cleanly.

Giselle Bishop. The most symbolic and widely known proof that Edwin Eccleston is a good person. If I use that girl to expose your cruel truth to the world, everything will be solved.

You wrap the fact that you raised a war orphan in a cloak of sublime charity, but in reality, you are satisfying your dirty desires on a poor, parentless girl. I just need to turn the world's dirty suspicions into reality.

Naturally, I will stain that noble body you are so proud of, thus corrupting your pure goodwill. That girl, the affection you have for her. Then nothing pure will be left of you. It was a perfect plan.

As long as you, without my intervention, fulfill my final goal.

Honestly, up to this point, I am only framing you. The sin is committed by me, not you. That is not my goal.

To achieve my goal of exposing your cruel truth, you must commit cruel acts of your own free will.

For example.

Killing Giselle Bishop?

I agree.

In fact, I already wanted to kill her. While I was locked up in the concentration camp, you forced me to remember that brat's face, I got so fed up that I came to hate a girl I hadn't even seen in person. So I swore it.

The day I face that sour milk face, I will stain it with the smell of blood.

But the Giselle Bishop I met was not the girl from your memories.

However, my determination to twist the neck of your "spoiled puppy" and throw it at your feet did not change. Only who would twist that neck was slightly modified.

Even in charity, there are limits. There is no one who, losing everything they have, distributes it to others. If Giselle Bishop no longer benefits you and only causes you harm, would you take off your mask as an altruistic philanthropist and become a selfish killer?

Like when you shot a traitor who went from being your ally to your enemy without hesitation.

I tried to lead you to that situation. First, at least in your subconscious.

But why don't you kill her? Even though she is destroying everything you have built, turning your cherished beliefs into scraps of paper and ruining you.

Rapist. It is a social death sentence for you. Why don't you kill her?

Besides, it was a dream. A dream where any desire can be released without passing through reason.

Although miserable dogs and pigs bite you and call you a rapist, you, who are perfect from birth, will not have a scratch, but the resentment of a miserable orphan terrifies you. How romantic you are.

Seeing that you don't even kill her at the moment when reason is asleep made me doubt whether you would do it in reality. How boring.

In that dead end, fortunately, someone appeared and showed me the way. Your aunt.

Do well. Although I have wanted to cover her mouth more than once or twice for her constant scolding, that mouth has also helped me on occasions.

Hundreds of mouths kill a person more painfully than a sword. It is a famous saying.

You, even if hundreds bite you, are a purebred dog, so it won't hurt you. But will Giselle Bishop, being a mongrel, be the same?

Until that moment, I believed that sex was a dirty act. Skin against skin, mixing fluids. How disgusting. I knew nothing then.

So why did you get me women if you only needed to buy me condoms? This is embarrassing and overwhelming, what should I do? Although I say it like that, I actually enjoyed it.

Seeing how you tormented yourself in deciding to become the Eccleston dog, how just the thought of it caused you pain, was incredibly exciting. If you were so distressed about losing your virginity to a prostitute, how would it be when you knew you had raped an innocent girl? I had high expectations, but you exceeded my expectations. As always, Edwin Eccleston never disappoints.

Giselle Bishop is disappointing. I expected her to act like a fierce, spoiled puppy, but when unmasked, she was just a blindly obedient puppy.

I can read you like a book and know everything about you, but I hadn't considered that Giselle Bishop didn't know me well, or rather, that you didn't know her well.

The plan to turn you into a rapist was doomed to failure from the start, not because of you, but because of that pure and obedient leech.

When I hugged her and touched her a little, she tried to pull away, but with just a word, she clung to me again. If I had said one more word, she would have undressed herself and opened her legs. That's when I knew that her biggest fear was 'being abandoned by Edwin.'

I even discovered that she was in love with you. It was a bit tough. You didn't see her as a woman at all.

On the other hand, it was disgusting. I previously said that Giselle Bishop was ambitious for the duchess title, but that was just an attempt to sow discord. She wasn't interested in being a duchess. Simply, the title of your wife turned out to be duchess. Would you have married her even if you were a beggar? What a great love between dogs.

The disgusting part didn't end there. Since I was the 'Lord,' she accepted anything I did. Although I myself felt disgusted playing a dirty pervert, she had a strong stomach and said she loved me anyway.

'It's okay. No, I don't like it, but if it's love, everything is fine.'

It was repulsive. I was only pretending to be repulsive, but Giselle Bishop was repulsive by herself.

Although I have no idea how to raise a child, I at least know that a child should not be raised that way.

You picked up a girl and raised her like a dog.

In conclusion, Giselle Bishop was not the girl who would report you. Rather, she was the girl who would let herself be raped by you obediently. How is that rape? It's incest.

How boring.

The best option became a piece of paper. At that point, I only had two options left.

Become the bad Lord who demands she pay her debt with her body.

Or become the bad Lord who uses love as an excuse to desire her body.

Why is there no option to 'give up'? I have invested too much effort to get here, it would be a shame not to continue.

Although the road would be longer, I was sure that in the end I would achieve my goal. What if I don't? What do I care? I have nothing to lose. Because I have nothing.

So, which path would be better?

While getting her drunk to cloud her judgment, I thought about it carefully.

Demanding her to pay her debt with her body. It is not typical of an 'Angelic Lord.' Even so, she would never suspect something like multiple personality disorder, so she would probably believe that you were an evil man who had been hiding his true self all this time.

Until she discovered it was my doing.

The truth would come to light eventually. What would she think then?

Of course! My Angelic Lord would never do anything bad to me. What a relief. I love you, Lord. Lorenz, die.

Would she give you an indulgence to forgive all your sins and only curse me?

But what if it wasn't love she felt?

Do you think she would be happy? No.

She would feel as if she had ascended to heaven and then crashed headfirst into hell. She would wish that reality, which she previously hoped was not a dream, was now a nightmare.

She would be so ashamed of herself for having been intoxicated in a love game that she didn't even know was one-sided. It would be as if she had been caught masturbating naked while shouting your name. Although being deceived was not her fault, she would hate herself so much that she would want to die.

On the other hand, she would still be trapped in that love game and would feel miserable. She could now vividly imagine another woman who wasn't her hearing that you love her, kissing you and mixing her body with yours. She couldn't bear that to come true.

It would be very easy to trip.

Chapter 84.

I was the one who reduced you to that. I turned you into a vulgar, common man, like some back-alley thug. A sick pervert who only thought about taking advantage while watching a girl grow up. A low-class deviant who got off on spouting cheap obscenities at women. That kind of pathetic, despicable man.

As I said before, it's not my style to speak crudely like a street tough, but it was tremendously entertaining to stain, one by one, all those pure, praising words you had for that girl.

If you compared her to a flower, I called her sex a flower. If you praised her hair, I used the same words to praise her skills in bed.

You won't be able to say the same things to that girl anymore, will you? And she won't be able to hear them with the same innocence. The pure memories between the Sir and the girl are now tainted.

But you must be wondering, what does turning you into a vulgar, common man have to do with my goal of exposing your true nature using Giselle Bishop?

Now that you know that vulgar man was me and not you, do you think Giselle Bishop will ever see you again as the impeccable, noble Duke Eccleston—someone who could never resemble a common person like me? I don't think so.

Even if it wasn't truly you who did those things, she saw 'Sir' behaving vulgarly with your face, your body, and your voice. Now, the idea that 'Edwin Eccleston' can also be a common person is deeply etched into Giselle Bishop's mind.

That tree which once seemed unattainable now seems scalable. Even if it is just a mirage.

So, what does that have to do with my goal?

Giselle Bishop, in her confusion, will struggle to climb that tree which is you, but in the end, she won't reach the top. Instead, she'll hang herself on a low branch.

If she hangs herself, it will be your fault. Will you expose your true nature by ignoring it? Or will you sacrifice your social life to save her?

Let's see how generous you can be with that girl. As I've said before, even your kindness, which seems infinite towards her, has a limit. Someday, just as you did with me, you will draw a cruel line and discard her. I look forward to the day you call her a leech, too.

The leech in your head. How about we talk about something dirty? If you're angry because I took her purity, there's something I want you to know. She still has one virgin hole left. I don't know if you remember, but in the prisoner-of-war camp, the guards.



"Your Grace, it's time for your call."

This morning, as always, the first thing he saw upon waking was the caution-filled eyes of Loise. Loise couldn't tell if the person who had just woken up was Edwin or that demon.

'Don't worry, it's me.'

Every time he opened his eyes, he tried to say it, but he always stopped. It was pointless. Loise had no way of distinguishing if that demon was claiming to be Edwin, so he had no choice but to doubt. Even if Edwin said 'it's me,' Loise couldn't believe him.

The helplessness of being unable to prove who he was, even to those closest to him, was overwhelming. And so another day began with an empty heart, but Edwin cleared his throat so it wouldn't show in his voice and picked up the phone from the bedside table.

He dialed a number that had become familiar over the past week, and after a moment, a clear voice answered, despite the early hour.

"Hello?"

"My little puppy, did you sleep well?"

Greeting her lightly, as he used to, had become his most difficult task. He hoped Giselle didn't notice.

"Yes, I slept well. And you, Sir?"

"I slept well, too."

He hoped she wasn't lying.

"Did anything happen last night?"

"No, nothing."

After her somewhat mechanical reply, silence fell. Though it was only a few seconds in reality, it felt like hours of awkwardness. Just as he was about to break the ice with one of his usual scoldings, an awkward laugh came from the other end of the line, followed by a carefree voice, just like before.

"Of course nothing happened. Last night, after you insisted so much, I lowered all the security shutters, locked the doors and windows, and double-checked everything before going to sleep."

"Good girl."

Today marked one week since Edwin had regained consciousness in Giselle's room. Since then, he hadn't stopped calling her day and night to make sure she was alright.

He might be confusing the girl who saw him as a romantic interest. He might be making her uncomfortable. In situations like this, the proper thing would be to create distance, but would that truly be for the best? Edwin couldn't bring himself to stop these welfare calls, risky as they were, because he wanted Giselle to be safe, even if it confused her or caused her pain.

"Do you have classes today?"

"Yes."

"……."

"Luckily, they're in the afternoon today. Oh, it wasn't your call that woke me up. Elena and I had plans to study for the club entrance exam this morning."

Edwin bit his tongue to stop himself from telling her that if she was tired, maybe she should skip school. He knew her cheerful voice was just a facade. Giselle must be as shocked as he was, standing on the brink of an abyss, and forcing her to continue with her studies in that state was cruel.

"A club? That sounds fun."

But if he told her to skip school, he was afraid it would make her fall apart.

The real reason he couldn't be completely honest wasn't because of Giselle, but because of Loise, who was watching him closely. From now on, all his calls would be listened to by Loise. If he said anything suspicious, Loise would snatch the phone away immediately. They couldn't risk that demon taking control of his body and doing something terrible.

"Don't try to drive."

I'm sorry.

"Yes, I know."

"No matter how close the school is to home, don't walk back late at night."

I'm sorry, Giselle.

"I know."

"Don't take a taxi. Call Dawson and have him pick you up."

I don't know how to apologize to you. I don't know how to make up for what I did to you.

"Didn't I already tell you I know?"

"You have to earn my trust."

How can I atone for my mistakes and heal the wounds I caused you? I still don't know. I'm sorry.

"Wow… If someone who didn't know me heard this, they'd think I'm a complete mess. You're the one who's always scolding me. It's unfair."

"Since the day you sneaked off to drink with the soldiers, you have been a mess, so you have no right to complain."

I'm sorry. I'm sorry.

On the outside, he spoke naturally, as if nothing had happened, just as he would have before. But inside, his apologies repeated like a broken record, unable to move forward.

Was he hurting Giselle? The words of apology he couldn't voice aloud piled up inside him, scratching him raw.

"I'm sorry."

Even though he had already revealed he had another personality and had apologized to Giselle that day, for Edwin, it wasn't enough.

"It's all my fault. I…."

Although he used to feel proud when she called him 'Sir,' now that he had lost the right to be her protector by hurting her, calling himself 'Sir' felt shameless.

"…I just don't want you to suffer. So, if there's anything you wish for, don't hesitate to tell me."

It was the best Edwin could do for her, but at the same time, by assigning her that difficult task, perhaps he was also losing his right to be an adult.

Metaphorically and literally, Edwin had been through all sorts of experiences in life; he rarely encountered problems for which he had no answer. But this time, he didn't know what to do. He couldn't turn to the wisdom of the ancients, as he usually did in such situations. No one had ever experienced hurting a girl like her because of another personality's games.

So, even now, he wasn't sure if Giselle's answer was the right one.

"Just forget it all. As if nothing ever happened between us."

Apologizing would only remind her of what occurred. Therefore, saying 'I'm sorry' only eased Edwin's conscience but made Giselle uncomfortable, so he had to hold back.

'Is she uncomfortable even with my calls?'

Over and over, he returned to the starting point, asking himself the same question.

'I need to make sure Giselle is alright. If I cut contact and we can't go back to how we were before, that would hurt her more.'

And over and over, he reached the same conclusion.

"I'll call you at 10 to make sure you've returned home."

"Yes, I'll be here."

If he didn't know Giselle had gotten through the day safely, he would go mad.


Chapter 85.

"Have a good day."

"You too, Sir."

Finally, the conversation ended without him being able to express his true, uncomfortable feelings. The moment he hung up the phone, a guilt even more overwhelming than during the call washed over him.

During the call, Giselle had sighed as if bored by his repetitive lecturing, and Edwin couldn't help but laugh.

How could he laugh after what he did to her?

If he hadn't been sincere, if it had all been an act for Giselle, perhaps he wouldn't feel so disgusted with himself.

But even so, he had to smile for Giselle.

Even if he wanted to die, he had to keep living for her.

He got out of bed and headed to the bathroom. The shower was the second most agonizing moment of his day, right after talking to Giselle.

Now, just the sight of his own body filled him with rage. Though he had stained his hands with the blood of many people, he should never have stained his hands with Giselle's blood. The first was a soldier's duty, but the second was an unforgivable sin.

He wanted to cut off the organ that had violated that girl. Also the fingers that had clawed at her insides. The lips. The tongue. The eyes. Every dirty, disgusting part that had defiled Giselle. In the end, he concluded it would be better to just kill himself entirely.

But he couldn't die, at least not for Giselle's sake.

Standing outside the bathroom door, listening to the sound of the water, Loise's hair suddenly stood on end. It suddenly occurred to him that there was a razor blade inside the bathroom.

"Your Grace, you mustn't. You promised Miss Bishop you would call her tonight."

He hoped the Duke hadn't forgotten. And he mustn't forget to order the maids to hide all sharp objects. He couldn't abandon his post now.

Following orders to watch the Duke without looking away for a second, even while he slept, Loise and other employees took turns observing him. This had been the case since that night, a week ago, when they received a call to go to Miss Bishop's house.

"He only pretended to be gone."

The preliminary symptoms he used to experience when that evil personality appeared were just a farce. Now, that personality took control without warning, so he couldn't alert the others.

But that wasn't all. The news that that entity had been spitting out sleeping pills and escaping through the window to wander around Templeton left him dismayed. And when he learned that demon had been in control the entire day, it felt like a blow to the head.

The entire way from Templeton to Richmond, he hadn't suspected for a moment that it was an imposter. Though he prided himself on knowing the Duke better than anyone, having observed him since childhood, he hadn't noticed it was someone else. Loise was consumed by guilt and regret.

"Damn it, if I had noticed, things wouldn't have come to this."

Although he didn't know exactly what had happened while that entity took control of the Duke's body, he could imagine it from their strained relationship and the Duke's devastated state.

"That lunatic had to mess with that girl"

Even he, who didn't know all the details, was shocked. He couldn't imagine how the Duke must feel. He feared that at any moment, the Duke might put a gun in his mouth and pull the trigger, like his brother had. Loise couldn't stand idly by. Hiding all dangerous objects and watching him 24 hours a day wasn't just on the Duke's orders.

It was a tragedy to call this a blessing, but since that day, the Duke was barely awake. Now, he was plunged into a deep sleep, drugged with powdered sleeping pills to keep him from vomiting them up. He only woke for an hour or two in the morning and evening, when he had to call Miss Bishop.

It was an extreme measure to keep that demon at bay. Though he worried if his body could withstand it, deep down, Loise was relieved he didn't have the opportunity to make an extreme decision.

He believed the Duke understood he had to endure for Miss Bishop's sake, but how many people had chosen to take their own lives despite having someone so important.

It wasn't just the Duke that worried him, but Miss Bishop too. He had given instructions to the maids at Magnolia Terrace to take special care of Miss Bishop, and without explaining the reason, he received daily reports on her condition.

"She's so busy she hardly spends any time at home."

Is it that children have a different resilience than adults? Loise didn't forget that Miss Bishop was a precocious child. He knew that, for the Duke's sake, she wouldn't show her true feelings. As the Duke's attendant, Loise was grateful for that, but as the father of a daughter her age, he felt a profound sadness and guilt, and desperately wished he could do something for her.

"But the best I can do is pretend I know nothing."

And so, after a week where the shock hadn't subsided, Loise was standing outside the bathroom door when his subordinate entered the room.

"There are only two things to report this morning."

"Go ahead."

"First, an hour ago we received a call from Duchess Roxworth's secretary. She asked why the Duke had declined the invitation and if he could call her to explain."

It was impossible for the Duke to make the call personally. Over the past week, they had received countless calls from the Ministry of Veterans, the army, and the Duke's acquaintances, but they hadn't transferred any directly. If that demon picked up the phone, it would be a disaster.

So, when a decision from the Duke was needed, Loise would ask him while he was awake and relay it. For matters that didn't require his confirmation, Loise handled them on his own. That included dealing with Duchess Roxworth, who insisted on arranging meetings with potential Duchess candidates.

"I'll take care of contacting her later."

"Understood. The next thing is a call from a journalist at the Richmond Observer."

"An interview request? Reject it according to the usual instructions."

He thought it was a common interview request, like the ones they often received, but he was wrong.

"This request has a different tone than the usual ones. The journalist mentioned that the Duke seems to have a close relationship with Professor Fletcher from King's Bridge Medical College and wanted to ask about him."

.Professor Fletcher?

Loise felt a chill run down his spine.

How did they know the Duke had a relationship with the professor? Did they also know he was being treated for multiple personality disorder? If so, it would be a huge problem. If more information had leaked, the situation would become unmanageable.

"Did they say anything more specific?"

"That was all they mentioned."

"In what way was it different from the usual requests?"

"They asked as if there was something shady about the relationship between Professor Fletcher and the Duke."

"Contact them again and tell them the Duke met the professor because his youngest daughter and one of the Duke's sponsored students were classmates at the academy. The Duke is considering financially supporting his research because he's interested in his field of study. Clarify that it's a purely professional sponsorship relationship and that, if there's anything questionable about the professor, the Duke will cut ties immediately. Investigate further to discover their intentions."

"Understood, I'll do it."

This kind of matter is better handled by someone who knows nothing and believes the sponsorship relationship is genuine. If it's not an act, there's no way they'll find out.

"By the way, a journalist investigating Professor Fletcher?"

Even if the target wasn't the Duke's medical condition, but Professor Fletcher, it was still an uncomfortable matter.

"Will it be correct to proceed with this today.?"

Listening to the sounds from the bathroom, which had now stopped, Loise looked anxiously at his wristwatch and hesitated.

"No, I don't want to. Please, kill me, sniff."

Suddenly, Edwin realized. In the end, he had ended up abusing the girl who, when he first met her, trembled in fear at the possibility of him raping her.

Squeezing his eyes shut, a drop of water fell from his wet hair and slid down his cheek. It followed a long path until it reached the sharp line of his jaw, where the drop grew larger than it was at first.

On the battlefield, he had saved and sponsored many orphans, but Giselle was the only one he had raised personally. Precisely Giselle, because she was the most damaged.

She had witnessed her parents, siblings, and neighbors being massacred and looted by demons in human masks for a month, and had killed and eaten the dog she herself had raised. All of that at just ten years old.

He feared that if he sent her to an orphanage, she would die in a short time or, if she survived, she would go mad before she could integrate into society and spend the rest of her life locked in a psychiatric hospital. That's why he took her with him to the dangerous battlefield.

Perhaps, for her, that experience of surviving on the line between life and death alongside an adult she could trust was more healing than having remained in the safe rear.

Bringing Giselle and raising her was, in part, a selfish choice by Edwin.


Chapter 86.

The deeper the child's wounds, the more gratifying it was to heal them.

Living as a soldier meant having to commit acts that went against his moral convictions. For Edwin, who suffered because of it, Giselle was the closest and dearest proof that 'at least there was a time when I was a good person.'

"Now she has become the evidence of my wickedness."

The girl had also healed him. Through Giselle's eyes, the world didn't seem as bad as he saw it, and that made Edwin, who had become a pessimistic realist due to his unrealistic idealism, think that even this very imperfect world was worth living in.

In some corner of every home, there is always dirty laundry to wash. Unlike him, who had given up all hope on humanity early on, the ten-year-old girl, despite having witnessed the darkest and most repulsive side of humanity, had not completely closed her heart.

While admiring her determination, he also felt an anxiety to protect her, fearing that she might get hurt again. Precisely because the girl had opened her heart to him first, he didn't want to be the person who caused her pain.

"In the end, I ended up being that person."

Giselle Bishop was Edwin Eccleston's redemption and cure, but for that very reason, she became the victim of his sin, suffering an even deeper wound.

As he buttoned the sleeves of his shirt, Edwin clenched his fist so tightly that the veins on his hand clearly stood out. The eyes in the mirror seemed to mock him. Suddenly, he felt confused, wondering if the thoughts and regrets he had been having were truly his or if they were part of the demon's script in his head.

He almost struck his reflection in the mirror in a fit of rage, but stopped in time. This was not the moment. He had to strengthen his heart and remain vigilant.

Giselle's wounds and his guilt might not end that night.

He hadn't worn formal clothes in a week. This morning, he also sat on his bedroom windowsill, dressed in light attire. Loise, who was watching him anxiously, approached. It was time to hear the reports, but today he had an order to give first.

"Contact Doctor Huntington. Tell him we need a trustworthy and discreet nurse to care for a woman at the house." "I will do so."

Loise, experienced in these matters, didn't ask who needed care, since he would arrange it through the family doctor.

"Is there anything else I should tell the nurse?"

But he did ask what kind of care was needed. Loise had no idea what Edwin had done.

"Giselle might be pregnant with my child."

Suddenly, Edwin realized he was no different from the previous Dukes, who secretly contacted their trusted doctors when their mistresses became pregnant. He felt even more disgusted with himself.

The only difference was that Edwin didn't want to take Giselle to an operating table. He had heard terrifying rumors in his childhood about women who had died during such procedures, and he had never forgotten them. Not only because of the risk of abortion, but because he couldn't bear the thought of Giselle having to go through that due to his mistake.

What if he asked her to have the baby? How would that be different?

"If you should become pregnant"

Although he believed the decision should be Giselle's, as it was her body, he also felt the responsibility was his. But he couldn't say it.

He knew those words could put pressure on Giselle. He didn't want her to hide the pregnancy out of fear of his reaction.

"Promise that you won't think about it alone and that you will tell me."

Perhaps he should have been firmer, more sincere. But he feared that anything he said might sound like an imposition or have the opposite effect, and he still regretted not speaking more clearly.

Now, what Edwin feared most was not that Giselle would have his child, but that if she became pregnant, she wouldn't tell him and would face the fear and pain of an abortion alone. The thought of her enduring that suffering in solitude made him feel as if his blood boiled and then instantly froze.

Why should Giselle pay alone for a sin that I committed?

The problem was that Giselle was a girl who would do something like that. She had requested a separate dormitory because she feared Edwin would cut off his support. Was it just his delusion to think she considered him family?

"Giselle, what am I to you?"

Now he knew the uncomfortable answer. Someone she loved as a man, but to whom she couldn't show all her insecurities. Or perhaps, precisely because she loved him as a man, she couldn't show him her most vulnerable side.

Upon reaching this point, his already complicated mental state became even more tangled. The only thing clear was that this wasn't the main problem at the moment.

Either way, he knew Giselle wouldn't tell him anything, so he needed to find out through other people. And if she became pregnant, she would need medical help regardless of the decision she made.

"She might not be pregnant."

A week was too soon to know, but he was already worried. Hoping it was an unnecessary concern, Edwin decided to address the most immediate problem.

"Tell the nurse to monitor her psychological stability and, if necessary, connect her with a psychiatrist. A woman. And to inform me of any treatment she receives."

Although he didn't mention Giselle's name, Edwin was receiving therapy and medication from Professor Fletcher. Even so, he was a wreck. How could Giselle endure all this sober?

Leaving her alone because he wanted to bury the matter was, no matter how he looked at it, another mistake as her protector.

"I will do so." "What else is there to report?" "Only one more thing."

Then, Loise informed him that the journalist had contacted him again about Professor Fletcher, detailing everything that seemed suspicious.

"When you know the purpose of the investigation, let me know." "Of course."

The instructions and reports ended there, but Loise did not withdraw. He looked at him with an expression that seemed to expect more words.

Loise was probably hoping Edwin would reconsider undergoing treatment with a professor who had suspicious aspects.

However, Edwin had no intention of changing his mind about the procedure he had decided to follow. He firmly refused and moved away from the window, sitting on the bed.

"Sir, what will you do today?"

Giselle had asked him that question a while ago. Edwin had replied that he was busy with various matters, but it was a lie.

Except for the time he lived for Giselle, he was a dead man.

Soon, Loise would bring him a glass of water with sleeping pills, so Edwin would sleep alongside the demon until they woke him up for the call.

"Wait a moment."

Loise left the room and whispered instructions to someone invisible in the hallway, without taking his eyes off Edwin. When Loise returned to the room, he didn't bring the glass of water with sleeping pills.

Shortly after, men dressed in white burst into the room and surrounded Edwin. When an unknown young man calmly entered, carrying a medical bag, Edwin knew.

"Today is the day."

Although Edwin had decided to undergo treatment with Professor Fletcher, the date had been kept secret from him. He knew the demon would also find out.

The nurses, prepared for the demon's resistance, restrained Edwin while the doctor took a metal box from the suitcase. The syringe he pulled out was filled with a clear liquid. Probably a sedative.

Edwin had anticipated that the demon would not easily surrender to the attempt to eliminate him, so the restraint was necessary. However, the cunning parasite remained disturbingly quiet as the needle penetrated and left Edwin's arm.

After receiving the strong sedative, Edwin's vision blurred, and the scene around him changed several times.

"Did something happen to the Duke?"

At some point, he thought he heard Giselle's voice. He was sure it was a hallucination caused by the sedative.

"I'm sorry, my puppy. I'm going to kill that demon and I'll come back. No, do I even have the right to come back to you, even if I kill that demon?"

Soon, the smell of disinfectant began to hit his nose, and he finally realized they had arrived at the hospital.

The men in white carried his restrained gurney into a room. While securing his head with straps and connecting something, Edwin did not take his eyes off the ceiling illuminated by a bright light. Suddenly, a somber face appeared in the light and looked at him.

"Duke, I will do my best. Trust me and leave it in my hands."

Hearing Professor Fletcher's voice, Edwin closed his eyes.

It was natural to want to tear apart and kill the one who had violated his child. And so, Edwin submitted to the operating table.

Chapter 87.

"Who could it be?"

— "I'll call you at 10, so don't be late getting home."

This man who cares about me.

Is he my caring Edwin?

— "Every night I will call to make sure you have locked the doors properly and lowered the shutters. If you don't want me to rush over in the middle of the night, answer."

Or is he that cunning demon who played the role of my worried Edwin with chilling perfection?

Demon.

It was the proper name for the other man inside her Edwin—for Giselle, who thought she was soaring toward heaven, but realized she was actually being slowly dragged into hell.

"Sir, what will you do today?"

Giselle, confused, and unsure who the man on the other end of the phone was, made an effort to ask as she usually did.

— "Me? I have to prepare for the photo exhibition, and I also have a business meeting at lunchtime. I have many things to do."

Maybe it is my Edwin. He lied with good intentions so Giselle wouldn't worry. Now that the demon he can't control is inside him, there's no point in him meeting with other people, so the business meeting must be a lie.

'Will he be alone at home?'

.He won't be locked up in a psychiatric hospital, will he?

Suddenly, Giselle was invaded by a terrifying thought, fueled by her worry about Edwin's 'madness.' She instantly felt driven to go to the residence and ensure he was safe and sound.

— "It's dangerous, so don't come looking for me for a while. Even if I tell you to come, you must not trust me until I am completely cured, understand?"

She only needs to avoid seeing him in person. If she could see him through a window or a door, and confirm that he is safe and sound at the residence.

But as soon as she realized that to do that she would have to face Sir Loise, her impulse vanished.

'Sir Loise will know what happened. How pathetic will I look?'

Moreover, my Edwin won't proudly watch Giselle worry about his well-being as before. He now knows that Giselle's interest isn't pure.

Bump bump.

The sound of her heart beating echoed in her ears. Not from excitement, of course.

'Act like it didn't happen. That didn't happen.'

Throughout the call, she repeated 'calmly, elegantly' along with 'as if nothing happened.' She never thought she would need a crisis-management spell just to exchange a few trivial words with her Edwin.

— "Have a good day." "You too, Sir."

Although her appointment with Elena was more than three hours away, Giselle left home with her bag packed as soon as the call ended. Compared to Edwin, who had to isolate himself, she was lucky to be able to leave whenever she wanted.

Leaving the neighborhood was quick. Crossing the street would lead her to the Kingsbridge East Campus, but Giselle walked south down the avenue. Seeing a bank, she went in to fill her wallet and collect several brochures on financial products filled with complicated terms. Then, she bought a morning newspaper and some magazines at a street stall.

Moving so busily so early in the morning made her feel like a very busy person, but she actually wasn't, so she desperately forced herself to find things to do.

The survey for new students in her bag also had a deadline of one month. So there was no need to jump out of bed and answer the 50 questions with sincerity and care. In fact, it wasn't even mandatory to submit it.

If Elena saw it, she would certainly say something about why waste time on a survey you could submit or not. That's why she had to submit it before seeing her. It was one of the many non-mandatory obligations Giselle had created in recent days.

After walking for a while down a tree-shaded street, the south gate near the academic administration office began to appear across the street. Giselle passed the entrance to the Kingsbridge University Hospital and stopped in front of the pedestrian crossing.

After a boring wait, the pedestrian light turned green, but Giselle couldn't take a step. The driver of the car that stopped in front of the crosswalk, following the patient transport van, looked familiar.

'Is that person. Sir Loise?'

Sir Loise also saw Giselle. His eyes, which instantly widened, seemed to ask her why she was there.

Just when she thought it would be awkward to run into him, she coincidentally bumped into him. At first, she felt the need to flee, uncomfortable, but.

'This is in front of the hospital. It looks like he was following the ambulance closely. Could my Edwin be inside?'

Giselle's heart immediately seized up at the doubt that arose, and her feet moved in the opposite direction. Sir Loise, seeing Giselle running toward him with a pale face, rolled down the car window. Giselle didn't even have time to think about greeting him first and asked him directly:

"Did something happen to the Duke?"

Sir Loise blinked several times, then directed his gaze toward the hospital, and finally showed an expression of understanding in response to the question.

"Nothing has happened to the Duke. An acquaintance has been hospitalized, so I am visiting them in his stead."

"Ah."

There was no reason to think that Sir Loise was following the ambulance, but Giselle had already created an entire story in her mind. 'Why did I do that?' Her dignity, which was already at rock bottom, vanished without a trace. She tried to say goodbye without looking directly at him, shifting her gaze to the ambulance, but Sir Loise quickly asked her, stopping her.

"But where is Dawson going? Why are you walking to school alone?"

"Huh? Ah. it's not a distance that requires taking the car. Besides, I have some errands to run along the way."

It was a lie. In reality, she hadn't called the driver because it felt awkward.

Rita Dawson, Giselle's driver, was a former soldier in her twenties who, after the last war, had come into contact with Edwin and became her driver and bodyguard. Although it was comforting that she was a woman, the fact that their only common topic was Edwin made it uncomfortable.

Every time she got in the car, she brought up the topic of Edwin. And Giselle still couldn't talk about him with a smile.

"Morning or noon is fine, but in the evening, when you return home, you must call Dawson. Otherwise, Dawson will be severely scolded by the Duke." "Yes, I understand." "Do you know that the Duke worries about you, Miss Bishop?"

She was going to answer yes, but at that moment her throat seemed to block, and she couldn't make a sound, so she just nodded her head.

"Then, I must leave quickly."

Giselle, although she didn't have an urgent place to go, anxiously watched the traffic light that could soon change.

"Go quickly. Attend your classes well, and be sure to call Dawson tonight." "Yes, yes, I will!"

At least, even if she ran, it wouldn't look like she was fleeing. Giselle crossed the pedestrian crossing without looking back even once, unaware that Sir Loise was relieved to see her walk away.

As soon as she reached the other side of the street, she stopped. Thump thump. Her heart was beating so hard it seemed like it wanted to jump out of her chest. It wasn't because she had run.

Seeing Sir Loise scolding her with concern, she couldn't help but remember a man who worried and scolded more than anyone. All her efforts to forget, distracting herself with trivial things on the street, had become useless in an instant.

Bump bump bump.

'Calmly, elegantly. As if nothing happened.'

Giselle repeated the spell and took several deep breaths before she could continue walking.

After dropping the survey into the administrative office mailbox, she felt like a lost, directionless child again. She walked aimlessly around campus until, suddenly, it began to rain torrentially, and she ran toward the nearest building.

She followed a group of students who were carelessly talking about a recent movie plot without thinking and ended up entering a classroom she had never seen before. Giselle sat in a corner of the classroom and attended a class that she was not only not enrolled in, but didn't even know what subject it was.

— "Viruses are classified as a type of absolute parasite."

— "Professor."

In the middle of the class, which turned out to be microbiology, a student raised his hand and asked:

— "Viruses are not living things, are they?"

— "To argue that, we must first define what a living thing is."

The professor, as if he had been waiting for that question, guided the students to discuss the definition of life.

What can be considered alive? Although it is intuitively felt, defining it with words is not easy. In the classroom, arguments and refutations were exchanged that spanned from science to philosophy.

Giselle also had many things to say and ask, but since she wasn't a biology student, she was afraid of being discovered, so she held back and only took notes.

'But, what is an absolute parasite?'

— "Professor, excuse me, what is an absolute parasite?"

Fortunately, Giselle was not the only one who didn't know. However, since it was a concept that students at that level should know, many threw looks of contempt at the student who asked the question.

— "It is a parasite that, from birth until reproduction and death, cannot survive independently and depends absolutely on its host. That is to say, a parasite that kills its host too soon is a failed parasite."

The professor, instead of scolding the student for not having studied enough, kindly and detailedly explained a concept that wasn't even in his area.

— "For this type of parasite, it is crucial to keep its host alive until its life cycle ends."

Chapter 88.

A parasite that kills its host is a failed parasite.

Giselle diligently wrote down the microbiology professor's teachings on parasitology in her notebook, even though they weren't relevant to her exams. In the preceding pages, her notes were filled with what she had learned in Constance's literature class the day before.

It was the third day since she began filling her free time by attending classes outside her major. Although she spent most of her time in the library reviewing and preparing for her own classes, it wasn't enough. She wasted time on things that wouldn't help her grades, simply because she couldn't bear the noise of her own thoughts when sitting in the quiet library.

— "Giselle, there's actually another person inside me."

.Is that a lie, right?

— "There are parasites that, fascinatingly, change their host's behavior for their own benefit."

.How?

As she struggled to understand an advanced class that was difficult even for students in that field, there came a moment when the commotion in her mind quieted down. Attending the microbiology class and then a linear algebra class, which she didn't understand a single word of, proved to be very effective.

At noon, she met Elena for lunch and a chat, under the guise of preparing for a club interview. Finally, in the afternoon, she attended her own classes. After all classes ended, she headed directly with Elena to the area where the clubs were located.

Since enrollment day, the clubs had been setting up stalls across campus, handing out brochures, and fiercely competing to attract new members. Over the past week, when she wasn't in her right mind, Giselle had blindly followed Elena, wanting to appear like a normal freshman. By the time she regained her sanity, she had already submitted applications to seven clubs.

Perhaps it was a foolish thing well done. Once club activities began, they would give her something to do besides attending random classes.

"Hello, I came for the interview."

Popular clubs sometimes held entrance exams. The place she had come to for the interview was the Patriotic Student Club. It was essentially a community service group, but it was actually a place for networking, according to Elena, who had encouraged her to apply there first.

From politicians whose names were well-known to even the Crown Princess, many prominent graduates who held important positions in society had been members of the Patriotic Student Club. Because of this, the number of applicants was overwhelming, and although they interviewed five people at a time, more than an hour passed before Giselle and Elena entered the interview room.

"Elena Zelinska?" "It's Yelinska." "Hmm. our club only accepts citizens of Mercia." "I am a citizen of Mercia, born in Mercia."

The interviewers, sophomores and juniors, continued to question Elena's foreign background throughout the interview.

'Then, they will surely notice that I am from Roselle.'

Perfect. Insults like "mongrel dog" were even more welcome. She had finally found a way to release, justifiably and at least superficially, the emotions that sometimes choked her throat.

'Calmly and elegantly, I will make a mess.'

No matter how elegant, a mess was still a mess. So what if she wasn't accepted into the club? Giselle had no interest in this club from the start.

The old, ambitious Giselle Bishop might have desired it. At least she would have cared about her reputation. But after that night, nothing made sense to Giselle, except for one thing.

So she hoped those conceited "patriots" would object to her too.

"Miss Bishop." "Yes." "Are you the Miss Bishop related to Duke Eccleston?"

The epithet assigned to Giselle was, at that moment, even more awkward than 'mongrel dog.'

"Oh, yes, that's her. Nice to meet you! The Duke is my older brother's academy alumnus. Have you heard the name Hugo Phillips?"

Giselle nodded, recalling that Sir Loise had told her that someone with that name had contacted Edwin. With just that, the interviewer, who already seemed arrogant, raised her chin even higher and puffed up with pride. At that moment, the impartiality of the interview collapsed, and the interviewer, forgetting the purpose of the interview, began boasting about her connections.

"We hope you will participate actively, Miss Bishop."

Incredibly, only Giselle was accepted. When she left the club with a paper bag full of welcome gifts, she finally realized this was not right.

She had been accepted into the club because of Edwin. How many days would pass without hearing the word "Duke" while socializing with the members? It was almost like self-harm.

"I should withdraw." "Are you crazy, Miss Bishop?"

But when she tried to go back to the club, Elena stopped her. While being dragged away and scolded during dinner, Giselle couldn't stop thinking that she should leave the club.

"Let's go to the library."

That thought stopped because of what Elena said after dinner.

".The library?"

Giselle hastily proposed another idea.

"How about instead of going there, we study at your house or mine? Studying together while chatting helps things stick better in your head." "The student who entered as first in her class, determined to devour Kingsbridge from day one, why are you suddenly avoiding the library as if it gives you hives?" ".You were the one who said you didn't want to rot in the library with dead trees during the precious time you should be exploring the freedom allowed to an adult. Why do you suddenly want to go there?" "I have a debate class tomorrow. I need to find material in those dead trees."

With those words, Elena firmly turned toward the library. Now, Giselle's remaining options were to go to the library with her friend or go home alone. It was a question with an obvious answer.

"Let's go together."

She wouldn't give space for her mind to become noisy. With that determination, she sat in the library and concentrated all her attention on every letter printed in the books.

'The logic of the senses is different from that of reason, truth and falsehood, falsehood.'

But the moment she unfortunately encountered a word and her mind paused, a sharp whisper intruded into her thoughts without warning.

'.Is everything a lie?'

With that phrase, a crack began to open in her reason. With no time to stop it, the turmoil rushed in like a tide, trying to bring down her rationality.

'It's a lie. Something like multiple personality disorder can't be real! It's a lie! Sir, this is a lie, right? Please tell me it's a lie.'

From the moment she met Edwin, Giselle's life had seemed like an incredible lie. But this was the first time reality felt like a lie she didn't want to believe.

Multiple personality disorder had happened to no one else but Edwin. And, to top it all off, that evil personality had played with Giselle. In the cruelest way.

Are you telling me this is real, not a novel or a movie?

Is it a lie?

'Why would my Edwin lie to me like this?'

Her reason, which had miserably collapsed, revived and told her something cruel.

No matter how playful, he wasn't reckless or evil enough to play with a woman's body and heart. He didn't speak vulgarly like a street thug, nor did he harbor impure desires toward a child.

'Why did you let yourself be fooled knowing that? How many times did you feel it wasn't him? Why did you ignore all those signs?'

How could she rationally think about something like multiple personality disorder?

Multiple personality disorder. Does that make sense?

.Is everything a lie?

Her thoughts always returned to the irrational starting point. Trapped in that vicious circle that led nowhere, the impulse reached the tip of her lips.

'Investigate it.'

The truth about multiple personality disorder, buried somewhere among the countless shelves of this enormous library.

Seized by that urge, for the first few days she searched throughout the library, finding books and even the latest articles on multiple personality disorder and reading them voraciously. It was not a common condition, so there was not much literature. In two days she had read them all, but Giselle couldn't let go and reread them again and again.

Until she suddenly felt pathetic and put them down. What Giselle had been struggling to discover, grappling with psychiatric terms and concepts foreign to her, was not a way to cure Edwin.

'I want my Edwin to tell me that he actually loves me.'

Giselle was only looking for a truth that favored her.

That deep within Edwin's subconscious, beneath his reason, there was a love for Giselle as a woman, hidden even from him, which manifested as another personality. That this personality was also Edwin, so the whispers and promises he made to her had not become nothing.

In reality, the one writing a ridiculous novel was Giselle.

However, she couldn't get rid of that novel because it wasn't completely baseless. There was an article that argued that multiple personality disorder was a manifestation of repressed desires. Of course, that hope quickly faded thanks to a contradictory article.

In the midst of all that, the only truth she discovered was that multiple personality disorder was an understudied field due to the lack of cases. With more hypotheses than facts, instead of helping, it only increased her confusion.

— "By the way, an authority on multiple personality disorder is at our university."

One day, the librarian suggested to Giselle, who kept asking if there was more material or literature.

— "Why don't you go see Professor Fletcher from the medical faculty?"

Chapter 89.
The moment I heard those words, it was like seeing a ray of light. If I acted like a curious student and recounted Edwin's story as a hypothetical case, perhaps I could get a clear answer instead of wandering alone. But.

— "Wait, Professor. Fletcher?"

I remembered that one of Fullerton's classmates had a father who was a professor at the Kingsbridge medical faculty, his surname was Fletcher. I also remembered that at the graduation ball, Edwin had been talking to an old man who seemed to be that boy's father.

'Ah. Edwin must already be receiving treatment from Professor Fletcher.'

Then, I shouldn't go near that place.

No, I should stop wasting time on nonsense like this.

I had barely made that decision when ambition raised its head again, fueling irrational impulses. Although, in a few days, there wouldn't be a revolutionary breakthrough in multiple personality disorder research that definitively proved the conclusion Giselle desired was the truth.

I shouldn't wish in vain for what I don't have, but cling to the evidence and beliefs that I do have.

The evidence that Edwin does not love me. That, sadly, was undoubtable.

— "I love you, Giselle. It's just not that kind of love."

That night, the answer Edwin gave Giselle, who couldn't believe he had multiple personality disorder, left no room for interpretation.

— "You know me. Think carefully. Do you think I would see you as a woman?"

I wanted to insist that he was denying feelings he didn't even know, but Giselle couldn't convince herself. Saying that Edwin's love for me manifested in another personality made no sense, because that demon didn't love me.

— "Do you love me?" — "Yes, I love you more than my life." — "No. You love Edwin Eccleston."

It was only upon recalling the conversation with the demon that I realized.

— "Don't call me 'Lord'."

He referred to himself and Edwin as clearly different people.

— "Your Edwin loves you too."

And he said that it was not me, but Edwin who loved Giselle. Recalling it, the demon had always despised and ridiculed Giselle for loving Edwin, and his words of love were nothing more than cruel, irresponsible mockery.

Therefore, the truth is clear.

Edwin does not love me.

Only I love Edwin.

And now he knows it.

Thump thump thump.

'As if nothing happened. As if nothing happened'

I stared intently at the letters until my eyes hurt, took a deep breath, and exhaled. Elena, sitting beside me, stared back and whispered.

"What's wrong with you?" "It's not sinking in. Want to go get a drink?"

At my impulsive suggestion, Elena seemed surprised for a moment, but quickly proposed a concrete plan, as if she had been waiting for this opportunity.

"Alright. How about we go to Yelinsky's bar for a tasting? Yelinsky, who still has plenty of hair, will pay the bill."

Her plan to go to her house, steal the expensive liquor her father had collected, and blame her older brother was so convincing and wicked that I almost fell for it. In reality, she probably just wanted to hear my concerns in a quiet place. After living together for four years, Elena had already sensed that something was wrong with me.


"A party just the two of us, no boys. How boring."

Although I knew Elena was worried, I acted as if I didn't notice and headed to a bustling pub near the school. Elena didn't insist on going to a quiet place and followed me. She had understood what I hadn't said.

'Thank you, but I can't tell you.'

It is lonely not being able to trust even your best friend. Even amidst my peers celebrating the first week of classes, drinking nonstop and talking animatedly, the solitude persisted.

I suppressed the words I wanted to say and only released meaningless, trivial stories. Instead of the screams that resonated incessantly inside me, I only brought out dry laughter and forced words from my throat.

'I want to be alone.'

An unhappy person in the midst of all the happy ones. I am already alone.

But I didn't leave. Because there is only one place to go now. And I didn't like that place. No, I was afraid of it.

Just like I don't like dogs, but I am afraid of them.

— "Giselle!" — "Ah. Rita." — "It's already 9 PM, Miss. We should go home."

Thump thump thump.

But the moment all my effort not to return to that room became useless arrived without fail tonight.

At 10:10 p.m., after about thirteen hours, Giselle returned to the place she had fled from.

Thump thump thump.

'.Is it a lie?'

Standing at the quiet entrance of the house, the sounds that weren't clearly heard in the bustling bar came back to life with clarity. Although they were a little fainter than before. I had gained something by drinking.

Now I understand why soldiers on the front lines drank so much of that unpleasant liquor. They also had things they wanted to forget but couldn't.

"I'm back."

Thanks to the effect of the alcohol, I entered the house with a calmer heart than usual, but it didn't last long.

Thump thump thump thump thump thump thump thump thump thump thump thump.

As soon as I took off my clothes in the bathroom, my heart started pounding as if it were about to burst. It was because the marks that the demon, wearing my Lord's mask, had left on my body were still visible.

— "I'm leaving them for you to see."

He left them for me to see, not for another man.

— "Did you enjoy your Lord's cock that much last night?"

The moment I heard the demon's mockery using my Lord's voice, the scream I had suppressed came out as a faint sob.

Giselle quickly stepped into the shower and turned on the tap. The sound of cold water falling forcefully drowned everything out. Only the sound that I couldn't help but let escape.

— "You're already wet. My puppy, did you like your Lord caressing you?"

I couldn't silence the voice resonating in my head.

No. I didn't like it.

If I finished showering quickly and covered my body, the demon's voice mocking me would stop. In my hurry, the soap-filled sponge slipped between my legs and brushed against a hidden bulge in the skin.

Hiss.

— "It's the first time, but you feel good."

No. I never felt it.

— "A woman's body is like this. Soft. smooth. warm. It's the first time I've felt anything like this."

No. Don't touch me.

Giselle rubbed and washed every spot where he, using my Lord's hands, had touched me, until my skin was red.

— "Your inside is hot. I could melt."

The moment the sensation of his cock penetrating me suddenly revived, a scream so sharp that even the sound of the water couldn't drown it out briefly escaped through my teeth.

I thought I had made love with my Lord, but it wasn't so. It wasn't my Lord.

The more I accepted that he was a completely different person from my Lord, the clearer the cruel realization became. Giselle was no different from having been raped by a stranger posing as my Lord.

— "I endured that hell for this moment. Ah, it was worth it."

Disgusting.

Suddenly, my mind reached the conclusion that not only had I been violated, I felt disgusting too.

— "Giselle, look closely. Your Lord is having sex with you."

Now I know that when he said 'Lord,' he wasn't referring to himself having sex with Giselle. He was mocking my Lord, who knew nothing and was violated by the demon and by me.

Just as he did to me, I also violated my Lord.

— "Giselle, you touched it and your Lord got hard."

I'm sorry. I'm sorry, Sir. I didn't know. I wasn't trying to mock you, I just sincerely loved you.

No matter what my feelings were, I cannot be forgiven for desiring a man who does not love me. I'm sorry.

The sobs escaping through my teeth grew louder and louder. Fearing the maid would hear them outside, Giselle fully opened the tap. The torrent of water, like a storm, washed away both the sobs and the tears.

— "There's an arrogant guy who always calls me a leech or a parasite and doesn't even treat me like a person."

He said all this was revenge against my Lord.

— "I completely ruined him, ruthlessly. Even the girl he most cherished."

But why did you try to ruin me? Why ruin me too?

What did I do? What did I do wrong? Why me? Why did it have to be this way?

Because of this, Giselle not only hated that demon, but also herself. Although I tore at my skin until it bled, the self-hatred didn't diminish one bit.

At least, after letting it all out and allowing the cold water to wash everything away, I thought my heart had calmed down considerably.

"I almost forgot."

It was until the maid handed a business card to Giselle, who had covered her body, now more disfigured than before washing, with a long nightgow

Chapter 90.
— "A nurse working at Dr. Huntington's clinic came by today. She said to call this number today, even if it's late."

Dr. Huntington was the personal physician of the Eccleston ducal family. Giselle, who had observed the lives of the upper class for a long time, knew very well the extent to which wealthy men's personal doctors went.

— "In case you get pregnant"

Edwin never stated his preference. It went without saying that he did not want a child with Giselle.

Perhaps he thought Giselle hadn't understood? He sent someone in advance to ensure the pregnancy would be immediately taken care of.

Thump thump thump thump

— ".Miss Bishop? Is something wrong?" — "Ah. I'm not in any pain, but suddenly they're talking about a hospital. Thank you. I'll rest now."

Giselle, left alone in the room, stared fixedly at the phone on the bedside table. She made a decision when her gaze fell on the clock next to it.

It's better than hearing it from Edwin's mouth in 30 minutes.

She sat in the armchair, picked up the receiver, and dialed the number on the business card. The person on the other end answered, giving her no time to prepare herself with a deep breath.

"Hello, I'm Giselle Bishop. I was told to call today. Yes. What?"

The completely unexpected topic made Giselle feel like a fool for having braced herself for the worst. The nurse was not there to inform her about an abortion clinic in case of pregnancy.

— "Is it difficult to keep up with university studies? Being first in your class must be a lot of pressure."

She didn't even seem to know the real reason why Edwin had sent her to Giselle. While Giselle appreciated Edwin's meticulous concern, the fact that her "feigned oblivion" wasn't working made her face burn with shame.

— "If you need help, I can connect you with a good doctor." — "Consultations and counseling are anonymous, so confidentiality is guaranteed." — — "You might feel reluctance when you hear 'treatment,' but think of it as a light conversation with an adult who will listen without prejudice and help you with your worries."

What should I seek counseling for?

For my stupidity in falling into another trap by coveting a luck I don't deserve? Is that truly something that can be treated? It seems more like a sin that I should confess in a church than an illness to treat with a doctor.

Greed is a deadly sin. Blinded by desire, unable to distinguish between an angel and a demon, she, who had been a puppet of the demon, was no different from a sinner.

The punishment was shame. It was unbearably shameful to have exposed not only her body but also her heart to a man who did not want her. And, above all, it was excruciating that Edwin knew everything.

"I need sleeping pills."

Her assertion that she slept well had already been exposed as a lie. To avoid worrying Edwin, who would certainly worry if she said she was fine, Giselle feigned needing assistance. No, for the sake of Edwin, who struggled to wish Giselle well even when he himself was unwell, Giselle also had to make an effort.

The good Lord.

That's why he couldn't cut ties with me as he would with other women.

— "The promise he made to you"

But that night, just as the man's harsh words were about to escape the angel's mouth, Giselle couldn't bear the rejection and fled first.

"I will forget it. Lord, forget it too."

After hanging up with the nurse, Giselle repeated her response from that night like a mantra while watching the clock. Just as the clock hands, moving slowly but diligently, pointed to exactly 10 o'clock, the phone rang.

Ring ring ring. Thump thump thump.

Forget it.

— "Hello."

As if nothing had happened.

— "Oh, yes? That's a relief."

On a night when the crisp air heralded the arrival of autumn, the Duke, who was talking on the phone with Miss Bishop, quickly scribbled something on the notepad in front of the phone and then held it up to show Loise.

Who is Rita?

Loise quickly whispered in his ear.

— "Rita Dawson, Miss Bishop's chauffeur and bodyguard. She said she met the Duke during the war."

The Duke's mouth uttered a brief sound of comprehension, but his eyes wandered into the air, struggling to retrieve the memory. Loise felt deeply uneasy watching the man, who had once been so brilliant, lose his shine in an instant. Today, too, his gut twisted seeing him.

Lately, the Duke had been suffering from memory loss. It was a side effect of the electroshock therapy.

In the first session, there were no noticeable side effects other than jaw pain from clenching his teeth. But as the sessions continued, the Duke began to forget orders he had given or ask about things he should know, which was suspicious. Loise learned too late that it was all due to that insane therapy.

'How dare they recommend this to the Duke?'

He was so furious he nearly grabbed the professor by the neck. But when he learned that the Duke had already been informed of the side effects before deciding to undergo the treatment, he felt utterly devastated.

He knew he would suffer brain damage and still went through with it.

Now, for Loise, electroshock therapy felt like a self-destructive act where the brain was randomly burned, hoping that the brain cells containing the demon's personality would die. It was like burning down the house to catch a mouse.

It was no wonder the brain was damaged by so much burning. It wasn't surprising that there were memory gaps, like a cheese riddled with holes.

Given that the Duke had personally experienced how severe the side effects were, Loise believed he would stop there. But the Duke insisted on continuing until the pre-established number of sessions was completed, which was madness.

— "Don't worry. They are temporary symptoms and will gradually improve."

Although the expert on multiple personality disorder was starting to look like a charlatan, Loise had no choice but to hope he was right. Fortunately, he didn't seem to be completely wrong, as some lost memories were slowly returning.

— "Sleep well. Ah, I'm not going to sleep yet. It's the privilege of someone who graduated from school ages ago. Are you envious? You should have been born earlier. I know. Yes. Anyway, you worked hard today too. Sleep well and we'll talk tomorrow."

Although he managed to end the call with Giselle today without her noticing his current state, Edwin's expression upon hanging up the phone was somber.

'She didn't say anything today either.'

He thought that by now she should know whether she was pregnant or not based on her menstrual cycle. That's why he had recently been hoping for an answer from Giselle every time they spoke, but she said nothing about it. Nor did it seem like she had something she wanted to say but hesitated.

So, she's not going to tell me?

Although the reality was precarious, breaking the balance of a seemingly stable relationship to ask was the necessary action.

Should I tell Rita Dawson, whom I assigned as a bodyguard, to bring her here immediately if she goes to get an abortion? He considered it, but dismissed the idea. Although he had recovered some memories about the soldier Dawson after hearing Loise's explanation, he hadn't recovered all of them.

Was that person tight-lipped?

The most crucial answer wouldn't come to mind.

When memories didn't come back in fragments like this, the frustration was unbearable. At least, it was a small consolation that he hadn't forgotten anything he had done to Giselle.

Remembering everything and suffering was the duty of a sinner like him. Forgetting even a little was a cowardly desertion. He couldn't allow it.

On the other hand, remembering everything without any loss was also a misfortune within a misfortune. Other recent memories had been slowly damaged, but those related to Giselle and that demon were intact.

As if someone had stored them and then returned them.

It was a misfortune because he perceived the presence of that demon who could conceal and release memories at will. His intuition told him that the demon wasn't dead, just lurking.

It's not working.

There was no reason to continue with a therapy that had no effect other than side effects, so he stopped it after the fifth session, which was the pre-established number.

— "We need a more drastic solution."

— "Lobotomy is completely out of the question, Duke!"

Loise, who was sitting across from Edwin at the chessboard, turned pale and immediately objected to a surgery that hadn't even been mentioned.

Even Dr. Fletcher did not recommend lobotomy. Not only had its effectiveness for multiple personality disorder not been confirmed, but it caused irreversible brain damage, which could leave the patient in a permanent vegetative state.

It was like killing oneself to kill the demon.

— "I believe I made it clear that I am not considering that." — "That's a relief. We are looking for other doctors, so please wait a little longer."

Edwin stopped not only the electroshock therapy but also all the treatments he was receiving from Professor Fletcher. The lack of effectiveness was the reason, but he would have given the professor more chances if the journalists hadn't been investigating him.


Chapter 91.

The journalist from the Richmond Observer did not reveal the reason why he was investigating Professor Fletcher.

However, the fact that the journalist, known for his investigative reports, was delving into the truth of an academic who wasn't a public figure full of gossip, made Edwin smell something serious. Before his name appeared dishonorably in an exposé, staining his family's honor, it was necessary to sever the relationship.

When ordered to cancel all appointments with Professor Fletcher and search for another doctor, Loise not only didn't object but was secretly relieved.

— "The truth is, Professor Fletcher wasn't exactly an authority in this field."

It couldn't be denied that the professor, who had prematurely declared a cure, bore some responsibility for how things had turned out. If the supposed most prominent expert in the academic field wasn't up to par, what could be expected from the level of other doctors?

Loise had been searching everywhere for alternatives, but so far hadn't found any candidate, due precisely to that reason.

Although the struggle to expel the demon from his mind had reached a standstill with no clear timeline, the therapy to repair his damaged mind continued under the direction of his chief physician.

He had been told that the more he used his brain, the faster his memory would recover, so lately he had been increasing his waking hours to dedicate them to mental activities.

Edwin and Loise were sitting across from each other, continuing a game of chess they had briefly paused for Edwin to speak on the phone with Giselle.

However, it wasn't long before the residence butler knocked on the door, forcing them to stop the game again without a clear winner.

— "Professor Fletcher has come and requests to see His Grace."

The professor had come to the house without a prior appointment. Moreover, it was nearly 11 PM, which was extremely suspicious.

— "What is the matter?" — "He says he will only discuss it with His Grace."

A shady matter, without a doubt.

Loise, who had reached the same conclusion, took charge of the situation.

— "His Grace is sleeping, so tell the professor to leave and that I will contact him tomorrow."

Shortly after, the butler returned with an expression of great concern.

— "I apologize. He insists that he must see His Grace and won't leave. Should we have him forcibly removed?"

Edwin, his gaze fixed on the chessboard, asked:

— "Has he still not stated the matter?" — "He says he has something urgent to say about someone called 'Lorenz.'"

The professor was probably referring to Edwin's state indirectly as 'Lorenz.' Did he have something to say about the treatment, or was it just an excuse to see Edwin? While lightly tapping his bishop and reflecting, Loise, always perceptive, intervened.

— "Should I go hear what he has to say?" — "Do it."

Professor Fletcher was one of the few people the Duke could personally receive. However, Loise decided to intervene because he had a sense that the professor would say something that would disturb the mind of anyone who heard it. He couldn't allow the fragile mental stability that the Duke had achieved with so much effort to crumble.

— "Your Grace, ah. Sir Loise."

When he entered the reception room, the professor, who had eagerly stood up, showed an expression of evident disappointment.

— "His Grace took a sleeping pill an hour ago and is sleeping. If it's about the treatment, you can tell me. I will convey it when he wakes up."

The professor hesitated and said nothing. It was the first time Loise had seen him act with such indecision. His complexion seemed paler than usual, and he was covered in a cold sweat. Something did not smell right.

— "If it's difficult to tell me, you can call tomorrow when His Grace is awake. Now, please retire."

Just as Loise was about to usher the professor out, promising a call that would never occur, the pale man grabbed him and finally revealed the reason for his visit.

— "Have you received any calls from a journalist?"

It was that, after all.

— "Yes, I did." — "Please help me."

It was a shady request. Although the right thing to do was to refuse it immediately, Loise needed to know what kind of trouble the professor was trying to drag the ducal family into.

— "What are you talking about?" — "They say the article will come out this week." — "Even if you say that, I don't know what article you are referring to."

The professor avoided mentioning the most important fact, circling around the issue, until Loise attempted to leave again. Finally, he blurted it out.

— "When I was researching electroshock therapy, I recruited patients, some suffered side effects. They say they are going to publish an article exposing me as a charlatan."

— "His Grace also suffered side effects."

Hadn't the professor said that was common? After all, treatments without side effects are rare. When Loise asked with a tone of disbelief if that was really news, the professor revealed that he was concealing something more.

— ".What His Grace experienced was mild."

Loise suppressed the urge to grab the professor by the neck and, maintaining his composure, asked:

— "Then, what was the most serious side effect?" — "That's not important now."

Loise had a strong intuition that the Professor was evading the question because that was the crucial point of the exposé.

— "Then I will ask another question. Did you recruit the patients for the experiment legally?"

The professor was silent for a moment and then, as if collapsing, began to confess.

— "How am I supposed to recruit patients that way? I'm not the only one. The most prominent doctors in this country, no, in the whole world, recruit patients like that to develop innovative treatments. If that is illegal, then everyone receiving treatment is a criminal."

Cornered, the professor continued defending himself without being asked, until he finally admitted the most serious side effect.

— ".But it was because that person concealed that he had a heart defect"

It turned out that there had been a death from cardiac arrest during the electroshock therapy experiments.

He had concealed the fact that there had been deaths and still recommended that dangerous treatment to His Grace.

Loise once again suppressed the urge to seize the professor by the neck and throw him out, instead asking naturally:

— "If the professor is innocent, why not simply refute the article?" — "……"

At that moment, the professor shut his mouth. It was obvious. He was not innocent. He had clearly come to make a dishonorable request. He wanted to use the influence of the Eccleston house to prevent the article from being published. Before the professor could say it, Loise immediately refused him.

— "The Eccleston house does not participate in dishonest acts."

The fact that the professor only spoke of what was convenient for him was already shocking enough, but Loise had a strong feeling that the truth to be revealed in the article would be much more shocking. Why should the ducal house help someone so despicable? He was sure His Grace would think the same.

— "If the article is published, His Grace will also suffer a great blow."

The professor struggled to make the ducal house feel they had no choice but to help him, releasing all kinds of sophistries.

— "If I, a pioneer in the field of multiple personalities, fall, all my students will fall too. Then, from whom will His Grace receive treatment? Saving me is saving His Grace."

Up to that point, it was ridiculous, but the professor's nonsense became increasingly unacceptable.

— "Frankly, His Grace is also an accomplice. He benefited from a treatment developed thanks to the people who died, so he cannot claim to be innocent."

His Grace only suffered side effects without gaining any benefit, yet he called him an accomplice. How crazy. What a crazy world where a lunatic like that was the best psychiatrist in the country.

— "Call security and take him out before I do."

The professor looked at Loise with bloodshot eyes, trembled, and finally opened his mouth again.

— "If that is the case, I will have no choice but to bury that article with another exposé."

Like someone on the edge of the abyss, he hesitated and finally crossed the line he should never have crossed.

— "If they publish an article about the hero having an enemy personality in his body, no one will pay attention to my story."

It was a threat to expose the fact that His Grace had an enemy personality.

Selling a patient to save himself. Clearly, someone who treated patients as lab rats and killed them in the name of his research would have no problem selling a patient's life.

Putting aside the fact that the professor was a despicable being without medical ethics, it was unbelievable that he had the audacity to threaten the Eccleston family.

— "Professor, it seems you have forgotten that you signed a confidentiality agreement."

Loise kindly reminded him that, given His Grace's high prestige, the impact of revealing this scandalous secret would be astronomical, and the amount of damages the professor would have to pay would be exactly proportional. But, on the brink of the death sentence for the career he had built his whole life, the professor seemed to see neither the lawsuits nor the money.

— "They can take all my money, but once His Grace's secret is spread, they won't be able to contain it. So, please make a wise decision."

Chapter 92.

Chapter 92
— "I fully understand the Professor's intention, so please withdraw."

Twenty-six years had passed since Loise began dealing with the parasites clinging to the ducal family. Seeing that Loise showed no sign of disturbance and acted with complete naturalness, the professor felt disconcerted. Although the professor was pushed out of the house and expelled from the townhouse, he seemed to regain a little composure, but he was still not in his right mind, as he continued threatening until the end.

— "I will give the Duke time. Think carefully and contact me before 9 AM tomorrow."

As soon as the professor left, Loise went up to the Duke's room. Although he knew this might disturb the Duke's recently recovered calm, it was a matter that could not be ignored.

While listening to the conversation with Professor Fletcher, the Duke did not say much, but the cold, somber gaze beneath the hand that held his forehead made it clear that he was fed up.

— "Don't worry, Duke. After all, the professor is only an academic who has spent his life studying."

He was not used to this kind of situation, or perhaps he had never threatened someone more powerful than himself, but the professor trembled even while issuing threats.

— "He doesn't seem to have much courage, so if we send a group of lawyers tomorrow morning to pressure him, he will regain his senses and keep quiet."

Loise, thinking that the Duke would surely give that order, spoke preemptively, but was greatly surprised when the Duke opened his mouth.

— "No, let him." — ".What?" — "Let him reveal everything."

Loise did not understand the clear instruction and asked again.

Let it be revealed to the world that the Duke has a multiple personality disorder?

That was not something the Duke would do.

'.So the one in front of me is that demon?'

Loise looked suspiciously at the young man in front of him and cautiously backed away. Realizing that Loise planned to go out and bring him a sedative mixed with water, the Duke, who had been watching him curiously, gave a bitter smile.

— "If we send lawyers to threaten him, it will only generate suspicion that the ducal family has shady dealings with the Professor. We will be accused of being involved in Professor Fletcher's scandal."

Loise lowered his guard. This was the Duke he knew, the one willing to sacrifice himself for the family. Although it was bitter, it was the Duke he knew.

— "But the Duke will soon be Duke Eccleston." — "That's why it is even more important for the world to know that I have a multiple personality disorder." — ".What? I don't understand." — "He can use the power that comes with my position as Duke or Major to manipulate and harm others."

Just as he abused his position as the sole guardian to do horrible things to Giselle.

— "If everyone knew about him, there would be no more victims. I should have done it sooner. If I had."

The Duke's face darkened instantly. Loise knew he was thinking of Miss Bishop. Although he understood that the Duke was worried that something similar might happen again, he could not accept that he would socially condemn himself to protect the family and others.

— "Duke, please think of yourself first."

As an employee of the ducal family, he should prioritize the family, but as a human being, it pained him to see the young nobleman in front of him. Although he tried everything to change his mind.

— "Let's play chess."

The Duke, as if not wanting to talk about the subject any further, firmly pointed to the empty seat on the other side of the chessboard.

— "Duke, I'm sorry, but I'm not in the mood to play chess right now."

Although as a secretary he should follow his employer's orders without question, for the first time in 26 years, Loise rebelled. The Duke stared at him in surprise and then sighed as if he were giving up.

— "Then let's make a bet. The winner decides."

It wasn't a complete surrender, but the fact that he proposed a bet meant that he himself was unsure of his decision and was wavering. Loise, seizing the opportunity, sat down in front of the chessboard without saying a word.

— "Agreed."

While playing chess, Loise continued trying to persuade him. Of course, he also put a lot of effort into the chess game, just in case he couldn't change his mind.

In fact, he was quite confident in his chess skills. The late Duke, the current Duke's father, often forced him to sit down and used him as an opponent in chess.

— "Checkmate." — "."

But he lost in the blink of an eye, in a way that left him embarrassed. Only then did Loise recall the late Duke's words.

— "Edwin, playing with that boy is no fun."

It wasn't that the late Duke didn't know how to play. On the contrary, it was the opposite. His skill in chess was so superior that there was no fun in playing against him.

— "Then I will do what I want."

If even after his brain injury he had this level of skill, how good was he before? The shock was so great that Loise remained seated, staring blankly at the chessboard, while the young man across from him stood up.

Only when the Duke entered the dressing room did Loise regain his composure and follow him. Thinking that the Duke would prepare to go back to bed, Loise blinked in surprise to see the Duke take out a tie and knot it.

— "Contact the Professor. Tell him to meet us at his laboratory, as usual. Right now."

Faced with the unexpected order, Loise's face, which had gradually brightened, lit up completely with the Duke's confirmation.

— "I will try to persuade the professor." — "It's a good decision, but is it necessary for the Duke to convince him in person?" — "That way there will be fewer rumors. If it doesn't work, we will do as you suggest and send lawyers." — "Yes, I will follow the Duke's orders."

Although the professor was not in his right mind, Loise was not worried. The Duke had always led dangerous and difficult conversations, such as armistice negotiations, to his favor. Worrying was almost an insolence.

Anyway, in the end, he chose a path that protected not only the family and others, but also himself. Loise, with a happy heart, called the professor's house and arranged an appointment.

Shortly after, they arrived at the Kingsbridge School of Medicine building. Loise got out of the driver's seat and quickly scanned the building. At that time of night, everything was dark, except for the light in Professor Fletcher's laboratory.

— "It seems the professor is already here."

Loise opened the rear door of the sedan and reported. The young man, elegantly dressed in a black three-piece suit, stepped out of the car with fluid movements and nodded briefly.

— "Wait here."

Loise watched with a heart full of emotion as the Duke entered the darkness without hesitation.

After the demon appeared, the Duke did not lose his unattainable majesty and dignity, but his vitality disappeared, reminding one of an old tree before finding an angel on the battlefield.

But now, the vitality of a living being could be seen in him.

The Duke had returned.

— "It's not the Duke."

Professor Fletcher, staring fixedly at the man in front of him with confused eyes, corrected his form of address.

— ".Mr. Lorenz?"

The man nodded slowly, as if it were the correct answer, and gave a smile.

— "It's been a long time, Professor."

The sharp smile made the professor shudder. Why was he here? The professor tried to maintain his composure, but from the very first word, he had already made a mistake.

— "Pleasure to."

Just a moment ago, he had tried to electrocute this man, now he said he was pleased to see him. Perhaps it was not a greeting he wanted to hear.

— "Ahem, it has been a long time. I apologize for not recognizing you, Mr. Lorenz. But what do I owe the pleasure of your visit today?"

— "I have something to discuss."

Discuss at a time like this? He didn't know if he was naive or not. As he had noticed before, this personality had a childish and immature side.

— "I see. Of course, we should discuss it. However, today I have something to talk about with the Duke, so can we postpone our discussion for later?"

The Professor, as if dealing with a child, gathered all the patience he had left and indirectly suggested that he return the Duke to his original personality immediately.

— "I don't know. Anyway, the Duke won't be able to communicate with you."

— "I will decide that."

— "Oh, you still haven't figured it out. It wasn't the Duke who called you. It was me."

Realizing that the Duke had not succumbed to his pressure to come, the professor's face flushed, but an unexpected offer instantly made his anger disappear.

— "If you listen to what I have to say, I will save you."

It was tempting, but also suspicious. I thought he would hold a grudge against the doctor who tried to eliminate him, but now he offers help.

— "Why would Mr. Lorenz be so generous to me?" — "It's simple. It's the same reason why I haven't leaked military secrets to Constance."

Chapter 93.

— "He has never said anything like that, so I wouldn't know."

The Duke's other personality let out a mocking laugh, as if it were obvious that he should know, and then responded curtly:

— "Because I don't want to be locked up."

If military secrets were leaked, the Duke would be accused of espionage and sent to prison. Who would believe that his other personality was responsible? Even if they did believe it, would it change the verdict? Then, he, trapped within the Duke's body, would also be condemned to incarceration.

— "And how does that compare to the reason for helping me?" — "A psychiatric hospital is not very different from a prison."

If it became known that the Duke suffered from multiple personality disorder, instead of secluding himself voluntarily as he did now, he could be forcibly locked up. It was not a world where the family, pressured by public opinion and the media, wouldn't go so far as to lock the head of the household in a psychiatric hospital.

— "Of course, having the world finally recognize me is quite appealing, but it would be an obstacle to my goal. No matter what the Duke does, if they blame me, everyone will give him a free pass. Besides, I find it repugnant that that arrogant man receives compassion."

— "What goal is that?" — "You don't need to know. You just need to know that I am sick of living locked up in a cell."

The way he emphasized "sick of" and the tension in his jaw made it clear how horrific his experience in the prisoner-of-war camp had been.

In the end, he would help him for his own sake. Self-interested help was more reliable than selfless help.

— "Our interests align perfectly. Very well. But, Mr. Lorenz, how.?"

— "The fact that I can stop the article proves that the Duke's chief secretary is completely fooled by me. If I pretend to be the Duke, with just one word"

The man wearing the Duke's appearance whistled and made a hand gesture, as if dismissing the article. When his hand passed in front of his neck, he even smiled at the professor, who flinched.

— "It-it is not necessary to go that far. Just prevent the article from being published." — "So be it." — "But, is it true that your reward is just a conversation?"

However much he helped others for his own sake, it was strange that his reward was as simple as "an ear to listen to his story." However, the man immediately nodded, without hesitation.

— "Ah, one more thing. Do you have a cigar?" — "Of course."

A cigar was also a very cheap reward. The professor happily went to his desk and searched the cigar box.

— "Ah, I regret to say I don't have the Constanzas you like." — "Then I'll take one of your recommendation."

He didn't know how much he knew about cigar brands, but assuming that the Duke's other personality, who only consumed the best, also had good taste was safe. The professor selected some of the best cigars he had, along with a cutter and a lighter, and placed them on a tray in front of the man.

The man looked at them with joyful eyes, but didn't touch them. Noticing the professor's doubtful look, he responded:

— "I will smoke after our conversation." — "Ah, as you prefer" — "I recently discovered the feeling of smoking a cigar after sex." — — "It has become a habit. After feeling pleasure, I crave a cigar, but lately the Duke won't buy me cigars. Ah, I don't know if you know, but the Duke is stingier than he looks. He only buys one box of condoms. One box only lasts two days."

He said he had something to consult about, but he started talking about sex. It is common in psychological therapies to touch on the subject of one's sex life, so the professor, without blushing, listened calmly.

— "Recently, there was a doctor who tried to kill me."

However, when the subject began the real consultation, even the professor, who for decades had heard all kinds of strange things on this couch, couldn't help but blush.

— "They say he is the best psychiatrist in the world. When I met him in person, he seemed quite impressive. At first, even I was a little scared. You could say I had expectations. But after experiencing it"

The man moved his head from side to side, as if he were disappointed.

— "The best in the world, at what? His skill was pathetic." — "Wait a moment."

The professor, unable to bear the direction the consultation was going any longer, interrupted the man.

— "Are you trying to consult me about how I am a mediocre doctor?" — "That's right."

The insolent man stared at the professor, whose face reflected anger, as if he didn't understand why he was so angry.

— "One must recognize one's mistakes to correct them." — — "They say growth comes with pain. In the moment it may hurt, but eventually it will become second nature. Don't you also want to be someone who lives up to your reputation, Professor?"

— "Ha, ha"

— "Ah, do you perchance think you already live up to your reputation?"

Although his words were rude, they also hit the mark, making the professor feel uncomfortable, as if he had indigestion.

— "The fact that I am still alive is proof of your incompetence, don't you think?"

The professor opened his mouth to refute it, but said nothing and closed it again. Any argument he gave would end in the conclusion that he had failed to eliminate that personality, and that was a battle he could not win.

He's not a common madman.

No one at the top of psychiatry would dare to criticize his skill in front of him. And if someone did, they wouldn't do it with such a calm smile. It was the first time he had met someone like this, but if he could prevent that article from being published, he was willing to listen to anything.

After all, they are only an amateur's criticisms.

He could listen with one ear and let them out the other. The professor forced a gentle smile onto his tense face.

— "Very well. I will speak, so listen."

However, no matter how much of an amateur the critic was, no one can listen to negative evaluations about themselves without being affected. Although he was not a completely good person, he also was not without conscience, and he knew very well that the fact that his foundation was crumbling was his own fault.

— "It is naive to think you eliminated me just because I stayed quiet and silent. Naivety is not bad, but a psychiatrist should not think so simplistically, don't you think?"

The professor swallowed with difficulty the frustration that was rising in his throat. The subject kept driving into him his own disappointment, which he was trying to repress.

— "This is pure curiosity. You don't seem to be a particularly intelligent person, so I wonder how you got here."

At that moment, the professor understood the insolent man's true intention.

He is trying to destroy my personality because I tried to kill his.

He felt that he was being avenged, but he could not return the insults with the same intensity. If he endured this insult, he could preserve everything he had built throughout his life. He would be remembered forever as a genius who left his mark on the history of psychiatry, he would not lose his position as a tenured professor, and, this time, he would not suffer a shameful defeat in the elections for the presidency of the Royal Society, where he was expected to be elected no matter what.

But that wasn't the only reason why the professor couldn't refute the other's attacks.

— "Let's admit it. You too, in front of the Duke, spoke grandly about being able to cure him, but deep down you weren't sure, were you?"

Because the subject's criticisms were not entirely wrong.

He had been excited about the opportunity to treat an important figure, but he had also been anxious. If he failed to cure him, he would antagonize that figure.

The worst-case scenario had become a reality. When the Duke canceled all his appointments and started looking for another doctor, saying that the electroshock therapy the professor had so confidently recommended had had no effect, the professor, though he didn't show it, had suffered a deep blow to his pride.

In the midst of all that, he had gone to see the Duke, exposing his weaknesses and begging for help, and when that didn't work, he had even resorted to threats, something he had never done before. Now, his pride was shattered, torn to shreds like an old rag. And that demon kept tearing at him with words that were not entirely wrong.

— "I know why you weren't sure. It is an extremely rare mental illness, without a visible physical form. Its very existence is uncertain and cannot be proven, so how could its causes or treatments be clear? There will always be doubts."

It is a fact that there are those who claim that multiple personality disorder is a non-existent fiction, even within the academic community. The professor was used to skeptical and doubtful looks.

— "Professor, have you ever thought that perhaps you are not an academic who establishes hypotheses, but a fraud who writes novels and sells them?"

A fraud.

It was exactly what they used to call him.

Chapter 94.

Under normal circumstances, the Professor would have burst into anger at those words, but this time he listened to them with apathy.

Sometimes, even the Professor doubted himself, wondering if he was a fraud. Despite decades of research, he had failed to obtain concrete facts, only a mountain of vague questions and baseless hypotheses. In moments of desperation, he felt ridiculous, like a fool who had dedicated his life to searching for a legendary dragon.

When the feeling of failure invaded him, at the thought that he had wasted his life on useless efforts, he would suddenly regain his composure and cling to his hypotheses and treatments, asserting without conviction that they were the correct answer. His excessive ambition led him, ultimately, to cause someone's death.

'What is this.?'

It's all I have.

He couldn't bear to have his life denied, and although he wasn't certain, he insisted that his ideas were the truth. Then, suddenly, he would hear a whisper in his mind:

'You are a fraud.'

The speaker was hitting on that doubt that lay at the core of his fragile pride. By mentioning those very thoughts he himself entertained, how could he simply ignore them?

— "If I were you, I would be constantly tormented by the idea that at some point it would be discovered that I am a fraud. I would feel anxious—"

Furthermore, the demon in front of him also played on that insecurity.

— "Even if I prevent the news of you killing someone from coming out, how long do you think you can conceal that you are a fraud? Your competitors, more talented but less fortunate, are like a hungry pack, waiting for the opportunity to tear you down."

He knew it well. He had heard that other academics, who saw him as a thorn in their side, had actively participated in this investigation. Even if this news was buried, he knew they wouldn't stay quiet. Suddenly, everything darkened before his eyes.

'They will spread what they heard from the journalist or look for another excuse to take me down.'

He could clearly see how those at the top would watch him fall and laugh at him. His students, who had believed in him, and his family, who admired him, turning their backs on him in disappointment.

The man, who watched him with pity as the Professor, gaunt from days without sleep, ran a trembling hand over his face, spoke again.

— "The way to silence them forever"

A hope began to sprout.

— "Doesn't exist while you are alive."

And it was mercilessly crushed.

— "Don't be disappointed. At your age, you don't have many years left to live. As you know, after death, mistakes are often embellished. I don't know how much the image of a murderer and a fraud can be embellished after your true nature is exposed, but at least you will receive a better evaluation than in life. After all, you don't shoot the dead."

The Professor, who had been listening to the demon's false consolation with his forehead resting on his hand, sharply raised his head at the following revelation.

— "The Duke also thought of suicide. He wanted to leave before I further stained his glorious reputation."

— "The Duke thought of suicide?"

He had not detected any suicidal intent during his sessions with the Duke, so he couldn't help but be surprised.

— "Didn't you know?" — "."

It was another proof of his incompetence as a doctor. The Professor's head drooped again.

— "Leave while you are still being applauded. It's difficult advice to follow. But at least you should know when to go before the applause turns into jeers."

Leave? Leave where?

Even if he resigned from his professorship and retired, the revelation would still happen. There was no other option than to delay the jeers by preventing the news from coming out.

— "Professor Fletcher."

He had endured insults that gnawed at his mind just for that.

— "My helping you was a lie."

The demon, transformed into another person, mocked the Professor.

— "Do it yourself. Either you fall from the roof and protect your honor, or you fall alive into the mud."

The Professor's jaw trembled. That demon, who had taken the Duke's appearance, was the real fraud. He wanted to hit him, but if he did, he would be hitting the Duke. Containing his voice, trembling with rage, the professor threatened again:

— "So you plan to spend the rest of your life locked up in a lunatic asylum?"

— "Ah, reveal the truth? Go ahead. I am a charlatan who couldn't cure the Duke's multiple personality disorder. It's that simple."

Finally, the Professor understood. What he was about to do was practically an act of self-incrimination. If he revealed everything and the Duke really committed suicide, the blame would fall on him for not having been able to cure the hero of the kingdom and, worse, for having driven him to death. The worst possible situation, being branded a complete charlatan, occurred to him too late.

His plan to use the Duke's secret to conceal his own failures had been a mistake. Realizing that the demon was right in saying he wasn't that intelligent, a sense of emptiness washed over him and all the strength drained from his body.

— "I don't understand why you feel so unfairly treated by the news that is about to come out. After all, it was your destiny to be discovered as a charlatan incapable of adequately treating a single patient. The time has simply come."

The demon spoke with disdain as he calmly picked up the cigar and the lighter from the shelf and put them into his jacket pocket. While this blatant scene unfolded, the professor, who had been staring into space, abruptly regained consciousness when the demon leaned toward him from the other side of the table.

— "Professor."

The madness in those blue eyes was clearly visible. At that moment, an inexplicable fear paralyzed the professor, and the demon inclined his head toward his ear.

— "I told you. The time has come."

A cruel whisper, wrapped in a sweet voice, sank deep into his mind.

— "Then, farewell."

The professor did not stop the shameless man who took his leave with the words he should have said. Sitting alone in the silent laboratory, he had become a smaller, more aged man than before the visit of the demon with the Duke's appearance. Shortly after, tears began to stream down the deep wrinkles around his eyes.

Finally, the professor, who had fallen into an abyss of deep thought, understood that the "time" the demon spoke of was not the time to be exposed, but the time to leave.

— "You don't shoot the dead."

He also understood that there was another place to go.

The man walked out of the dark building and into the faint yellow light of the streetlights. But he did not move further.

Standing in the entrance alcove, he began to hum a song. It was a funeral march. He happily hummed the song that lamented death, and then, intoxicated by the emotion, he began to move his fingers in the air, as if playing a piano.

A solitary solo, with no one to hear it.

Creak.

The moment the sound of a rusty iron door opening high above was heard, the solo turned into a duet. Slow, weak, impatient, impulsive. The funeral march, which was advancing toward its climax with heavy steps, finally reached its end.

Bam.

The body fell onto the sidewalk in front of him, producing a crushing sound. Blood splattered onto the man's feet. Only then did the hand playing the invisible piano stop. The hand slipped into the inside of the suit jacket.

Click. Sssss.

A cigar after pleasure had become a habit. The man, with the lit cigar in his mouth, toyed with the smoke before slowly exhaling it.

The cigar smoke floated grotesquely over the man who was bleeding out and dying, as if it were the professor's soul. Ha, a soul that vanishes without a trace with a single laugh. Truly pathetic.

— "Ah. this is it."

The man felt a shiver, like the moment when he had completed a song with a woman. His score, his direction, was no different from then. Only this time the instrument had been a human being.

To play a human being at his will. In that moment, he was a god.

Even those who have a body are not a big deal.

Pak, pak.

The man walked without hesitation toward the corpse. The moment he calmly stepped over the body, now turned into a mere piece of flesh, his eyes met those of someone.

The Duke's chief secretary. The terror in his eyes became clearer with every step.

It seems he has finally understood who the man in front of him is.

Heading toward another insignificant human being who made him a god, the man raised the hand holding the cigar and waved it kindly.

With such insignificant people around him, Edwin Eccleston was truly a man worthy of pity.

Professor Fletcher from the faculty of medicine had committed suicide.

The shocking news spread; the Kingsbridge campus was in an uproar from the morning. Even the first-year students, who couldn't have known the professor, were equally agitated.

— "Did you really see him?"

Chapter 95.

Chapter 95
Some students, more curious than respectful toward the deceased, even went to the medical school, a place where first-year students rarely ventured, and began talking about him in the classroom before the first class of the afternoon. They said there were still bloodstains on the sidewalk in front of the building's entrance.

The Professor's daughter, who had entered Kingsbridge along with Giselle, did not show up for class that day, suggesting that the rumors might be true. Confirmation came the following morning when Professor Fletcher's obituary was published in the newspaper and the university magazine.

Like the two sides of a coin, while some remembered him with respect, others began spreading rumors about the reasons for his suicide.

— "It is said that an article exposing him was about to come out."

The rumor was that the Professor had illegally recruited subjects to experiment with a treatment that involved applying electric shocks to the head.

At first, it had been legal. He paid small sums of money to healthy volunteers. But then, a man who suffered severe brain damage, losing his memory, learning ability, and even his job, threatened to sue him. The Professor supposedly paid a large sum of money to silence the case.

After that, the Professor began recruiting only people who couldn't protest if they suffered side effects: homeless people without family or people with intellectual disabilities who didn't understand what was happening to them. It was obvious there was no consent.

— "My God. It's as if those people were tortured with electricity without even knowing it."

It was even said that several people had died, and that the Professor had manipulated the death certificates using his influence in the hospital to cover up the cases.

— "How can someone do something like that? He was a demon."

When he was about to be exposed, he cowardly escaped through death. However, the article was never published, so it was unclear whether the rumors were true.

Giselle hoped the rumors were not true. Although they weren't close, he was the father of her classmate. Besides, he was probably Edwin's doctor. It couldn't be that her Edwin had also been subjected to those electric tortures by a mad doctor who treated people like guinea pigs.

— "Was everything quiet at school today too?"

Her Edwin's voice sounded normal, but she couldn't help but worry.

— "Actually, the atmosphere at school is a little disturbed. A Professor passed away."

Giselle insinuated the topic.

— "Professor Fletcher from the medical school. Do you know him, Sir? You spoke with him at the graduation ball." — ".I know him."

He didn't say "I remember him," but "I know him." In that brief answer, Giselle was convinced that Edwin was not just a mere acquaintance of the Professor. He had truly been his treating physician.

— "Didn't you know what kind of person he was?"

If he didn't know, he must have received treatment from him. Thinking it was something Edwin should know, Giselle told him the rumors she had heard. He listened to her in silence, but suddenly interrupted her.

— "Giselle." — "Yes?"

After a long silence, he finally brought up the topic for which he had called her.

— "And the baby?"

She understood why he had been silent. For the same reason, Giselle couldn't answer immediately.

— "Are you pregnant?" — — ".I'm asking you." — "No."

It was a lie.

— "Good."

In that fleeting answer, Giselle tried to read his emotions. She didn't know if it was relief or disappointment. Although it was obvious that it was relief, she searched for another meaning, feeling as pathetic as when she rummaged through the library.

— "Giselle."

He called her again, this time with a purpose that seemed normal, but that gave her a bad feeling.

— "No matter where I am, you know I love and cherish you more than anyone, right? That's why, for my sake, you must take good care of yourself."

No matter where I am? Was he perhaps locked up in a lunatic asylum? With a heavy heart, Giselle asked hastily.

— "Lord. Where are you?" — "At home, of course." — "Really?" — "I'm going to hang up, why don't you call me?"

If he said it like that, he must really be at home. Still, she couldn't be reassured.

— "You're not planning to lock yourself up, are you?" — "No. Don't worry."

If he had responded with a laugh, it would have meant that Giselle was worrying for no reason. But Edwin didn't laugh. Even with that answer, the anxiety persisted.

— "Lord."

He had broken the silence first and brought up a difficult subject, which gave Giselle courage.

— "The truth is, I am very worried about you. You haven't been locked up in a lunatic asylum, have you? You haven't received any strange treatment from that wicked Professor, have you?"

If it were the usual Edwin, he would have laughed and told her not to worry. But today he said nothing.

— "I'm fine, but I want you to be fine too. This is something I'm asking without any hidden intention"

Although he had already noticed it, she denied her feelings, which she would never want to show. With that determination, Giselle brought up a difficult subject.

— "Is there something I can do? I know I can't do much, but if there is something, however small, that can help you, I would do anything."

Finally, from the other side of the receiver, came a warm voice.

— "Thank you. You know how to cheer me up; you've already grown up."

The smile that was beginning to form on her face instantly disappeared.

— "I thought you were just a child, but you've already grown up. You even know how to suck Edwin's cock."

That evaluation from the demon who was impersonating Edwin, who had entered her, suddenly resurfaced. The awkward silence on the other side of the phone indicated that Edwin also remembered that moment. The distance she had shortened was widening again. Giselle quickly returned the conversation to its original course.

— "Lord, isn't there something I can do?" — "Something you can do. Yes, there is something." — "Tell me anything."

But what he asked for was not remotely what Giselle had imagined.

— "Giselle, you were a strong girl."

Strong enough to survive in lands of death. The words he didn't say resonated in the brief silence.

— "I want you to continue being that strong girl from back then." — "How does that help?" — "It is my wish."

Was it an indirect rejection? Then she shouldn't insist.

Giselle, not understanding at all why Edwin was expressing a wish, changed the subject to something more trivial. Shortly after, the call ended with the usual advice about studies and a "sleep well."

Wait a minute.

Giselle stopped just as she was getting up to go to bed. She realized late that Edwin's farewell had been different.

— "We'll talk tomorrow."

Those words were missing.

I'm sorry.

What he really wanted to say was an apology. But if he did, that perceptive girl might realize what Edwin was planning to do that night.

That single apology would make her blame herself starting tomorrow. As soon as he hung up, Edwin took a pen and wrote a long note on a sheet of paper, saying it wasn't because of Giselle.

Like the calls, the letters also had to be reviewed by Loise. But this one could not be reviewed. It was not because Loise was not nearby.

— "The truth is, I still don't know when the personality changed, what part was the Duke and what part was that demon, or even if I am talking to the Duke right now."

He had given Loise a long vacation. It would be cruel to ask him to look after the cause of his panic when he hadn't yet recovered from the shock of that night.

Edwin didn't remember what had happened that night. But he knew something had happened as soon as he regained consciousness the next morning. He clearly remembered the moment his body was taken over.

— "If everyone knew about him, there would be no more victims. I should have done it sooner. If I had"

While murmuring this and remembering Giselle, time seemed to stop. When he opened his eyes, Loise was acting strangely. He looked like a complete mess, as if he had become a tramp in a single night.

— ".Duke? Are you alright?" — "Last night, he appeared. What did he do?"

Edwin had known Loise since he was a child, but had never seen him so distraught. He had to persuade and even threaten his secretary to get an answer, and when he finally got it, he understood why Loise had lost his composure.

— "La-last night, Professor Fletcher committed suicide. I saw it. That demon saw it too. .He laughed."

Chapter 96.

It was unnecessary to confirm that the evil personality had instigated the Professor's suicide. He already had a history of doing something similar with a guard in the prison camp.

— "I'm sorry. I know it sounds like an excuse, but he acted so naturally that I didn't realize it wasn't you. Also, the Professor usually met with you in person, so I lowered my guard. It's my fault. I truly apologize."

It was not an excuse, but a valid explanation. Loise, who apologized repeatedly as if he were a criminal despite having done everything within his capabilities, made Edwin feel even more guilty. The real criminal was Edwin. He had burdened Loise with responsibilities that not even he could handle, and had done truly unforgivable things.

When anger surpasses a certain limit, the heart cools. Edwin gave Loise a vacation and, in his cold state, thought about what he should do.

Confess?

That was the correct thing to do. If it were a common crime.

'Another personality inside me killed the Professor.'

The police would probably say he was insane and send him to a lunatic asylum. Besides, is inciting suicide with words, even if immoral, really a crime?

Then, would I be locked up for life in a lunatic asylum?

But he is the same one who killed a guard in solitary confinement in the prison camp. Locking him up wouldn't stop that killer.

And, above all, what would be the point of living like this?

After much thought, Edwin made a decision.

I will let him kill one more person.

The last sacrifice of the killer in his mind would be himself.

'Parasite, you have failed.'

While writing his will for Giselle, he suddenly remembered something she had said during a previous conversation.

— "What did you learn today?"

'Parasites that kill their hosts are failed parasites.'

At the time, he had considered it nonsense, but now it seemed like a revelation. The only way to defeat the parasite inside me was for I, the host, to die.

I should have done it sooner. If I had, the Professor would not have died, and Giselle would not have been hurt. Clinging to life for her, I realized that if I really wanted to protect her, I should not have approached her with a dangerous killer in my mind. Before that demon hurt more people, Edwin chose the most extreme but certain method.

As was his nature, once he made a decision, he never looked back. It didn't take him long to put his decision into action. First, he wrote letters to the people who had shown him kindness, letters that Loise would have tried to stop if he had been there.

He didn't need to write a separate will. The one he had made before going to war was still valid.

According to that will, all his personal possessions would go to Giselle. Along with the inheritance, there was a list of things he expected Giselle to do on his behalf every year. It was a way of forcing her to live, so that she wouldn't follow his steps toward death.

After finishing all the letters, only one thing remained to be done. Die cleanly.

It was not a metaphorical expression. His next goal was to die intact, without wounds. It was a lesson his brother, whose death had been messy, had left him.

His brother had committed suicide by shooting himself in the mouth. The corpse and the scene had been such a horrible nightmare that he couldn't bear to look at it.

After that, the maids of the mansion where his brother had died submitted their resignations en masse. The trauma of having to clean a room splattered with blood, bone fragments, and brain matter must have been indescribable.

Thus, his brother left, leaving only shock and pain in his wake. Edwin did not want to be such a selfish person. If he hurt others by dying, wouldn't that be ridiculous?

He had seen countless corpses on the battlefield and had witnessed many reactions from those who found them. At least, if the body was intact, the shock would be less.

— "Duke, where are you going?"

He told his secretary, who was watching him, that he was going to take a shower, but instead of undressing, he entered the shower stall with hot water running. In his hand he held a sharp fragment. It was a piece of a broken crystal glass, wrapped in a towel to muffle the sound.

The blood would be washed away by the running water, leaving no trace. The only thing left would be a body slumped in the shower stall. A quite clean death, wasn't it?

But no matter how clean it was, death was still death. The shock of Edwin having committed suicide was something that no gesture of consideration could prevent. He could only hope that those left behind would understand the reasons he had left in his letters.

Now he had to stop thinking about the people he lived for.

He plunged the edge of the glass fragment into his left wrist. A pain as sharp as the edge pierced his wrist, and dark blood spurted out in a thick jet before being washed away by the water and disappearing.

Now it was time to think only about the person he wanted to kill.

'Hey, parasite. You have failed.'

Giselle stared fixedly at the phone, repeating the same words over and over.

'We'll talk tomorrow.'

Why did he say that?

'Because it's so obvious he didn't need to say it.'

Then why did he say "sleep well"? That's also obvious.

'He probably just said it without thinking. You're worrying too much.'

A call could confirm whether my worry is excessive or not.

'But that would only make you more annoying to him.'

.

'Wait. Tomorrow morning the phone will ring again.'

.What if it doesn't ring?

'No matter where I am, you know I love and cherish you more than anyone, right?'

If the place he spoke of was not this world.

'What are you thinking? He wouldn't do that.'

True.

But.

The anxiety, though unfounded, did not fade away. Giselle spent the night reaching for the phone and stopping, again and again.

He should never have opened his eyes again.

But Edwin woke up, and in a feeling of disoriented betrayal, he scanned his surroundings.

He was lying in a bed bathed in the morning sunlight. His clothes were not wet. His wrist, which he had cut with the glass fragment, was bandaged. But that wasn't the only thing tying him down.

Click.

Edwin's wrists were handcuffed.

— "Release me now."

The secretary, who did not obey his employer's orders and hesitated, explained that the previous night, Edwin had emerged from the bathroom with a blood-soaked towel wrapped around his wrist and had given instructions that "the Duke tried to commit suicide, so tie him up and watch him." He had even asked for sleeping pills and taken them himself before falling asleep.

— "Ah"

Edwin let out a bitter laugh.

You want to live, huh?

You treat the lives of others as if they were lighter than an ant, but your own life is precious. It's unbelievable.

I will never allow it.

He hadn't expected the threat of suicide to domesticate him. He had endured enough, and that demon had made it clear he had no intention of peacefully coexisting, committing increasingly intolerable acts.

This time, I will die instantly.

Edwin dropped all vigilance and tried to commit suicide again. But every time he tried to die, that cursed parasite snatched control of the body and stubbornly kept him alive.

Finally, he even betrayed his promise not to cause trouble for others and tried to shoot himself under the chin, but, as always, the next moment he woke up handcuffed and tied to the bed.

As his suicide attempts continued to fail, a question arose.

'Why does he always return control?'

If he kept the body, Edwin couldn't commit suicide. It was a sure method, but he kept returning control, only to stop him at the last moment. So that Edwin would feel the pain of being completely alive? It didn't seem like he enjoyed this life-and-death struggle.

That moment of doubt expanded to a more fundamental question.

'Why doesn't he completely take over my body?'

If he took his body, the parasite would cease to be one. From that moment on, he wouldn't have to fight Edwin, whom he hated so much. But he showed no attempt, not even ambition, to completely take over the body.

It was almost impossible to die without him, who could read all his thoughts, knowing it. He needed to confuse him.

So, from a certain day, Edwin only thought about dying. So that he wouldn't know when he would execute his plans.

Die this way? Or that way? He thought in a disorganized manner, and every time he moved his body, the parasite snatched it away. As the days passed, the parasite's reaction became slower.

It was then that Edwin began to understand why that lunatic kept returning control.

Perhaps he had found a way to control the demon.

Chapter 97.

However, that method was neither convenient nor useful. Edwin, already tired of this struggle, just wanted to die once and for all and end everything.

One day, after attempting suicide again and waking up, Edwin left home aimlessly. He walked the streets under an autumn rain, thinking about death in everything he saw.

Should I throw myself in front of that oncoming bus? If I simply hit my head against that window, I would die instantly from the section of the carotid artery. It wouldn't be bad to get shot by threatening a police officer. No, what fault is it of the police? I should go to the alleys of the slums. I wouldn't feel bad if I died resisting a thief.

Are you tired of this too? As always, there was no answer.

As Edwin continued boringly with his thoughts of death, he suddenly remembered a plan and put it into action immediately.

He threw himself into the river raging with torrential rain under the bridge.

Let's see if you survive this.

Edwin didn't say tonight that we would talk tomorrow. But now Giselle does not spend the night awake waiting for a word she didn't hear. Like yesterday, the day before yesterday, and today, the phone will ring tomorrow morning too.

So now Giselle doesn't toss and turn in bed because of Edwin.

'Why is there still no news?'

I told Edwin that I wasn't pregnant, but in reality, Giselle didn't know either. Her period hadn't started yet.

It wasn't the first time it had been delayed. When she heard that Edwin was going to war. When she first entered Fullerton. When she heard that Edwin had been captured as a prisoner. During university entrance exams. Every time she went through difficult times, her period would stop for one or two months.

So, even though her period was late, she didn't worry, but this time she couldn't help but feel anxious as she checked the calendar and her underwear every day.

Lying on her side in bed, Giselle stroked her flat belly with one hand while unknowingly nibbling on the nails of the other.

'If I were pregnant with the Lord.'

I thought that, of course, I should secretly get an abortion, but lately my mind had started to waver.

— And the baby?

After hearing those words.

Baby.

It is something that should not exist between Edwin and Giselle.

But at that moment, when Edwin mentioned the baby as if acknowledging it, her heart pounded.

Stupidly.

Edwin wouldn't want a child of mine.

'If it comes out, I will eliminate it. That is the right thing to do.'

The answer is clear, so I no longer have anything to worry about, but I can't sleep. After tossing and turning for a long time, when midnight passes, another worry begins.

'Should I take sleeping pills?'

But I only think about it because I hate attending classes with a fuzzy head as if I were drunk all day.

'I feel bad waking someone up.'

The maid has the sleeping pills. If Giselle asks for them, she only gives her the indicated amount. It must have been an order from Edwin.

'Is he worried that I will commit suicide? I'm worried that he will do it.'

The one who is fighting the most difficult battle is Edwin, but even in the midst of everything, he doesn't forget to meticulously care for Giselle.

It is brazen of me to dare to like him, but to be even more brazen, it is not my fault for falling in love with Sir. Edwin Eccleston was a man it was impossible not to love. In the midst of his care, living comfortably, my conscience starved, even after committing an unforgivable act, I missed the Lord.

'I want to go back to that day.'

Not only did I want to recover the relationship where we could smile and look each other in the face. I wanted to forget the loneliness of sleepless nights like back then.

— Then I will hug you every night.

Every night, I remember that promise the demon so easily made to Giselle, a promise he wouldn't keep. Along with Edwin's warm embrace. Clearly, he made me experience something so sweet on purpose.

— For your lonely nights.

Precisely for this moment, when I can't sleep because of the hunger.

'Why do you have to be so cruel to me? What did I do wrong?'

Over time, I overcame many things, but the resentment toward that demon that arose from time to time was not easily calmed.

'I want to kill him.'

I had never felt so much hatred toward someone as to wish for their death. But since Giselle couldn't kill the demon inside Edwin, today too she vented her anger by hitting an innocent pillow.

Tap, tap.

She began to hear footsteps outside the window. By the heavy sound, it was a man. A man walking alone at this hour in a neighborhood where everyone was asleep. Because of the rain, the sound of the approaching shoes was as clear as if it were behind Giselle.

Tap, tap, tap,

as the heels hit the sidewalk faster and faster, her heart pounded loudly. Without reason, I tensed up, held my breath, and concentrated all my attention on the sounds outside.

It wasn't tension without reason. It was a premonition. The sound of the heels stopped in front of Giselle's house.

Creak.

The moment the unknown man opened the garden fence, Giselle's heart trembled. It was too early for it to be the newspaper or milk delivery person. So the only unexpected visitor at this hour would be.

'A thief?'

Clang

The moment she heard the sound of the first-floor window security blinds being rattled, Giselle, certain it was a thief, quickly turned on the lamp next to the bed and got up. She ran to the window, flung it open, and looked down, where the streetlight dimly illuminated.

The brazen thief, seeing that the owner of the house was awake, did not flee, but stood in front of the first-floor window and looked up at Giselle. That tall man was.

— ".Lord?"

He was a thief. The thief who stole Giselle's heart. Under the hand that shielded him from the downpour, his eyes were uncomfortably twisted.

— "Ah. Did I wake you up?" — "No. I hadn't fallen asleep yet." — "What are you doing? You should sleep early. Don't you have classes tomorrow morning?" — "But what are you doing here? Without an umbrella."

Then she noticed that he didn't have an umbrella in either hand. How long had he been in the rain? He was soaked from head to toe, as if he had fallen into water.

— "I came to check if you had closed the doors properly, as I told you."

Edwin smiled, clearly noticing from below that Giselle was frowning. Her heart began to pound for no reason.

— "Just kidding, I actually came because I wanted to see you."

Now her heart pounded hard. Although it probably wasn't in the sense she wanted, foolishly. But what did it matter? The important thing was that Edwin wanted to see her.

— "I was just planning to take a walk around the neighborhood and see how you were, but I ended up seeing you."

Giselle was also happy to see him unexpectedly. She had recently thought she would never see Edwin with a smile again, but a foolish smile kept appearing.

'I wanted to see you too.'

I didn't dare to say it. It could be misinterpreted as an impure feeling.

But the moment he took a step back to leave, she lost judgment for a moment. Her mind was so accelerated that she almost said something she shouldn't.

— "Come in"

Giselle was about to tell him to come in, but she quickly closed her mouth.

— Giselle, from now on don't trust me. You must not open the door even if I come.

It might not be Edwin.

Is it Edwin or the demon impersonating him? Giselle's heart pounded as she looked at the man from above. For a completely different reason than before.

— "Lord, is it alright for you to walk around alone like that? Where is Mr. Loise?" — "Loise is on vacation. I can't live locked up all the time, so sometimes I go for a walk alone when no one is around." — "Ah. right. Although today doesn't seem like a good day for a walk. How are you going to get back? Should I call the house to come and pick you up?" — "I'd appreciate it if you did, but I feel bad about waking anyone up, could you call a taxi?"

He really was going to leave immediately. Giselle, not knowing if the man she hadn't seen for a long time was the demon or Edwin, felt relief and disappointment at the same time.

— "They said it will take about 10 minutes."

After quickly calling the taxi company to have one come in front of the house, she poked her head out the window again. He was still standing in the heavy rain.

— "Do you want to come in and wait?"

This is a test. If he tries to enter, it is the demon. If he doesn't enter, it is Edwin. While anxiously awaiting his response, the man, who had been staring fixedly at her between his narrowed eyes, finally spoke.

Chapter 98.

— "I told you. Even if I came looking for you, you shouldn't open the door."

It must be Edwin. A slight doubt remained that the demon might have imitated him perfectly, but if it were him, he wouldn't have come all this way just to leave without doing anything, would he?

— "Then, what do you think of waiting under the porch roof?" — "I can't see your face."

Thump, thump.

— "Do you want to come down?" — "Y-Yes. Wait in front of the door, I'll be right down." — "But don't come outside." — "Okay."

Giselle quickly closed her bedroom window, threw a shawl over her nightgown, and grabbed the biggest and thickest towel she could find in the bathroom. Her heart was beating faster than the feet that silently carried her downstairs.

She cautiously lifted the security blind of the living room window facing the front door, making sure it didn't make a sound. Gradually, the silhouette of the man sitting on the porch steps appeared.

With his chin resting on his hand, he was staring fixedly at her through the glass. Her face suddenly flushed, and she inadvertently looked away. A moment ago, when he had smiled at her from the third floor, everything seemed much easier.

As if nothing had happened. Please.

She recited that spell in her mind while trying to maintain composure and pushed the window open, but Edwin's deep voice slipped through the narrow gap that barely let the wind pass.

— "Don't open it all the way."

Giselle obeyed and only left a space wide enough for a hand to fit. She offered him the towel.

— "Thank you. If at any moment I seem suspicious, close and lock it."

Scolding her even while accepting her kindness. It was, undoubtedly, Edwin.

— "I will."

But Giselle was not worried. Anyway, the taxi would arrive soon, and if anything happened, she could always scream to call the maid. And, above all.

'I think it really is the Lord.'

When recalling her time in Templeton, Giselle could clearly distinguish the moments when Edwin was himself and when the demon impersonated him. Although that being imitated Edwin well, he never managed to be perfect.

The words and expressions were Edwin's, but his actions and the content of what he said often didn't fit. How many times had she felt frustrated realizing, too late, that she had fallen for his deception?

For that reason, this time she remained alert, watching him carefully. But now, both his words and his actions were completely Edwin's. There was not a shred of incongruity.

While watching him dry himself with the towel, Giselle noticed something: his shirt was also soaked. He wasn't wearing a tie. Although he usually dressed lightly for walks, just a coat over his shirt and pants on a cold, rainy autumn night was too much.

— "Aren't you cold?" — "It seems you have forgotten that I am a soldier who has survived forced marches in the middle of winter."

Of course she had forgotten.

Seeing him like this, with his composure intact even in the rain, it was easy to forget that he had fought in the most inhospitable lands, facing death over and over again.

Edwin roughly dried his wet hair with the towel. In those moments, Giselle saw in him not only a refined gentleman, but also the rawness of a predator.

Thick drops of water slipped from his hair and were lost in the deep hollow of his clavicle, then slid down his chest, hidden under his shirt.

Suddenly, a memory struck her: sweat sliding down the same throat as he breathed heavily over her.

She almost screamed.

She looked away, biting her lips, but it didn't last long. Guilt woke up along with a burning yearning, and, like a sunflower seeking the sun, her eyes returned to him.

There is a demon inside me too.

Like a thief who swears never to steal again but can't help putting his hand into other people's pockets, Giselle reprimanded herself, but she didn't stop looking at him.

It was at that moment that he raised his head, running a hand through his hair to slick it back. Their eyes met.

.Is it the demon?

Her heart pounded in her chest. It wasn't excitement. It was fear.

Why? In his gaze there was only warmth, without a trace of the burning hatred with which the demon usually looked at her. She didn't know what was scaring her.

After a moment of silence, Giselle placed her hands on the window frame and made a request.

— "Lord, can you give me a mint?"

He seemed confused, but when she covered her mouth and murmured that she had eaten onion soup for dinner, he reached into his coat.

— "Let's see if I brought any. Ah, here are some."

He opened the small tin and, with a slight frown, inspected its contents. His fingers moved inside the container, as if counting the candies, before taking out two.

He reached his hand through the window and, as usual, Giselle inclined her head and opened her mouth to receive one.

But as soon as the mint touched her tongue, she perceived a different smell.

Wet earth.

A smell similar to the rain, but much stronger. Even the mint inside her mouth was imbued with that aroma. However, Giselle did not spit it out.

The hand that had given her the candy came out of the window again, and the man put the other one in his mouth.

It's Edwin.

Crack!

It's the demon.

Edwin never chews mints. But the first night the demon visited her in her room. he did.

It was such a small, insignificant difference that the demon never bothered to hide it.

My intuition was right.

Giselle tightly gripped the window frame, preparing to slam it shut if necessary.

Clac!

The window, which was being pulled down, collided with something that intervened. Hands.

She no longer tried to close it. Instead, she tried to flee the living room, but before she could even take a step back, someone grabbed her wrist.

— "Mmmph!"

A hand covered her mouth at the same time that another pushed the window up. Like tentacles emerging from the abyss, those hands wrapped around her and began to drag her.

Giselle knew she had survived the war because she had never been captured by an enemy soldier. Once trapped, she was lost.

She fought with all her might, but she couldn't overcome the strength of the man holding her. In an instant, she was pulled out the window.

The cold air enveloped her, but soon a moist heat covered her completely.

The demon had hugged her.

When, instinctively, she lifted her head, her eyes met a familiar. and yet unknown face.

— "Long time no see, beautiful."

Giselle began to tremble uncontrollably. The demon observed her with delight before leaning in to kiss her forehead.

She sharply turned her head, and the kiss missed.

— "Why are you dodging me? It's your beloved Lord's kiss."

Giselle shook her head desperately.

— "Ah, am I not the Lord?"

Without warning, the demon let go of her.

Giselle fell onto the bushes next to the door. Before she could react, the demon pounced on her, burying her in the wet vegetation.

— "Mmph!"

The cry for help died within the man's mouth, who kissed her fiercely, devouring her as if he wanted to swallow her whole.

Chapter 99.

— "If you hadn't recognized me, everything would have gone according to my plan. But, on the other hand, I also thought it would be good for you to know it was me. It's crazy, isn't it? But you managed to do the impossible. Giselle Bishop, what are you really?"

— "Ugh, hmpf, ugh—"

In the gaze he directed towards Giselle, something that could only be described as reverence shone. He frowned as if he were holding something back, but suddenly his eyebrows relaxed and he let out a feeling that was even more incomprehensible than reverence.

— "I love you."

Giselle's eyes opened wide, while the man closed his tightly and let out a moan of agony.

— "This is madness. I hadn't planned this, what do I do now? Should I lock you up forever and make you mine?"

— "Ugh!"

Giselle, terrified, screamed and writhed, but the demon, using the man's body, easily held her down and lowered his lips toward her. The kisses fell like a torrential rain, everywhere except on her lips, which were blocked by her hand.

I don't want this.

During the struggle, the shawl she was wearing flew away. The only things Giselle wore were a thin nightgown and panties. The lips that bit and sucked felt as if they were touching her bare skin, and a chill ran through her entire body in an instant.

Although her back, buried in the bushes, was soaked by the rain, the front of her body, covered by the man's figure, was completely dry. So the fact that the front of her shirt, especially in two places, was damp, was not the rain's fault.

The man brutally grabbed Giselle's chest, and through the fabric, he stubbornly bit and sucked the protruding nipples. Although she hated it, she couldn't avoid the physical stimulation, and he, as if wanting to prove it, pinched her nipple with his fingertips.

— "Ugh!"

A sharp lightning bolt shot through her body, reaching between her legs.

A chill.

No, I don't want this.

Giselle trembled all over her body, but the demon, unsatisfied, began to unbutton her nightgown. He knew very well that Giselle's hands could not defeat his. In an instant, the shirt was pushed below her shoulders, exposing her breasts.

While Giselle struggled to free herself, the man took one of her breasts and calmly massaged it, as if savoring it, closing his eyes and emitting moans of pleasure. Then, he tried to take it into his mouth, but Giselle quickly stopped him with her hand.

— "Mmm."

The demon, incredibly, kissed her palm tenderly and looked at her with ardent eyes. Despite harassing a woman in the middle of the night, he acted as if he were on a romantic date.

— "Let's be honest, I missed you. Can you feel how happy I am to see you?"

The man grabbed Giselle's wrist. She expected him to release it, but instead, he guided it toward between his legs.

There, something heavy and hard was waiting for her. He was erect.

Although she had already felt it while struggling, she thought it was just his thigh. It wasn't surprising that he felt desire for her.

— "Bored of waiting for the taxi? How about we play something fun?"

— "Ugh, ugh!"

But the idea of him trying to rape her in the middle of the street, in the rain, was shocking. Without further ado, the man put his head under her skirt.

— "Hmpf, ugh!"

He rubbed his nose between her legs until he reached her clitoris, causing Giselle, unintentionally, to arch her hips. Then, he bit it with his teeth and licked it with his tongue, even sliding it through the center of her panties.

I don't want this.

Giselle pushed the man's shoulders with her heels. If it hadn't been for the man's body, she would have already hit his weak spot and escaped. But the demon, knowing this, not only did not protect his weak spot, but lowered the zipper and took it out.

— "You shouldn't hit me." — "Ugh!" — "You must behave."

When she started kicking him, the man grabbed both her ankles with one hand and held them firmly. He was not satisfied with immobilizing her, but began to kiss and lick her toes, sucking and licking them until Giselle, feeling strange, cried and writhed. Suddenly, the restraints loosened and her legs were thrown to the sides.

— "Hmpf."

Taking advantage of the opportunity, the man's thick waist slid between her thighs. Giselle, frightened, tried to back away, but he grabbed her by the waist and pulled her close again. The tip of his hard member struck her crotch, covered only by a thin fabric. Everything went dark before her eyes.

No. No. No.

Giselle struggled desperately, but the man seemed completely relaxed. He took her nipple, swollen by the unwanted affection, and rolled it in his mouth as if it were a candy, while rubbing his member against the center of her panties. The liquid that now soaked her underwear, whoever it belonged to, was enough to terrify Giselle.

— "Hmpf, ugh!"

The tip of the member suddenly pushed the panties aside and made its way inward. The heat of the flesh touched the entrance of her pussy. Giselle was startled, but the weight pressing her lower abdomen left her immobile, on the verge of being penetrated.

It was then that the sound of car wheels began to be heard, cutting through the roar of the rain. Opening her eyes, she saw that the black road on the other side of the fence was slowly lighting up.

Headlights of a car.

It was a taxi.

The front garden was clearly visible from the road. The man would have to abandon his 'fun game' now. However, it was unclear whether he would let her go completely.

I prefer to rely on my own feet than on that demon.

If they wanted to pretend that nothing had happened, both he and Giselle would have to get up. While the taxi driver distracted the man, Giselle planned to escape. She didn't need to go far. Just ringing the house doorbell and waking up the maids and neighbors would be enough. No one would dare to take a woman in pajamas and barefoot in plain sight of everyone.

The man also seemed to hear the sound of the approaching taxi. He spat out the nipple he had between his lips and looked toward the road. When he turned his face toward Giselle, the demon was smiling.

Instead of getting up, he moved even closer to Giselle, until their noses almost touched. He stared fixedly at her, as if wanting to trap her with his gaze, and whispered:

— "In your eyes, that taxi looks like a savior who comes to rescue a damsel in distress. But in my eyes, it is not."

The flash of madness in his blue eyes instantly froze Giselle.

— "What will you say to that person?"

The man pointed toward the taxi, which was already only two houses away. Giselle, instinctively feeling it was time to lie, shook her head quickly.

— "It's okay. You can tell him. You can run away."

.What is he planning?

— "Then, I will scream so that all the neighbors hear me. My name is Edwin Eccleston, I am raping the girl I raised. Like that. What do you think?"

No. Don't hurt Edwin.

Giselle shook her head frantically. The man frowned, as if displeased, then got up. The hand that had been covering her mouth since she was pulled out the window began to slowly loosen. Even when the hand was completely withdrawn, Giselle made no sound.

— "That's right, you are a good little dog."

The man, after adjusting his own clothes, helped Giselle up just as the taxi stopped in front of the house.

— "Did you call a taxi?" — "Yes. Wait a moment."

He stood in front of Giselle, blocking the taxi driver's view, and took off his trench coat to cover Giselle's bare body. After buttoning all the buttons, he took her wrist and pulled her.

— "Let's go."

Giselle suppressed the urge to resist and, barefoot, obediently allowed herself to be led toward the back seat of the taxi. The man pushed her inside, closed the door, and told the driver their destination.

— "Whitehill, in Castleton."

Both the driver and Giselle opened their eyes wide. The destination was a mountain an hour's drive from Richmond. The driver, surprised by the possibility of a good fare, immediately cheered up and began to drive. But Giselle, remembering that Edwin had a cabin in Whitehill, paled.

Is he really planning to kidnap me and lock me up there?

Suddenly, all the worries she had while struggling to sleep that night seemed ridiculous.

What should I do now?

With Edwin as a hostage, Giselle had no choice but to obey the demon. No matter how hard she tried, she couldn't think of a way to escape without harming Edwin. She could only wait for him to regain consciousness and defeat the demon.

What will happen to me now?

Giving up the idea of escaping, she began to imagine what would happen next. Her body trembled as she thought about how she would survive.

— "Are you cold?"

The man next to her leaned in and hugged her. Giselle's tremors intensified, impossible to control.

Lord, please recover.

She stared fixedly at those cold blue eyes, hoping that her desperation would reach Edwin behind them. But she couldn't bear the madness in that gaze and quickly averted her eyes.

Then, her eyes met those of the taxi driver.

Chapter 100.

The driver kept looking at the two passengers out of the corner of his eye. How could he not be suspicious of soaking wet customers? Maybe he had even noticed that Giselle was barefoot.

Could he have figured out it was a kidnapping?

It was at that moment, when their eyes met again in the rearview mirror. The demon leaned his head towards Giselle, blocking the driver's view, and whispered to her in a tone that only she could hear:

— "The driver is suspicious. Do you want to turn your beloved 'Lord' into a rapist?" — "No—" — "Act like a couple on a date. As you have always wanted to do with him. Easy, right?"

How could it be easy? The man, acting as if he were setting an example, moved closer to Giselle, who was stiff as a porcelain doll. He kissed her until her lips, previously pale, turned red, and then separated. He reached his hand between the lapels of her trench coat and began to caress her chest while asking naturally:

— "How is school going?"

It was a conversation Giselle would have overheard if she had eavesdropped on Edwin's calls. She mechanically answered every obvious question, but at one point, she was speechless.

— "Didn't you want to see me?"

I wanted to kill him.

Although she had sharpened her hatred day after day, facing him, fear paralyzed her and hid her claws. He was no ordinary lunatic. But even if Giselle had lost her mind and forgotten the fear, she wouldn't have been able to scratch his face.

— "I'm asking you if you didn't want to see me."

Of course, if you keep scratching me like that, there's no way my nails won't stick out. Giselle looked him directly in the eyes, something she had been avoiding, and answered clearly:

— "I missed you, Lord."

I missed you, Lord. But not you.

She trusted that, being a demon, he would understand her true intentions. The corner of his lips twisted, and he leaned over Giselle. This time it wasn't a kiss on the lips, but a bite. The man's teeth left a deep mark on Giselle's lower lip.

The car moved slowly along a dark mountain road, illuminated only by the headlights, under a torrential rain. The driver, who had been mumbling rude words under his breath since they entered the mountain, dropped the two passengers in front of the cabin and quickly disappeared.

Had he contacted the cabin caretaker, who lived in the village at the foot of the mountain, beforehand? Through the windows of the isolated cabin, a light flickered.

The man lifted the entrance rug, found a key underneath, and opened the door, pushing Giselle inside. Upon entering, warm air enveloped them. The orange light that flickered came from a huge fireplace burning on one of the living room walls.

— "This way."

The place the man led Giselle to was the bathroom. She thought it was about taking off the wet clothes and drying off, but he placed her inside the bathtub with her clothes on. Then, he took off his shoes and stood in front of her.

What is he planning?

Fear invaded her, her body began to tremble. She suddenly flinched when the man turned on the faucet and water fell on her head.

— "Ah, it's cold!" — "Oh, I'm sorry."

The man adjusted the water temperature and began to unbutton his shirt. Under the warm water, Giselle's face paled.

— "Don't take off your clothes."

The girl, who until now had obeyed silently, suddenly began to resist. But it wasn't that she didn't want to undress, but that she was asking him not to. The man laughed and took off his shirt.

— "Do you want me to die of cold in wet clothes?" — "You could undress where I am not." — "Is this the first time you see me naked?"

It's not the first time, and that's why I hate it more. You will hate it too.

The man ignored Giselle and took off his belt. His pants fell to the bathtub floor.

I can't bear it anymore.

She tried to get out, but, of course, she was stopped. At least he didn't force her to turn around, and she could stay looking at the wall.

From behind, the sound of him even taking off his underwear was heard, and then two hands appeared and covered her chest. The fingers searched for something, feeling her clothes, until they found and began to rub a protruding spot. It was Giselle's nipple.

— "Ah, no, don't touch me." — "Then don't let it stick out so much."

The man slid his fingers toward the buttons of the trench coat. Now he was trying to undress her.

— "I don't want to. Don't do it." — "You have to wash up." — "I'm clean." — "But your clothes are not."

Giselle, who had been struggling with the man like a small child, suddenly stopped. Only then did she notice the cloudy water flowing under her feet and disappearing down the drain.

— "I fell into the river." — "¿What?"

The man took advantage of Giselle's moment of surprise to unbutton the coat and slide it off her shoulders. With a dull thump, the coat too big for Giselle fell into the bathtub.

— "Ah!"

The force with which he turned her and held her by the waist was sudden. So much so that her feet slipped. The moment her feet lifted, the man kicked the coat, which went to a corner of the bathtub, where a pile of clothes was already accumulating.

At the same time, Giselle lost her balance and fell backward. In her surprise, she reached out her hand and, by chance, grabbed the bare arm of the man in front of her.

Too late, she realized that she wouldn't have fallen even if she hadn't grabbed him. His two arms were already surrounding her waist.

This looks like an interrupted waltz posture.

The thought of the waltz suddenly irritated her. What would the author have thought upon seeing Giselle happy to have completed a waltz with Edwin? Would he have mocked her?

But what made her feel even worse was the lustful gaze that fell on her neck. The nightgown, which the man had removed in the garden in front of the house, was open, exposing her chest.

Reflexively, Giselle tried to adjust her nightgown, but it was a useless effort that only made things worse. The fabric, already soaked by the falling water, clung to her chest, exposing her pink nipples, creating an even more provocative image than if she were completely naked.

As if confirming it, Giselle felt with chilling clarity how a part of the man's body, pressed against her abdomen, was hardening.

Giselle quickly regained her balance and stepped back. Knowing it was already too late, she covered her chest with both hands, trying in vain to divert the pervert's attention to another part of her body.

— "H-how did you fall into the river?" — "Someone pushed me into the water." — "¿Who?" — "Isn't that too much?"

The man, instead of answering, took a step toward her with a strange expression. Giselle, stepping back, felt a chill upon touching the cold wall of the bathtub. Without realizing it, she had reached a corner with no exit.

Meanwhile, the man, who had approached Giselle with the expression of a wet dog, transformed into a beast the moment she was cornered.

His eyes shone with the desire to devour her in one bite, and he moistened his lower lip with his tongue. The man's refined face revealed a wild desire that made Giselle's heart clench, as did the area between her legs.

The man's labored breathing began to fall on Giselle's ear. Before the man bit her lobe, he whispered something that didn't match the voice of a roaring predator at all:

— "Now I'm afraid to go into the water alone. Stay with me."

I am more afraid of you.

Giselle's body trembled like an aspen when the man's lips descended.

Nothing out of the ordinary happened in the bathroom. It was no longer strange for a strange man to use Edwin's hands and mouth to touch her. In fact, the request to wash Edwin's body was even more uncomfortable.

What worried her the most during the entire trip to the cabin happened after leaving the bathroom.

Sitting on the rug in front of the fireplace, wrapped only in a towel, Giselle was horrified to see the man take a tin out of an envelope on the table. They were condoms.

— "I won't do it."

The man, for whom Giselle's will did not matter at all, did not even look at her. He removed the towel from his waist and began to place a condom on his erection, which remained firm.

Should I run away?

Although her head was oriented toward the fireplace, her eyes darted toward the window, where the rain was beating hard. But the man read her intentions and warned her:

— "You will freeze to death or be devoured by beasts. If you die, your Lord will be sad, won't he?"

Then, should I run away to the room?

— "I have a master key. If you block the door with furniture, I will break the window and enter. With my bare hands. It will hurt your Lord, won't it?"

The man cut off all of Giselle's ankles with his tongue and then began to calm her with that same tongue.

— "Giselle, you don't need to run away. I am not going to force you or do anything against your will."

The man knew why Giselle was looking at him with those eyes.

— "Ah, the thing earlier in front of the house? I got too excited, it's not like me. I'm sorry. You apologize too. Because it's also your fault for exciting me."

Crazy.

— "Anyway, aren't you curious about how I am going to have sex with you if you say you don't want to?"

*

Continue in Part 3!!



